,Job Title,Salary Range,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors
0,SENIOR SOFTWARE ENGINEER - Python/Node.js,-1,"SENIOR SOFTWARE ENGINEER - Python/Node.js*
(Top Secret - TS/SCI Clearance Required!)
BigBear, Inc.* is an industry-leading provider of big data computing and analytics solutions. We help people make sense of their data using our cloud-based platform and big data processing algorithms. Each day, we crunch massive volumes of structured and unstructured data into usable and actionable information for our customers. We currently have offices in Reston, VA., Charlottesville, VA., and San Diego, CA.
REQUIRED: *
5+ years of professional software development experience (MINIMUM)*
Solid experience with Python/ Django, Node JS, or Flask.
Solid experience with PostgreSQL.
Solid experience in Linux environment.
Solid experience with data modeling, business logic, and RESTful APIs.
Experience with NGINX and SSL.
US Citizenship and TS/SCI US Security Clearance.*
BS/MS in Computer Science or related field or equivalent military experience.
BONUS SKILLS: *
Experience working in an Agile/Scrum development process.
Experience with deployment automation in Amazon Web Services.
Experience with Django Framework.
Experience with geospatial toolkits including GDAL and PostGIS
Experience with high volume data flow.
Solid experience with Amazon Web Services (EC2, S3, SQS, RDS).
TECHNOLOGY WE USE: *
ElasticSearch
PostgreSQL
Python - Django
Java
AWS
Docker
Git
Angular, React
Jenkins
Our Company: *
BigBear, Inc.* is a software development company with locations in San Diego, Washington DC, Charlottesville, and Reston, VA. Our mission is to enable big data computing and analytics for our customers at a low cost. We leverage capabilities such as machine learning, crowdsourcing, geospatial image processing, and Extract-Transform-Load (ETL) data processing using our on-premise cloud computing technology stack. Our solutions provide a unique offering of products, custom-built software, and services focused within Big Data Analytics, Geospatial Information Systems (GIS), Visualization and Cloud Computing to our Department of Defense, and Commercial customers. We currently have exciting and challenging career opportunities for talented, motivated individuals who want to be part of a fast-growing company.
Our Team: *
We like to play with new toys and technologies. We like to break things to see if we can put them back together again in a better way. Our tails wag when we hear the words Big Data, Geospatial or Machine Learning. Each team member provides a unique set of advanced technical skills and trade that contributes to our overall success.
Perks/Benefits: *
· 100% employer-paid for Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance (PPO)
· A competitive salary based on experience
· Flexible Spending Account (FSA) - optional
· 401(k) with dollar-for-dollar match up to 6%
· A warm, cozy office with actual chairs and tables
· Life and Disability Insurance 100% paid for by the company
· Education Assistance
· 529 College Savings Plan - optional
· Healthy Rewards Program
· Pre-paid Legal & Identity Theft Protection - optional
· Gym Reimbursement
· Pet Insurance - optional
· A shiny magical machine that does wonderful things
· Flexible Hours
· Unlimited Coffee, Drinks and Snacks
· 6 WEEKS of Paid Time Off (PTO) on top of 11 Paid Holidays!
BigBear is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled *
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $100,000.00 - $135,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
COVID-19 considerations:
We are mostly working remotely at the moment due to COVID but we will be back to full time onsite at some point in the not too distant future

Experience:
Python: 4 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Reston, VA 20191 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Relocation Assistance Provided:
No
This Job Is:
A job for which military experienced candidates are encouraged to apply
Company's website:
www.bigbear.io
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"BigBear, Inc.
4.4","Reston, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
1,Data Scientist,$97k-$155k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a member of the Data Science team, you will run the development of next-generation platforms for customers micro-segmentation, clusterization, behavior analysis, and prediction as well as building up new improved recommendation systems for the customers.

You will use your expertise to design data science models and frameworks, data processing pipelines, and lead efforts of the ML models productization.

You will use project management skills to manage the deliverables and ensure all stakeholder work is complete on time. You will also manage stakeholder communications and present your project across a wide spectrum of management levels.

Data Scientist is supposed to handle complex problems independently and demonstrate analytical thinking. At this position, you should be able to make judgments and recommendations based on the analysis and interpretation of data.

The position requires excellent communication skills and experience working directly with technical teams as well as with business stakeholders. Being able to present findings in a meaningful and clear way is a must.

Responsibilities:
Design, develop, train, evaluate, tune and support machine learning models for time series analysis, demand forecasting, customer intelligence, recommendation systems, optimization, NLP and image analytics.
Design, implement and support scalable jobs and services for data cleaning, preprocessing, aggregation for model training and model inference data pipelines.
Analyze existing and discover new data sources, perform feature engineering and feature selection
Contribute to the analysis of the business requirements, architecture development and implementation planning
Contribute to the presentation of teams results
Learn & stay current on developments in one or more analytics domains: Optimization, Machine Learning, Deep Learning / AI, Simulation, etc.
Build upon and utilize Amazon Cloud Services and Tools
Requirements:
Good communication and presentation skills
Solid mathematical & computer science background
Relevant software engineering background: VCS(git), CICD, containers (Docker), SQL, agile development practices
Proficiency and practical experience with Python and Python-based ML ecosystem, good coding skills
Proficiency and practical experience with cloud native software architectures, familiarity with AWS ecosystem: Sagemaker, Redshift, Aurora, Redis, EMR, SNS, SQS, DocDB, Cloudwatch, Step Functions, etc...
Strong practical knowledge of classic ML algorithms and experience with modeling tools like scikit-learn, statsmodels, lightgbm, hyperopt
Familiarity with and understanding of time series modeling, response modeling, lift modeling, survival analytics, look-alike modeling, statistical modeling. Ability to quickly ramp up to state-of-the-art in corresponding field.
Nice to Have (Plus):
Familiarity with data engineering and devOps is a plus
Experience with NLP and image analytics is a plus
Experience with recommendation systems (collaborative filtering, content filtering, session-based recommenders is a plus)
Deep learning knowledge and practical experience is a plus (TF, Pytorch, MLPs, RNNs, CNNs, Transformers, etc..)
Experience with retail, online commerce or similar B2C business domain is a plus
Experience in working across different global cultures is a plus

We offer:
Opportunity to work on bleeding-edge projects
Work with a highly motivated and dedicated team
Very competitive salary
Flexible schedule
Medical insurance
Benefits program
Corporate social events
Professional development opportunities
NB:

Placement and Staffing Agencies need not apply. We do not work with C2C at this time. At this moment, we are not able to process H1B transfers. Applicants with CPT and OPT visas are welcome to apply.

About Us:

Grid Dynamics is the engineering services company known for transformative, mission-critical cloud solutions for retail, finance and technology sectors.

We architected some of the busiest e-commerce services on the Internet and have never had an outage during the peak season.

Founded in 2006 and headquartered in San Ramon, California with offices throughout the US and Eastern Europe, we focus on big data analytics, omnichannel services, DevOps, and cloud enablement.",3.9,"Grid Dynamics
3.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
2,"RESEARCH ENGINEER - EARTH, OCEANS, & SPACE",$57k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are:


With a focus on engineering and science flight projects, our staff explores new scientific challenges and develops innovative flight instruments to study problems in the areas of earth science, astrophysics, and heliophysics.


Objectives of this Role:

Design and analyze mass efficient structures and electronic packaging for extreme environment situations, materials quality, and mechanical integrity
Support various design reviews throughout product life cycle, including defending design and analytical work to customer, third party, and non-advocate reviewers

Daily and Monthly Responsibilities:


Supervise and coordinate fabrication of payload mechanical systems and subsystems. Develop and supervise environmental screening tests, development tests, and experiments
Produce high quality engineering documentation including drawings, specifications, test plans, procedures, and reports
Perform structural and thermal analyses of flight hardware
Field support may require travel to customer's facilities, NASA field centers, military bases, and overseas.

Requirements:


Requires an Bachelors with a 3.0 GPA in Mechanical Engineering or Aerospace Engineering
2 years of experience using computer aided design (CAD) software and standard office productivity software
Ability to productively interface with team members, suppliers and clients is a must. Experience with CREO (PRO/Engineer), structural analysis (e.g. ANSYS, NASTRAN), thermal analysis (e.g. Thermal Desktop), environmental testing methodology, mechanism design, material selection and characterization, electromechanical design, and/or space mission concept design
Experience with Thermal Analysis
A valid/clear driver's license is required


Special Requirements:


Work assignment is in Durham, New Hampshire. Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: Durham, New Hampshire


For more information about this division, visit the Space Science & Engineering home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.1,"Southwest Research Institute
4.1","New Durham, NH",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
3,Federal Pre-Sales Engineer,$70k-$201k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position: Federal Proposal Manager *
Position Location: Washington, DC *
Welcome to Planet. We believe in using space to help life on Earth. *
Planet designs, builds, and operates the largest constellation of imaging satellites in history.

This constellation delivers an unprecedented dataset of empirical information via a revolutionary cloud-based platform to decision-makers in commercial, environmental, and humanitarian sectors. We are both a space company and data company all rolled into one.

Customers and users across the globe use Planet's data and machine learning-powered analytics to develop new technologies, drive revenue, power research, and solve our world’s toughest challenges.

As we control every component of hardware design, manufacturing, data processing, and software engineering, our office is a truly inspiring mix of experts from a variety of domains.

We have a people-centric approach toward culture and community and we are iterating in a way that puts our team members first and prepares our company for growth.

Join Planet and be a part of our mission to change the way people see the world.
Position Summary *
The Federal Proposal Manager will lead the development of solicited and unsolicited Federal government proposals in support of the broader Planet Federal Sales and Business

Development Teams. For this role, you can translate your expertise in complex proposal management, writing, and marketing into world class and timely US Government proposal and sales enablement materials. You will collaborate across our sales, business operations, and product teams and work closely with engineering and program management to develop compliant and compelling customer facing documentation. As part of the Business

Operations team, the Proposal Manager will be a problem solver with strong intrapersonal skills, allowing them to navigate the broader customer lifecycle process while maintaining a strong and productive rapport with the Planet Federal Sales and Business Development

team. The Proposal Manager may also supervise and lead additional proposal support personnel as the team grows.
Key Responsibilities *
Managing, writing, editing, and formatting solicited and unsolicited proposals for US

Government customers including IC, DoD, and Federal Civilian. Driving content development, proposal process improvements, and proposal training. Working with Sales and Technical SMEs to articulate Planet product features and benefits to customers.
The Role: *
• Work with Sales, Business Operations, and the Product Team to manage, develop, and drive both solicited and unsolicited proposal generation and customer facing documentation

• Ensure 100% on-time delivery of compliant and compelling proposals on all assigned opportunities

• Collaborate with internal stakeholders (Sales, Product, and Legal) to ensure that all deals align with Planet Federal strategies and guidelines

• Become a go-to resource for Sales with regards to up-to-date sales content

• Work with the Sales, Business Development, Communications, and Marketing teams to create world-class proposals and enablement materials.

• Monitor and support opportunity tracking and bid/no bid process

• Support GSA schedule maintenance and updates

• Create, edit, and manage content for both internal and external audiences

• Build strong relationships with Sales, Product, Marketing, and Engineering teams
Required Professional Experience: *
• Minimum three (3) years experience in Federal government proposal and/or grants generation, project management, technical writing, or business strategy and development

• Experience developing customer facing documentation including: whitepapers, proposals, and presentations

• Comfortable communicating with Executive level decision makers

• Experience supporting complex public sector, academic, and/or enterprise level business proposals, and use cases.

• Flexibility and willingness to step outside of traditional roles as needed in a fast-paced startup environment

• Advanced knowledge in the use of content development tools including Google

Suites, Microsoft Office, and Adobe products

• Familiarity with CRM tracking, reports, and dashboards

• Experience working with highly technical product solutions such as cloud storage, imagery, or with geographical information systems.

• Experience supporting geographically diverse teams and customers

• Must have the ability to multitask and meet short timelines/deadlines; at times have the ability to work non-traditional hours, weekends., and holidays to meet proposal deadlines and support global team

• An active security clearance, or the ability to obtain one, at the Top Secret level or higher.
Preferred Professional Experience: *
• Familiarity with and/or experience supporting geospatial, commercial space, and/or satellite remote sensing customers and products

• Graphic design, desktop publishing, and template development experience

• Large-scale project management experience
Some press about us: *
Our CEO, Will Marshall's T ED Talk

""Tiny Satellites ushering in the New Space Revolution"" Bloomberg Businessweek

""The All-Seeing Eye in the Sky video"" Bloomberg Businessweek video

""Planet And Rocket Lab Create Mission Patch To Honor Women In Aerospace"" —Planet Blog
Join Us: *
Planet Federal is headquartered in Washington D.C. If you are feeling inspired, check out our website h ttps: //planetfederal.applytojob.com/apply and apply. Be sure to include a cover

letter to let us know why you think you’d be a good fit and feel free to mention anyone you have previously worked with at Planet.
_We are committed to building a diverse team and encourage applications from people _*
_of all backgrounds._*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $91,000.00 - $121,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Commission pay
Experience:
remote sensing or GIS: 3 years (Required)
customer-facing role: 3 years (Required)
GIS tools (i.e. ArcGIS, QGIS, etc): 3 years (Required)
Location:
Washington, DC 20005 (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Paid Training:
Yes
Management:
Key Leader
Company's website:
www.planet.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.1,"Planet Federal
4.1","Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
4,Principal R&D Software Engineer,$77k-$153k (Glassdoor Est.),"Purpose and Passion • Comprehensive Benefits • Life-Work Integration • Community • Career Growth

At Boston Scientific, you will find a collaborative culture driven by a passion for innovation that keeps us connected on the most essential level. With determination, imagination and a deep caring for human life, we’re solving some of the most important healthcare industry challenges. Together, we’re one global team committed to making a difference in people’s lives around the world. This is a place where you can find a career with meaningful purpose—improving lives through your life’s work.

Headline: Pushing the boundaries of what's possible gives my work purpose.

About the role:

Our Research and Development team is all about building the future of the operating room and office for urology patients and clinicians. As a Principal R&D Software Engineer, you'll be at the heart of that mission, developing best-in-class capital systems and software as part of our comprehensive portfolio of solutions. In return for your unique combination of big-picture perspective, ability to execute rigorously, and strong desire to win in the marketplace you'll be a trusted leader collaborating with some of most dynamic minds in the business. All in an environment that encourages people to take measured risks, learn from mistakes, and push the boundaries of engineering.

Key responsibilities:
Leading software architecture, implementation, integration, and testing for complex, connected electronic medical equipment (“capital”) systems and systems-of-systems.
Establishing best-practices for medical device software development and recruitment within the growing business franchise.
Producing maintainable code and technical documentation.
Collaborating with cross-functional and cross-divisional experts in a wide range of fields to solve complex engineering and business challenges.
Translating highly technical results into easily understood recommendations that will influence senior stakeholders.
Managing third party designers, vendors, and contractors to deliver high quality engineering solutions at an accelerated pace.
What we’re looking for in you
10+ years software development in lead roles, preferably in medical devices or a regulated industry with a proven track record of deployment in commercial products.
B.S. in Computer Science or equivalent with appropriate experience (Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, etc.). Masters preferred.
Experience defining and implementing APIs and communication protocols for control and operation of instrumentation.
Multithreaded application development that includes testing and debugging C/C++ on Linux.
Experience working within an Agile software development environment.
Experience in modern Source Code Management (SCM) tools such as git or AccuRev.
Experience in Continuous Integration/Continuous Deployment (CI/CD) software practice in a regulated environment.
Experience working within a quality system, IEC and ISO standards relevant to medical device software lifecycle and risk management (i.e. IEC 62304).
Experience with filesystems, concurrency, multithreading, server architectures, and distributed systems (e.g. AWS, IoT).
Experience with network protocols (TCP, UDP, TLS/SSL, HTTP) and web services (e.g. REST).
Working knowledge of software security and data privacy best practices and risk management.
Passion for understanding and solving problems for end users, with an ability to translate into software requirements, design, and test specifications.
Passion for developing talent, mentoring, and building high-performance teams.
Track record of strong cross-functional collaboration, influence without authority, and project management enabling highly effective project teams.
Proven self-starter who runs towards critical issues, ambiguous requirements, or loosely defined challenges with a demonstrated ability to rally teams to achieve business results.
Comfortable debugging complex integrated systems spanning hardware, embedded and application software in medical devices.
Familiarity with deployment of AI models using platforms such as Amazon Sagemaker, Google Cloud AI Platform, or Azure Machine learning studio a plus.
Familiarity with application of data engineering, data science, and database management a plus.
Familiarity with computer vision toolkits (e.g. OpenCV) a plus.
Experience in algorithm development and deployment using hardware specific hardware platforms such as GPU-accelerated programming, FPGAs, or microcontrollers a plus.
Travel: 10%
About us

As a global medical technology leader for more than 35 years, our mission at Boston Scientific (NYSE: BSX) is to transform lives through innovative medical solutions that improve the health of patients. If you’re looking to truly make a difference to people both around the world and around the corner, there’s no better place to make it happen.

Boston Scientific is an Equal Opportunity Employer – Race, Color, Religion, Sex, Sexual Orientation, Gender Identity, National Origin, Disability, Veteran

Boston Scientific maintains a drug-free workplace. Pursuant to Va. Code § 2.2-4312 (2000), Boston Scientific is providing notification that the unlawful manufacture, sale, distribution, dispensation, possession, or use of a controlled substance or marijuana is prohibited in the workplace and that violations will result in disciplinary action up to and including termination.",4.4,"Boston Scientific
4.4","Marlborough, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1979,Company - Public,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
5,Multi Skilled Maintenance Engineer,$43k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Employment Type: * Full-Time
Job location: *Linden, NJ
Job Description: *
C&W Services are looking for talented Service Technicians - level I, II, and III. As one of our specialists you will learn new skills as you support the Operations Maintenance team in repairing and maintaining material handling equipment and pneumatic systems, and have the opportunity to install, maintain and repair automated packaging and distribution equipment. At C&W we are committed to improvement, and you will be encouraged to participate in on-going development opportunities to progress and enhance your career.
Benefits: *
Whether you’re a Service Technician I, II, or III, we offer a great range of benefits from day 1:

• Healthcare

• Weekly pay

• 401K Plan

• Paid Time off; 10 Vacation days per year, national holidays, and up to 48 PTO hours per year

• Career advancement opportunities

• On-going training in a cutting-edge facility

• Safety first culture
Essential Experience & Qualifications: *
• High school diploma or equivalent.

• 1+ years of experience in basic preventive/predictive maintenance, troubleshooting skills and repair methods of industrial machines.

• 1+ years of experience in Mechanical and/or Electrical basic components.

• 1 + years of experience with compressors and pneumatics.
Preferred Qualifications: *
• 1+ years of experience using power tools to include saws and drills with proper safety precautions.

• Experience with Microsoft Office suite and OS.

• Experience with basic metal and wood fabrication, including saws and drills.

• Basic understanding of a Computerized Maintenance Management System (CMMS).
Physical Requirements: *
• Vision (Near, Distance)

• Lift and move totes up to 49 pounds each

• Regular bending, lifting, stretching and reaching both below the waist and above the head

• Occasionally push and pull wheeled dollies loaded with products up to 100 pounds during site visits

• Engage in full manual dexterity in both hands and wrists

• Walking in the FC and around area with great frequency; facilities are over a quarter mile in length

• Ability to climb ladders and gangways safely and without limitation

• Ability to work in construction /distribution environments that may be noisy, unlit, unheated, not air-conditioned

• Continual standing and/or walking an average of 5 miles daily

• Able to access all areas of building (ascending and descending ladders, stairs, etc.)
Day to day responsibilities of these roles include, but are not limited to: *
· Promoting a safe working environment by following all safety procedures.

· Completing preventative maintenance routines with proper documentation.

· Provide feedback on tasks in the Preventive Maintenance programs (level II only)
Develop Preventive Maintenance programs (level III only)
· Use of appropriate tooling to troubleshoot simple AC/DC circuits

· Troubleshooting of material handling equipment (MHE), and repairs to miscellaneous Operational equipment as needed.

· Maintaining positive working relationships across all of the Operations facility.

· Tracking and storing department inventory.

· Train and mentor Service Technicians (level II and III only)
About C&W Services: *
A leader in facilities services with over 65 years of experience. C&W Services is one of the largest facility services companies in the USA & Canada with a 65-year history of helping clients drive down operating expenses, increase facility efficiency and up-time, enable strategic business decisions and create positive experiences for the people who work, shop, learn, live and play in the facilities we maintain. We’re building the best team in the industry – our people are the heart and vitality of C&W Services. In joining C&W Services, you’re joining a firm with a rich history, blue-chip client list, and the backing of sister company Cushman & Wakefield, one of the world’s largest property advisory firms and the reason for our success is simple: talented people.

Our success is due to a supportive and friendly culture that fosters collaboration. Find out more today: https://careers.cushmanwakefield.com/cwservices/global/en

Learn why C&W Services is an ideal place for veterans to continue their careers: https://cwservices.com/veterans/

C&W Services is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.

Electromechanics, Electromechanical Assembly, Electrical Schematics, Industrial Electrical Equipment, Wiring, Conveyor Material Handling, Industrial Equipment, Component Repair, Component Troubleshooting, PLC, Mechanical Maintenance, Industrial Maintenance, Rigging, Troubleshooting, Wood Manufacturing, Power Tools, Electricity, Predictive Maintenance, Preventive Maintenance

ID: C&WPArans/

Job Type: Full-time",3.6,"Cushman & Wakefield
3.6","Linden, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1917,Company - Public,Real Estate,Real Estate,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
6,Sr. Software Engineer - Open Source Tools,$82k-$159k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Alteryx


Alteryx develops software for data preparation and analysis, including a number of server solutions for model deployment, collaborative work on data, and scheduling of automatic data processing. We're revolutionizing data analytics by providing a complete end to end, self-service platform that allows users to get from business questions to business answers at incredible speeds. Why work for just any analytics company?

At Alteryx, we are explorers, dreamers and innovators. We're on a journey to build the best analytics platform in the world, but we can't do it without people like you leading the way. We want Alteryx to be recognized as much for our dynamic work culture as for our products.

About Alteryx Innovation Labs


The Innovation Labs office, Alteryx's first office presence in Boston, was started earlier this year by the acquisition of MIT-spinout Feature Labs. This rapidly growing team combines the excitement of being part of a fast-paced, innovative startup with the resources, market penetration, and wisdom of a data analytics market leader. Our goal is to turbo-charge machine learning and data science efforts on the Alteryx platform, and to enable anyone to solve impactful problems. We are working on high-impact, high-visibility projects, and we’re looking for collaborative and knowledge-hungry teammates who want to join us as we work to democratize machine learning.


Overview


As a Senior Software Engineer, you will help the Open Source Tools team create and maintain innovative, open source tools for machine learning. Responsibilities you will encounter in this role include:
Working with other team members to design and implement new features for our tools
Create new open source libraries to complement our existing ones
Identifying the source of an issue a user is having with one of our libraries and implement a fix
Assisting community members in contributing changes of their own to our projects
Building integrations with other popular open source libraries such as pandas, scitkit-learn, or dask
Writing documentation and creating demos that communicate how to user our tool and the challenge it is trying to solve
Presenting our tools and technology at industry conferences such as PyCon and PyData
Performing peer code review
***The company will not provide sponsorship for work visas or other employment authorization for this position***
Requirements
BS or higher in Computer Science or equivalent
Extensive experience with Python development
Experience with data-related Python tools like numpy, scipy, pandas, scikit-learn, and dask
Work in our Boston office near Copley Square
Bonus
Contributed to or maintain open source libraries
Experience with performance testing machine learning systems
Experience with API design
Benefits and Perks
100% company-paid medical, dental, and vision for associates
Company matched 401(k)
Associate stock purchase plan
Paid time off: 3 weeks’ vacation, 5 sick days, 9 holidays, 3 floating holidays, and 20 hours volunteer time
100% paid parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Wellness programs with up to $300 fitness reimbursement annually
Collaborative offices stocked with healthy snacks and drinks
Office events, catered lunches, and happy hours
#LI-JE1",3.6,"Alteryx
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
7,Data Scientist,$112k-$133k (Glassdoor Est.),"Entefy’s Senior Data Scientist is a highly visible position both internally and externally. Join the intelligence revolution, where we can push the state-of-the-art boundaries of data science. This is where deep experience and multi-dimensional insights intersect with an amazing opportunity to shape the future of productivity for people everywhere.

Skills and Experience:

We’re not looking for “good.” Entefy is on a mission to find exceptional talent. The success of our mission depends on our team’s ability to be creatively analytical, insatiably curious, and absolutely fearless in tackling big challenges.
Requirements
Master's degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, or a compatible field. PhD is preferred.
3+ years of applicable work experience.
Demonstrable proficiency in Python, Scala, SQL, or R.
Strong data visualization and reporting skills.
Proven track record delivering high-value, advanced analytics.
Experience leading the work of other data scientists or analysts is preferred.
World-class ability to extract and communicate insights from real-world datasets.
Startup agility and versatility.
Visit www.entefy.com and www.blog.entefy.com.",4.3,"Entefy
4.3","Palo Alto, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
8,Senior Software Engineer,-1,"Senior Software Engineer

We are seeking a highly motivated, talented Senior Engineer to join our product development team. We expect that all engineers can work full stack to some degree, but most engineers at Narrative Science have a primary focus. For this role, we’re looking for an engineer who has experience with and a passion for analytics, statistics, or machine learning.

You are someone who is comfortable owning and leading new projects end to end, working closely with product teams, and have a strong focus on improving the overall customer experience. You enjoy helping and mentoring people and believe that a great product comes from great team collaboration. You take delight in debugging unfamiliar problems and push yourself and others to grow as engineers.

Our Team


This role will be on our Depth Team, which primarily focuses on taking user provided data and writing a comprehensive story about it. We do this by determining what questions Lexio can answer based on the data, determining which answers are most relevant to the user, how the story should be structured with our NLG platform, and finally, how we want to present that story to our users in an interactive and intuitive way.

As a Senior Engineer on the Depth Team you will be focused on how we present our story and what content we choose to surface to the user within the story. You will have direct ownership over a large part of our code base and will be working hand in hand with our product and development teams to improve the analysis and content in our stories. In this role, you will have a solid mix of greenfield projects and platform improvements, along with plenty of opportunities to prototype and build lasting features and enhancements.

Qualifications:
4+ years of professional software development experience
Proven expertise of Python or equivalent
Demonstrated ability to write clean, helpfully-commented and readable code
A drive to learn constantly with an analytical and problem-solving mindset
A desire to grow as both an software and data engineer
Experience with Data Science Stack such as Sklearn, TensorFlow, Keras, etc
Experience with developing with statistical computing languages, such as Python or R
Bonus:
Experience with Unix / Linux systems (e.g. Ubuntu, CentOS, RedHat, etc.)
Familiarity with cloud computing, particularly AWS
About the Engineering Team @ Narrative Science

The Engineering team at Narrative Science specializes in delivering high-value cloud-based solutions to customers. Specifically, we are responsible for building and innovating on an insightful and personalized data storytelling platform. We work a lot with data pipelines, analytics, natural language generation (NLG), continuous deployment tooling, and cloud architecture.

Culture @ Narrative Science

Narrative Science believes that data storytelling can empower everyone to understand and take action from their data. Our mission is to build software that leverages artificial intelligence to automatically turn data into easy-to-understand reports, transforms statistics into stories, and converts numbers into knowledge.

Our core virtues (mission-driven, impactful, team first, innovative) are ingrained in everything we do, from how we develop our technology to how we interact with customers to how we hire people. Since 2020, we have embraced a remote approach and are on a journey to ingrain that in our culture. All while being immersed in our culture of learning, collaboration, innovation, and customer impact.

At Narrative Science, we embrace the diverse backgrounds, experiences, and perspectives of our future employees, colleagues, customers, partners, and other stakeholders. We provide equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, marital status, citizenship, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.1,"Narrative Science
4.1",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
9,Data Scientist,-1,"About Us

Mindoula is a next-generation behavioral health management company that delivers tech-enabled, team-based 24/7/365 behavioral health support across the continuum of care. We are building the best population health management and analytics platform by using the latest technologies in big data and data science. Also, we are developing a comprehensive platform to address the needs of pre and post hospital care for large populations.

We are currently seeking to fill in multiple roles in technology and data to help build great technology helping Mindoula to grow faster.

About You

We are looking for a talented data scientist who has a great passion for solving business problems by providing data insights through data modeling and analysis. You will work with senior leadership and data/technology teams to understand and solve complex business problems by developing data models and various techniques to analyze the health populations.

Responsibilities:
Derive insights from data analysis and modeling using multiple datasets, derived from the company platform, data provided by our customers etc.
Develop a comprehensive profile of the patient/member using the data available.
Apply statistical techniques to understand health data and analyze outcomes.
Apply data science algorithms and techniques to understand the member profile and prepare the data such that these insights help the care management team in addressing needs of our customers and members.
Be part of the data team, collaborate with product and engineering teams in developing the data required to support the functionality and new features of our platforms.
Must be self-driven and a quick learner.
Requires strong problem-solving, analytical and communication skills.
Healthcare data experience (claims, groupers) is a plus.
Technologies:
Data science: Analysis/Machine learning/AI algorithms and modeling.
Data Platforms: Spark, Python/Scala.
Strong SQL experience.
Databases: Postgres, Microsoft SQL Server
Hosting: Microsoft Azure
Tools: Github, CircleCI, CodeClimate
Requirements:
Minimum 3 years of experience in position
Healthcare experience with managing claims data
Compensation:
Competitive salary.
Generous benefits
This position is open to both as an employee or as a contractor/consultant.",3.8,"Mindoula Health Inc
3.8",Maryland,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
10,Computational Science Engineer (CSE),-1,"As part of the team at Q you will work alongside a highly skilled group of scientists on cutting edge technology in the measurement, modeling, and analysis of complex processes that take place in human physiology.

Q draws upon engineering, computer science, biology, physics, and applied mathematics to develop multi-scale models of human physiology, in order to create innovative algorithms and tools that allows us to better characterize and understand human health and its pathologies. We offer the opportunity to learn and develop new skills in a dynamic, multidisciplinary environment, in order to build a world where each generation is healthier than the last.

Key Responsibilities

- Build and maintain a high performance optimization framework for systems with 100's of millions of variables

- Develop novel numerical modeling algorithms for multi-physics simulations

- Contribute to the development of intellectual property

- Maintain substantial knowledge of state-of-the-art principles and theories in the space of optimization and machine learning
Required Qualifications
PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering or Applied Math
Hands on experience implementing advanced computational methods for electromagnetics, fluid dynamics, or mechanics
Strong background in numerical linear algebra
Strong background in electrodynamics
Experience working in C/C++ and Python
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Relentless, self-motivated creative problem solver
Able to work effectively in high-pressure, fast-moving team environment
Bonus Qualifications
Experience in electromagnetic integral equation methods
Mathematical optimization (large scale convex / non-convex optimization, stochastic optimization, etc.)
Experience developing applications with MPI/OpenMP
CUDA programming experience
Benefits
Competitive salary and equity in a well-funded, early stage startup
Healthcare, vision, and dental coverage for you and your dependents
Hands-on experience with cutting edge biotech tools, techniques and data including Genomics, Transcriptomics, Epigenetics, Proteomics, Metabolomics, Microbiomics, Radiomics
We have Superconducting Magnets!
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",4.4,"Q Bio
4.4","Redwood City, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
11,Data Scientist,$111k-$175k (Glassdoor Est.),"C3.ai is a leading enterprise AI software provider for accelerating digital transformation. The comprehensive and proven C3 AI Suite uses a model-driven abstraction layer to enable organizations to develop, deploy, and operate enterprise scale AI applications 40x to 100x faster than alternative approaches. www.c3.ai

As a Data Scientist, you will participate in the definition of new analytics capabilities able to provide our customers with the information they need to make proper decisions to support our customers in operating the internet of things (IoT). In addition, you will help find the appropriate machine learning / data mining algorithms to answer these questions. Finally, you will be responsible for implementing this into the product and making it available to our customers.

Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application. You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve similar results at large-scale.

Your Responsibilities:
Driving adoption of Deep Learning systems into next-generation of C3.ai products.
Designing and deploying Machine Learning algorithms for industrial applications such as fraud detection and predictive maintenance.
Collaborating with data and subject matter experts from C3.ai and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.
Requirements:
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields.
Applied Machine Learning experience (regression and classification, supervised, and unsupervised learning).
Strong mathematical background (linear algebra, calculus, probability and statistics).
Experience with scalable ML (MapReduce, streaming).
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team.
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference.
Excellent verbal and written communication.
Preferred
Experience with JavaScript and prototyping languages such as Python and R. Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
Knowledge in electrical engineering and cyber-physical systems is a plus.
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.) is a plus.
C3.ai provides a competitive compensation package and excellent benefits including:
Competitive salary, generous stock options, 401K, medical, dental, and vision benefits. At the office, we offer a fully stocked kitchen with catered breakfast and lunch, table tennis and pool table, free membership at our on-site gym, Friday evening social hours with food, drink and music and a fun team of great people.
C3.ai is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of any legally protected characteristics, including disabled and veteran status.",4.5,"C3.ai
4.5","Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
12,Software Engineer - Human Machine Teaming,$60k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you enjoy using data to solve hard problems?

Are you interested in developing intelligent systems to improve human machine interactions?

If so, we’re looking for someone like you to join our team at APL.

We are seeking a Software Engineer to help us develop systems that enable teams of human operators and AI-enabled machines to jointly confront the challenge of physical threats (such as firearms and explosives) to civilian and military targets. These systems must provide enhanced situational awareness by detecting, classifying, and tracking the presence of elusive threats in highly cluttered environments. They must further support rapid and effective response decisions to avoid catastrophic consequences. We strive to foster an environment of creativity, innovation, and fun. As a member of our team, you will contribute to projects for a range of government sponsors and work closely with operators to build tools to suit their needs.

As a Software Engineer…
Your primarily responsibility will include leading and assisting in developing systems that integrate, exploit, and visualize data using state-of-the art technologies and techniques.
You will communicate with government sponsors to understand operational needs and share ideas for meeting them.
You will aid in proposals to develop innovative human machine teaming concepts.

#LI-BM1 #APL-AG1

You meet our minimum qualifications for the job if you…

Have a BS degree in a technical field such as Software Engineering, Applied Mathematics, Applied Physics, Computer Science or related degrees
Have 5 years of experience in the areas of data visualization, human-machine teaming, human-computer interaction, data analysis and integration, or user interfaces for web, mobile, or desktop platforms
Are highly skilled in one or more of the following areas: Python, Java, C , computer vision, and machine learning
Have strong interpersonal and communication skills
Are able to obtain a Secret level security clearance. If selected, you will be subject to a government security clearance investigation and must meet the requirements for access to classified information. Eligibility requirements include U.S. citizenship.

You’ll go above and beyond our minimum requirements if you…

Have a MS or PhD degree in a technical field such as Software Engineering, Applied Mathematics, Applied Physics, Computer Science or related degrees
Have experience in one or more of the following areas: Angular, Julia, TensorFlow, PyTorch, Docker, OpenCV, user interface design and development, embedded AI computing, synthetic data generation, distributed intelligent computing, and object detection algorithms
Have experience developing augmented reality, virtual reality, and/or mixed reality technologies/solutions
Have a portfolio of interface and/or algorithm designs and code
Have leadership experience as a manager or supervisor

Why work at APL?

The Johns Hopkins University Applied Physics Laboratory (APL) brings world-class expertise to our nation’s most critical defense, security, space and science challenges. While we are dedicated to solving complex challenges and pioneering new technologies, what makes us truly outstanding is our culture. We offer a vibrant, welcoming atmosphere where you can bring your authentic self to work, continue to grow, and build strong connections with inspiring teammates.

At APL, we celebrate our differences and encourage creativity and bold, new ideas. Our employees enjoy generous benefits, including a robust education assistance program, unparalleled retirement contributions, and a healthy work/life balance. APL’s campus is located in the Baltimore-Washington metro area. Learn more about our career opportunities atwww.jhuapl.edu/careers.",4.6,"Johns Hopkins Applied Physics Laboratory (APL)
4.6","Laurel, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1942,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
13,Research Engineer- AWS AI,$86k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"· 4+ years of professional software development experience
· 3+ years of programming experience with at least one modern language such as Java, C++, or C# including object-oriented design
· 2+ years of experience contributing to the architecture and design (architecture, design patterns, reliability and scaling) of new and current systems
· Graduate degree (MS or PhD) in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics or Physics with specialization in speech recognition, natural language processing, machine translation, time series analysis, signal processing, or machine learning.
· 3+ years of related work experience OR a PhD
· Strong development skills in programming languages such as C/C++, Python, Java or Perl.

Research Engineer, Natural Language Processing (NLP) - Amazon AI
Come and be part of the Amazon Artificial Intelligence (AI) team! AWS is building speech and language solutions to serve the needs of customers around the world. We’re working hard, having fun, and making history - come join us!
Amazon AI team is looking for a Research Engineer to join our science and data engineering team in the area of speech and Natural Language Processing (NLP). In this role, you will be responsible for translating business and functional requirements into concrete deliverables with the design, development, testing, and deployment of highly scalable distributed services. You will also partner with scientists and other engineers to help invent, implement, and connect sophisticated algorithms to our cloud based engines. Prior domain knowledge including AI, ML, NLP, and NLU is a preferred, though not required. However, strong motivation to learn ML, AI and NLU is critical for successful candidates. Candidates should also be very agile in developing flexible software with respect to scientific, experimentation methods and usage patterns. Additional responsibilities include:

·
· Designing, developing and maintaining core system features, services and engines
·
· Helping define product features, drive the system architecture, and spearhead the best practices that enable a quality product
·
· Working with scientists and other engineers to investigate design approaches, prototype new technology, and evaluate technical feasibility

· Industry experience as a Machine Learning Engineer or related work experience (e.g., Software Engineer, Business Intelligence Engineer, Data Scientist) with a track record of manipulating, processing, and extracting insights from large datasets.
· Knowledge of or experience in building production quality and large scale deployment of applications related to natural language processing and machine learning.
· Basic understanding of Deep Learning
· Experience with at least one of the modern distributed ML frameworks such as TensorFlow, PyTorch, MxNet
· Comfortable working in a fast paced, highly collaborative, dynamic work environment
· Experience with AWS technology stack
Amazon.com is an Equal Opportunity-Affirmative Action Employer – Minority / Female / Disability / Veteran / Gender Identity / Sexual Orientation.",3.9,"Amazon.com Services LLC
3.9","East Palo Alto, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
14,"Software Engineer, Data",$59k-$124k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Overview:
Age of Learning is a leading education technology innovator based in Glendale, California, with a talented team of more than 600 individuals comprised of nationally-renowned educators, curriculum experts, developers, artists, writers, designers, engineers, producers, product managers, analysts and marketing experts! Together we develop engaging, effective digital learning technology and content to help children build a strong academic foundation for lifelong success.
Our flagship product ABCmouse.com Early Learning Academy® is a comprehensive online curriculum and the #1 digital learning product for young children. To-date, more than 30 million children worldwide have completed over 7 billion Learning Activities on ABCmouse. We recently launched Adventure Academy, the first massively multiplayer online (MMO) game designed specifically to help elementary- and middle-school-aged children learn. It features thousands of engaging Learning Activities—including minigames, books, original animated and live action series, and more—in a fun and safe virtual world. Other Age of Learning programs include immersive English language learning products for children in China and Japan; ReadingIQ, a digital library and literacy platform; and a groundbreaking personalized, adaptive digital learning system that individualizes math instruction for every child through AI-driven technology.

We are committed to helping all children succeed. We provide our educational programs at no cost to teachers, Head Start programs, public libraries, and other community organizations, and have served millions of children through these initiatives. We recently established the Age of Learning Foundation to expand this work globally.
As we expand our global reach and increase the educational impact of our programs, we’re looking for passionate, ambitious, and collaborative leaders to become a part of our growing team.


Summary:
We are seeking a full-time in-house Software Engineer to join our Data Engineering team. This person will be helping us develop high performance, high throughput services using modern technologies and techniques by leveraging their system-spanning architectural experience.
Responsibilities:
Design, develop, test, implement, document and support Data & Analytics systems which adhere to software engineering best practices
Be responsive and solution oriented in identifying and resolving operational issues
Ensure testing and validation mechanisms are in place so that data transformations are verified, complete, documented and meet SLAs
Execute projects on tight deadlines in a fast-paced matrixed organization collaborating with multiple product engineering teams
Advocate and participate in Agile/Scrum practice to ensure process health
Required Qualifications:
Approximately 4-7 years of professional data engineering experience
Able to leverage abstraction to solve complex problems
Experience designing and building scalable data systems
Proficient DevOps skills (preference for AWS experience)
Strong SQL skills
Knows dimensional modeling for data warehousing
Fluent in a general-purpose programming language (preference for Python)
Understands how to leverage both functional and object-oriented programming
Great at data mining
Exposure to Agile workflows
Advanced communication skills (both written and oral)
Good time management skills
Can work iteratively, defining requirements as needed
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with DBT
Experience with columnar data formats
Experience with Snowflake
Experience with ML pipelines
Experience with A/B Testing and related optimization across desktop and mobile
Experience working in Educational Technology companies and competitive landscape
We Provide:
Medical, Dental, Vision + 401k
Highly competitive PTO policy
Casual Dress Code
Snacks + Drinks (Coca Cola Freestyle Machine)
Gaming room including an Arcade (2,000+ games)
Frequent team and company outings
Limitless opportunities for professional growth!",3.1,"Age of Learning
3.1","Glendale, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,K-12 Education,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
15,Machine Learning Engineer,$102k-$177k (Glassdoor Est.),"Responsibilities *
Develop features and models to improve the capabilities of systems that use machine learning.
Scale up models, build training datasets and tune parameters to improve system performance.
Build software that improves your rate of experimentation and helps you make better decisions about what to try next.
Build analysis tools and simulations to understand the performance of complex systems. - Conduct original research to solve hard problems applying machine learning in new areas - Work with the team to deploy models for a mission critical application.
Come up with Machine Learning roadmap and be responsible for its execution.
Improve current models
Integrate Machine Learning projects with Knightscope Security Operations Center (KSOC).
Provide technical guidance in Machine Learning experiments and projects.
Take end-to-end ownership of Machine Learning systems.
Identify new opportunities to apply Machine Learning to different parts of the Knightscope offering.
Stay up-to-date with new technology innovation. Introduce what would be beneficial for the Company to continue to be the market leader in security.
Qualifications *
PhD/MS/BS in Computer Science.
5+ years professional work experience with Machine Learning.
Deep understanding of the mathematical foundations of Machine Learning algorithms.
Demonstrated expertise of working hands-on in analyzing and modeling large data sets.
Ability to quickly prototype new ideas and use creative approaches to solve complex problems
Experience with cloud (Amazon AWS, MS Azure, etc.) as well as embedded environments (NVIDIA Jetson, Raspberry Pi, etc.).
Hands-on experience with deep learning frameworks: TensorFlow, Keras, Pytorch, Caffe, etc.
Experience with Machine learning libraries such as scikit-learn, numpy, scipy, pandas, PIL, OpenCL.
Python experience.
Ability to collaborate closely with cross functional teams
Excellent written and oral communication skills.
Self-motivated and self-starter
Bonus Points*
Experience in a startup environment
Location*
Remote Work-from-Home (in the U.S.) Flexibility Available
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex or national origin.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $130,000.00 - $150,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Machine Learning: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
Do you require visa sponsorship to work in the U.S.?
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.7,"Knightscope, Inc.
2.7","Mountain View, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
16,Machine Learning Software Engineer – Compilers,$89k-$150k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company:
Qualcomm Technologies, Inc.
Job Area:
Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Machine Learning Engineering
Job Overview:


Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in.

AI is moving from cloud to the edge devices. QUALCOMM, as the world's leading mobile computing platform provider, is committed to enable the wide deployment of intelligent solutions on all possible devices. Be a part of our Deep Learning research project in Corporate R&D, where you will be involved and participate in building best-in-class solutions and tools needed to enable state-of-the-art technologies for next generation mobile/embedded machine learning platforms for smart phones, autonomous vehicles, robotics and IOT devices. In this role, you will work in a dynamic research environment, be part of a multi-disciplinary team of researchers and software developers, collaborate with internal teams, work with popular neural network frameworks, and understand the architecture of Qualcomms SOC compute and ML HW accelerators. You will design, develop & test software for machine learning compilers, tools and frameworks that enable models to efficiently run on all edge devices. The successful applicant should have a strong software background, and passion to work on neural network frameworks/libraries.

Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's, Computer Engineering and/or Computer Science and/or Electrical Engineering
5+ years of Software Engineering experience.
Extensive programming experience using C/C++ & Python.
Hands-on experience with code generation implementation/optimization leveraging compiler frameworks such as LLVM, GCC, or machine learning compilers such as TVM, Glow, XLA or TensorFlow.
Preferred Qualifications
Strong object oriented design and development skills.
Knowledge of neural networks, with hands-on experience using ML frameworks such as TensorFlow or PyTorch
Experience with TDD development solutions like GoogleTest etc.
Experience with Source Code and Configuration management tools, such as Git
Strong debugging and analysis skills, for root causing complex issues
Knowledge of Convolutional Neural Networks (CNNs), RNN/LSTMs
Familiarity with any of the deep learning compiler frameworks TVM, Glow or XLA
Experience with compiler frameworks such as LLVM or GCC
Knowledge Qualcomm Hexagon DSP is a plus
Experience developing embedded software, preferably on-device ML
Previous experience working in an Agile environment, and collaborating with multi-disciplinary teams
Applicants: If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, please call Qualcomm’s toll-free number found here for assistance. Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations, upon request, to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Qualcomm. Staffing and recruiting agencies and individuals being represented by an agency are not authorized to use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes, and any such submissions will be considered unsolicited. Qualcomm does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Qualcomm employees or any other company location. Qualcomm is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.

EEO Employer: Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer; all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or any other protected classification.",4.0,"Qualcomm
4.0","San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
17,Senior Data Engineer,$54k-$100k (Glassdoor Est.),"*JOB DESCRIPTION - SENIOR DATA ENGINEER* ClearOne Advantage is a fast-growing company that is aggressively hiring due to increased business. We are always improving our marketing, culture and technology to provide our employees with the best work atmosphere and our customers with excellent customer service. COA’s proprietary software is tailored to our industry and allows the client to receive the best service possible. We are seeking a Senior Data Engineer who can develop and maintain COA’s data environment, including data warehousing, data ingestion, ETL/ELT, data exchange, data lineage, and data quality. This role will interact daily with our Data Analytics/Data Science, Finance, Operations, DBAs, Site Reliability, and DevOps teams. Ideal candidate will be smart, passionate about data and eager to continually grow. If you are looking to work in a team environment, a place where you are more a name than a number, where you interact with leadership daily, then please send your resume for review! *Perks: * * For Baltimore candidates - great location, right on the water in the Canton Crossing Tower * Casual work environment and remote flexibility * Room for advancement *JOB REQUIREMENTS**Job Duties: * * Design and implement data warehouse solutions (schema design, partitioning, data ingestion, security, encryption, scrubbing, optimization, etc.) * Design and implement data exchange solutions with partners and other third parties (secure data integration, file integrity, data ingestion, data quality, file retention, etc.) * Design and implement data streaming solutions (clickstream, phone, third party services) for real-time/near-time ingestion into the data warehouse * Establish programmatic tasks and perform unit tests of code and solutions * Interface and consume application APIs for batch data ingestion * Work with Data Science group to design, implement, and optimize analytic solutions * Work with other departments on reporting design and efficiency * Follow corporate and team standards for design, security, efficiency, application logging, monitoring/alerting, and documentation * Triage and fix production application issues * Stay abreast of new technologies and practices to further enhance team capabilities and own skills * Participate in on-call rotation to support new and existing products *Qualifications: * * 4+ years hands-on experience in Application Development * 2+ years operating in an Agile environment * 3+ years hands-on experience with Microsoft® SQL Server, including using indexes, stored procedures, views, and triggers * 3+ years hands-on experience with ETL/ELT tools (Five Tran, Informatica, Switch, SSIS, etc.) * 2+ years hands-on experience with Business Intelligence tools (Tableau, Looker, Microstrategy, Brio, etc.) * 1+ years working with Snowflake, AWS Redshift, or other commercially scaled cloud data warehouse provider * 1+ years working in Amazon Web Services (AWS) or other cloud environment * Awareness of analytics tools (R, SPSS, SAS, etc.), machine learning (Jupyter, etc.), artificial intelligence * Working knowledge of encryption protocols and data scrubbing methods * Working knowledge of data streaming tools and methods for real-time/near-time data availability * Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field / equivalent experience * Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, rapid growth environment * Ability to solve problems and learn business rules and processes * Ability to demonstrate strategic, data-driven thinking combined with efficient implementation * Ability to communicate clearly and effectively to both technical peers and business customers * Ability work on a team as well as complete projects and tasks individually * Hands-on, self-starter with a positive attitude and strong work ethic * Authorized to work on US. At this time, ClearOne cannot offer sponsorship. *Technical Skills: * * Required – Microsoft SQL Server 2016-2019, T-SQL, SSIS, SSRS, SSAS, Snowflake, Fivetran, Python, SFTP, Tableau, Amazon Web Services, JSON, GitHub * Preferred – MongoDB, NewRelic, JavaScript, .NET Core 3.1, Confluent, Kafka, R, Jupyter AAP/EEO Statement: Clear One Advantage provides equal employment opportunity to all employees and job seekers without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, disability, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, veteran status, or any other protected characteristic under federal, state or local laws. Job Type: Full-time Pay: $95,000.00 - $140,000.00 per year Benefits: * 401(k) * Dental insurance * Flexible schedule * Health insurance * Paid time off * Referral program * Vision insurance Schedule: * Monday to Friday Supplemental Pay: * Bonus pay Experience: * Microsoft SQL Server: 4 years (Required) * Data Warehouse: 4 years (Required) * Application Development: 4 years (Required) * ETL (Extract Transform Load): 3 years (Required) Work authorization: * United States (Required) Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available: * No: Not providing sponsorship for this job Company's website: * www.clearoneadvantage.com Work Remotely: * Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"ClearOne Advantage
4.4","Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
18,"Senior Software Engineer, EvalML",$74k-$148k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Alteryx

Alteryx develops software for data preparation and analysis, including a number of server solutions for model deployment, collaborative work on data, and scheduling of automatic data processing. We're revolutionizing data analytics by providing a complete end to end, self-service platform that allows users to get from business questions to business answers at incredible speeds. Why work for just any analytics company?

At Alteryx, we are explorers, dreamers and innovators. We're on a journey to build the best analytics platform in the world, but we can't do it without people like you leading the way. We want Alteryx to be recognized as much for our dynamic work culture as for our products.

About Alteryx Innovation Labs

The Innovation Labs office, Alteryx's first office presence in Boston, was started earlier this year by the acquisition of MIT-spinout Feature Labs. This rapidly growing team combines the excitement of being part of a fast-paced, innovative startup with the resources, market penetration, and wisdom of a data analytics market leader. Our goal is to turbo-charge machine learning and data science efforts on the Alteryx platform, and to enable anyone to solve dynamic problems. We are working on high-impact, high-visibility projects, and we’re looking for collaborative and knowledge-hungry teammates who want to join us as we work to democratize machine learning.

Position Overview

As a Senior Software Engineer on the AutoML team, you’ll be directly responsible for building a core machine learning library which powers Alteryx’s current and future products. You should be comfortable with the challenges of engineering systems for machine learning technologies, adept at software design and implementation, and readily able to solve complex challenges with mathematical dependencies.

Responsibilities
Maintain and improve the quality and performance of the AutomML package
Design, build and validate new machine learning pipelines
Author new features, from conception and design to implementation and testing
Integrate AutoML with other products and services
Promote a culture of rigorous software development practice and high quality standards
Be part of a dynamic, friendly and ambitious team with technical influence throughout Alteryx and beyond
***The company will not provide sponsorship for work visas or other employment authorization for this position***

Required Qualifications
Minimum 3 years experience as a software engineer
Experience writing production-quality code in Python
Experience with a broad variety of machine learning algorithms
Understanding of the math which powers machine learning and data analysis in general
Experience with data-related Python tools like NumPy, SciPy, Pandas, Scikit-learn, and Dask
Experience with debugging complex software issues and mathematical systems
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with AutoML algorithms and products
Experience with performance testing machine learning systems
Experience with API design
Experience building systems for distributed computation
Benefits & Perks
100% company-paid medical, dental, and vision for associates
Company matched 401(k)
Associate stock purchase plan
Paid time off: 3 weeks’ vacation, 5 sick days, 9 holidays, 3 floating holidays, and 20 hours volunteer time
100% paid parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Wellness programs with up to $300 fitness reimbursement annually
Collaborative offices stocked with healthy snacks and drinks
Office events, catered lunches, and happy hours
#LI-JE1",3.6,"Alteryx
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
19,Senior Data Scientist,-1,"Senior Data Scientist
Location/City: Any US location (offices in Atlanta, GA and Playa Vista, CA)

Responsibilities
We are looking for a sharp, highly-motivated Senior Data Scientist to join our team. This is a high-impact role that will leverage data & analytics to derive insights from our Members’ data and make recommendations to help improve their financial wellbeing. You will collaborate with product, and engineering as well as executive stakeholders to create analytical solutions to help achieve business goals. An ideal candidate is an individual who has a deep background in statistics, analysis, experiment design, and can bring those skills to bear in a start-up environment. A strong understanding and hands-on ability with data science technology and infrastructure is important as well.
As the Senior Data Scientist, you will:
Work with large volumes of bank transactions to create proprietary intelligence about the nature of employment and earnings for our Members
Help build out our job recommendation engine to aid our Members in finding new or additional work to increase their income
Help drive a data-first culture where data is understood and leveraged in decision making
Collaborate with the data science team and CDO to define the technical strategy for Steady’s data science ecosystem
Develop and codify processes and best practices for modeling, testing, and analytics
Effectively balance short term delivery with long term direction and value
Advocate for data science innovation and increased contribution to Steady’s mission

Skills & Requirements
Advanced degree and relevant experience (MS + 5 years, PhD + 3 years) in statistics, mathematics, computer science, or similar field
Demonstrated experience creating production ML pipelines (training, scoring, leveraging in real-time systems)
Expert knowledge of modern machine learning algorithms (regression, classification, random forests, clustering, optimization, etc.) and statistical inference
Experience with bank or credit card transaction data preferred
Experience with NLP and textual data analysis is a plus
Demonstrated experience of efficient manipulation and storage of large datasets
Hands on experience and expertise with SQL, Spark, Python (preferred) or R
Experience with machine learning platforms Sagemaker/Databricks a plus
Strong data visualization skills (experience with Tableau preferred)
Familiarity and experience with the AWS data ecosystem (S3, AWS Glue, EMR, etc.)
Excellent verbal and written communication skills with the ability to interact at all levels of the organization
Comfortable working with distributed teams across multiple offices and timezones
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial, high-energy environment


Benefits
We value our Steady Team Members and are committed to their success. We are located in downtown Atlanta near MARTA, as well as in Playa Vista CA. We offer competitive compensation packages and a 100% company-paid benefits package including medical, dental, and vision. Steady is a relaxed, casual work environment with flexible hours and lunch provided once weekly in addition to a weekly meal stipend. We also offer a generous PTO plan, 401K, and future growth opportunities within the company. We strive to maintain a positive and fun environment for our employees where people can learn and grow with the company.
About Steady
Steady is a mission-driven business that helps people earn more. Through the free Steady app users can build & track income, networks, and buying power – allowing them to augment retirement savings, work around childcare responsibilities, pay down debt, save for purchases, and supplement their income from primary employers, while limiting their income volatility and better positioning themselves for access to a sustainable financial services ecosystem.
Every Steady member will build something different. We celebrate those who take the initiative to create a path that works for them. Whatever that looks like, Steady is there to support it, providing a stable foundation that allows people to build financial success over a lifetime.

Mission: Steady turns the tables by putting workers back in charge of their financial future with an income-building platform that creates financial stability and helps its users to take charge of their future.

For more information, visit us at www.steadyapp.com or on Twitter @TheSteadyApp.

Steady, Platform Inc. (Steady) is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer – All qualified applicants/employees will receive consideration for employment without regard to that individual’s age, race, color, religion or creed, national origin or ancestry, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, physical or mental disability, veteran status, genetic information, ethnicity, citizenship, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Statement to ALL Third-Party Agencies and Similar Organizations: Steady accepts resumes only from agencies with which we formally engage their services. Please do not forward resumes to our applicant tracking system, Steady employees, Steady hiring manager, or send to any Steady facility. Steady is not responsible for any fees or charges associated with unsolicited resumes.",4.0,"Steady
4.0","Los Angeles, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
20,Marine Systems Field Engineer,-1,"Sea Machines is a fast-growing startup specializing in autonomous technology for marine vessels. The world’s oceans convey 90% of global commerce. We’re applying practical A.I. and machine learning to disrupt the massive maritime transportation market. Our tech provides ships and workboats the intelligence to work remotely, increases safety for maritime crews, and radically improves operator productivity.

We’re recruiting for an experienced customer-facing, marine systems field engineer to join our team. You’ll travel to customer and dealer sites to coordinate Sea Machines product deployment and service on customer vessels. You have demonstrated aptitude with marine vessel controls, electronics and mechanical systems. You have solid experience installing and commissioning complex hardware/software products and have excellent communications skills. You’re hands-on, innovative and passionate about new technology.

Sea Machines is funded by industry-leading technology investors and we’ve introduced our first commercial product, the Sea Machines 300. We’re located on the East Boston waterfront at Jeffries Point, steps away from the Maverick T station and Boston Harbor water taxis.
Responsibilities*
Coordinate installation and commissioning of Sea Machines products in customer marine vessels worldwide working with our dealer network
Monitor Sea Machines product performance in customer fleets
Respond to customer support inquiries and provide timely resolution of customer field issues
Maintain regular communications and reporting of any field issue to the operations and technology teams
Provide input to product documentation including installation, service and user manuals
Requirements and Skills*
Must be a U.S. citizen or Permanent resident/Green card holder
You’ve done this before – you have 7+ years of installation and service experience for complex hardware/software technology products
*A background in supporting marine systems, controls, PLCs and electronics is required.*
Foster a customer support culture based on execution, quality and responsiveness
Project professionalism, confidence and competence in communications and interactions with customers, partners, teams and management
Ability to work collaboratively across departmental functions
Significant travel is required for this position
Minimum of an Bachelor’s degree in Engineering Technology, Marine Engineering, Operations or a related discipline is required
Marine certifications or licenses are a plus - please list when applying
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Experience:
maritime or autonomous vehicle product domain: 7 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Required travel:
50% (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.1,"Sea Machines Robotics Inc.
4.1","Boston, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Shipping,Transportation & Logistics,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
21,FPGA Engineer,-1,"FPGA Engineer

US Citizenship Required

Expedition Technology, Inc., in Herndon, VA is seeking an experienced FPGA Engineer who will work as part of a research, design, test, and evaluation team. Our successful candidate will provide FPGA design and development support for machine-learning and non-machine learning R&D programs within the Department of Defense and the Intelligence Community. Work will be done at our corporate headquarters in Herndon, VA.

Position Responsibilities:

FPGA design and development including logic development, simulation, synthesis, testing, and timing closure using VHDL and associated modeling tools
Design and implement system-on-chip solutions that use embedded ARM processors such as Zynq Ultrascale DDR memories, fast serial interfaces such as JESD-204B, 1G/10G Ethernet interfaces
Develop FPGA based systems particularly using Xilinx Series 7 FPGAs (Virtex and Zynq Ultrascale)
Provide digital board design including high speed signal layout as required
Provide technical documentation including requirements test reporting, timing diagrams, block diagrams and detailed descriptions

Qualification Requirements

United States Citizenship with the ability to obtain and maintain a US Government-issued security clearance of Top Secret or higher.
Bachelor of Science in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related field
5+ years of FPGA based development
Strong background and experiences with Xilinx, Linux, Next Generation SDR, and JAVA Tools
Experience with least one scripted language (Python or MATLAB)
Knowledge of RF theory, FPGA based signal processing and other standard IP cores
Knowledge of JTAG and Integrated Logic Analyzer for in system debug
Familiar with abstract level research requirements, architect, and implement in an FPGA.
Familiar with C/C++ software development, IDE development tools
Familiar with signal generators, oscilloscopes and spectrum analyzers
Familiar with Software Defined Radios (SDR) and GNU Radio
Familiar with high speed data transit through FPGA
Familiar with embedded Linux platforms
Ability to effectively communicate orally and in writing

About Us
Expedition Technology (EXP) is an employee-owned defense and aerospace technology small business that has become a market leader in developing software applications running advanced machine learning algorithms for the DOD and Intelligence Communities. We offer a collaborative team-based culture, a people-first mentality and a focus on cutting edge solutions.

We offer self-directed, company-paid, medical, dental and vision benefits. Additionally, our team enjoys a 401k with up to 12% company match, equity shares, paid holidays, paid time off, tuition reimbursement programs and a student loan repayment option. Most importantly, we offer an environment where we are encouraged to push boundaries, take risks and enjoy the rewards.

EXP is proud that our dynamic and collaborative culture along with our generous benefits package allowed us to earn a spots on the 2019 and the 2020 Washington Business Journal's Best Places to Work List.

If you are interested in seeing for yourself why our employees' voices made us a Best Place to Work, we'd love to talk with you.

EXP is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer that believes a diverse range of talent creates an environment that fuels creativity and innovation. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, national origin, genetic information or protected veteran status.

Powered by JazzHR

m6QhjoDDuT",5.0,"Expedition Technology, Inc.
5.0","Herndon, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
22,Geospatial Programmer/Data Scientist,$79k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Maxar is looking for a Geospatial Programmer/Data Scientist join our team in Northern VA. We use quick iteration and regular feedback to the prototype for our government customers before ultimately discovering the perfect fit. We embed our Geospatial Programmers with analytic teams in order to create custom-tailored web apps.

Life with Us
Project: Were improving upon models that use Artificial Intelligence / Machine Learning (AI/ML) to search for and identify objects. You would be the leader in this effort to design a scalable cloud-based solution and turn it into a real-world solution.

Career: Were very serious about professional development and continuing education. We offer everyone the opportunity to define their own career trajectory. Our group has some amazing resources at its disposal specifically for this purpose. You will work with your direct supervisor, and/or a mentor, to set appropriate goals and design a plan to help you make consistent progress.

Day-to-day with your colleagues:
Youll be developing and enhancing a geospatial app and the supporting infrastructure. This app is used to facilitate greater workforce performance by:

Building and training Deep Learning models to accurately identify specified objects.

Accessing large and various data sets

Working with multiple mission partners to identify and evaluate data sources.

We work in a very Lean-Agile environment without the overhead associated with traditional Scrum. Weve eliminated unnecessary development meetings and we love it!

We work together with our govt. stakeholders in their spaces in a very free-flowing and technology-forward environment.

Minimum Requirements:
Must be a US Citizen with a current/active TS/SCI clearance with Polygraph

Bachelor's degree in a related field, e.g. Computer Science, Systems Engineering, etc.

8 years of relevant experience

Recent experience with some of the following technologies:
AWS: EC2, S3, RDS, Lambda, Cloudfront

Programming and Data Science Tools: Python or Java & experience using PyTorch, TensorFlow, or similar Machine Learning packages

Experience building and training ML computer vision models, classification or object detection

Understanding of methods for labeling training data for Machine Learning models

Experience in data engineering and methods to handle large quantities of data for Machine Learning

Linux Terminal

Preferred Skills:
Willingness to learn new tasks and tools

Experience in Continuous Integration/Continuous Delivery (CI/CD) Pipeline techniques and tools

Experience in building and publishing anaconda packages

Experience performing AI/ML projects in a cloud environment

Experience in model deployment for enterprise applications

Experience leading other developers

Strong interpersonal skills.

Exposure to GIS technologies, e.g. PostGIS, Esri ArcGIS Enterprise

#cjpost",3.4,"Maxar Technologies
3.4","Chantilly, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
23,Senior Data Scientist,$116k-$184k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Recursion, our mission is to decode biology to radically improve lives. To accomplish this bold goal, we have already generated one of the largest biological datasets in existence in our own labs— tens of billions of images of cells under millions of different biological and chemical perturbations.

With treatments for hundreds of diseases in our sights, Recursion has constructed a world-class team of specialists in biology, drug discovery, automation, engineering, management, and data science that work side by side. Our data science team is no less diverse. We bring together domain expertise in computer science, physics, biology, mathematics, applied statistics, and more. Together, we analyze experimental results, develop best-practice analytical methods for a field that has none, and build the computational tooling required to fuel Recursion's drug-discovery engine.

HOW YOU'LL CONTRIBUTE:

You will help us accomplish all of this by applying your domain expertise, technical experience, and years working on a data science team to deliver scalable solutions that immediately impact decisions— in whatever area that expertise may be:
Biologists just generated a novel dataset and need help developing a new analytical approach.
Our Chemistry team needs a new tool to register and recommend molecules with specific properties from an X-million compound registry.
Our analysis toolkit needs to level-up to support the growing needs of the company.
A production ML model is underperforming on new data, and needs both a redesign and additional experimental data to support the desired objectives.
You will identify and then own projects that suit your expertise— meaning conception, planning, development, implementation, and delivery— with the support of whatever other data science and cross-team expertise is required.

THE EXPERIENCE YOU'LL NEED:
Minimum of 4 years in industry setting on a data science team
Experience working with production repositories and developing deployable data-science products.
High fluency with the Python data stack (pandas, sklearn, etc).
Professional experience in project leadership and team mentorship
Curiosity and the professional skill-set to excel in an open, highly collaborative environment.
A track record of outstanding past projects, publications, or presentations.
NICE TO HAVE:
Experience developing computational analysis for imaging-based biological datasets or bioinformatics for sequencing-based datasets.
Code you can share. Send a link along with your email.
THE BENEFITS/PERKS YOU'LL ENJOY
100% Coverage of health, vision, and dental insurance premiums
401(k) with generous matching (immediate vesting)
Stock option grants
Two one-week paid company closures (summer and winter)
Flexible vacation/sick leave
Onsite daycare facility*
Commuter benefit and vehicle parking to ease your commute*
Complimentary chef-prepared lunches and well-stocked snack bars*
Generous paid parental leave (including adoptive)
Fully-paid gym membership to Metro Fitness, located just feet away from our headquarters*
One-of-a-kind 100,000 square foot headquarters complete with a 70-foot climbing wall, showers, lockers, and bike parking*
*Subject to change during the COVID-19 pandemic

More About Us

Recursion is a digital biology company industrializing drug discovery. Recursion does this by combining automation, artificial intelligence, machine learning, in vivo validation capabilities and a highly cross-functional team to discover novel medicines that expand our collective understanding of biology. Recursion's rich, relatable database of over 4 petabytes of biological images generated in-house on the company's robotics platform enables advanced machine learning approaches to reveal drug candidates, mechanisms of action, novel chemistry, and potential toxicity, with the eventual goal of decoding biology and advancing new therapeutics that radically improve people's lives. Recursion is proudly headquartered in Salt Lake City.

Check out what it is like to work at Recursion here

Recursion is an equal opportunity employer and complies with all applicable federal, state, and local fair employment practices laws. Recursion strictly prohibits and does not tolerate discrimination against applicants because of race, color, religion, creed, national origin or ancestry, ethnicity, sex, pregnancy, gender (including gender nonconformity and status as a transgender individual), age, physical or mental disability, citizenship, past, current, or prospective service in the uniformed services, or any other characteristic protected under applicable federal, state, or local law.",4.6,"Recursion Pharmaceuticals
4.6","Salt Lake City, UT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
24,Principal Software Engineer,$108k-$211k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Pindrop engineering team solves tough problems and invents new ways to battle fraud using big data and machine learning in the cloud. We are looking for a Principal Backend Software Engineer to join the Data Analytics team as we continue to develop new ways to fight fraud and improve security in voice channels.

The team is responsible for services that process billions of non-audio data events and contribute to our fraud detection and authentication capabilities. Key responsibilities include:
Designing, developing, testing, deploying, and monitoring high-performance, scalable APIs consumed by both cloud and on premise clients
Working with research scientists to design, develop, and deploy state-of-the-art machine learning models to detect fraudsters and positively identify genuine actors
Applying experience and knowledge of industry best practices to support and continuously improve the performance, efficiency, and maintainability of existing applications
what you'll do
Work with a growing team to design, develop, test, deploy, maintain and improve brand new software components and microservices
Refactor existing systems and architect new solutions
Develop applications in Golang and Python on top of a modern cloud focused platform
Maintain and manage services running in our Kubernetes platform
Develop and maintain AWS native services using products such as Kinesis, DynamoDB, and S3
Deliver production ready code from start to finish
Continuously improve service architecture
Create and maintain DataDog monitors
Review code to maintain quality with an eye towards performance, scale, and security
Work with multiple teams to implement company wide solutions
Assist in leading the full development life cycle of projects within the team
Identify and evaluate new technologies for implementation
Contribute to establishing and improving software engineering best practices
Help team members grow their technical expertise through mentoring and coaching
Be a role-model to engineers throughout the Engineering department
who you are
10+ Years of Software engineering experience
Strong expertise in multiple programming languages such Python, Go, Java or C++
Experience building Distributed and Scalable architectures
Expertise in Data Structures, Algorithms and Concurrency
Experience building microservices and RESTful APIs
Knowledge of different Data Storage technologies such as Redis, MySQL, etc.
Knowledge of Docker and container orchestration frameworks such as Kubernetes
Experience with AWS managed services such as S3, ElastiCache and DynamoDB
Experience with service monitoring solutions such as DataDog
Proven track record of providing stable and secure code in production environments
what we offer


As a part of Pindrop, you'll have a direct impact on our growing list of products and thus the future of security in the voice driven economy. We hire great people and take care of them. Here's a snapshot of benefits we offer:
Competitive salary
Paid Parental Leave
Company holidays
Paid time off
Pick your own Apple MacBook Pro
Retirement plan with 401k match
Health plans
Continued education budget (certifications, conferences, etc.)
Flex schedules
Best in class tools
Paid commuter options
Fun outings to celebrate our accomplishments as a team
All the good karma you can rack up for fighting bad guys (our conference rooms are named after the ones we've busted)
who we are


Pindrop is a company founded on research and continues to innovate new ideas to market. Our solutions are leading the way to the future of voice by establishing the standard for security, identity, and trust. Pindrop products secure the future of voice, making technology more human from the call center to IoT devices.

what we live by


Pindrop is driven by our DEPTH values. These are reflected in our goals and the base of our team's peer awards.

Act with Deliberate urgency.
Create Evangelical customers.
Passionate about the fight.
Playing for the Team.
Make Hard easy.

Pindrop is an Equal Opportunity Employer.

Here at Pindrop, it is our mission to create and maintain a diverse and inclusive work environment. As an equal opportunity employer all qualified applicants receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, sex, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetic information, disability, marital and/or veteran status.",4.0,"Pindrop
4.0","Atlanta, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
25,Data Scientist BSLEF8,$57k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"E3/Sentinel’s Homeland Security Enterprise (HSE) division is an integrated organizational entity fostering increased collaboration and synergies across the Homeland domain. HSE combines the skills and talents of over 245 (and growing) E3S employees and subcontractor staff supporting multiple components across DHS, including but not limited to: U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP), Transportation Security Administration (TSA), U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE), Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), U.S. Coast Guard (USCG), Science and Technology Directorate (S&T), Countering Weapons of Mass Destruction Office (CWMD), Federal Protective Services (FPS), and the DHS Headquarters Management Directorate. Our team provides rapid, innovative and specialized solutions that enable our HSE clients to success at meeting dynamic mission objectives.

Each day U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP) oversees the massive flow of people, capital, and products that enter and depart the United States via air, land, sea, and cyberspace. The volume and complexity of both physical and virtual border crossings require the application of “big data” solutions to promote efficient trade and travel. Further, effective “big data” solutions help CBP ensure the movement of people, capital, and products is legal, safe, and secure.
In response to this challenge, E3/Sentinel, as a trusted mission partner of CBP, seeks capable, qualified, and versatile data scientists to help lead the development and delivery of high-quality predictive modelling solutions. Successful applicants will serve as recognized subject matter experts in the application of quantitative methods, machine learning algorithms, and predictive models to address complex national and homeland security challenges. They will help our team to leverage large structured and unstructured datasets to develop and operationalize models, tools, and applications that drive optimized decision making. Project tasks include data collection, mining, data and text analytics, clustering analysis, pattern recognition and extraction, automated classification and categorization, and entity resolution to implement and enhance automated risk assessment. The products we develop provide actionable insight with real and immediate impact on the safety and security of the United States, its citizens, visitors, and economy.

Lead and perform hands-on analysis and modeling involving the creation of intervention hypotheses and experiments, assessment of data needs and available sources, determination of optimal analytical approaches, performance of exploratory data analysis, and feature generation (e.g., identification, derivation, aggregation).
Collaborate with mission stakeholders to define, frame, and scope mission challenges where big data interventions may offer important mitigations and develop robust project plans with key milestones, detailed deliverables, robust work tracking protocols, and risk mitigation strategies.
Demonstrate proficiency in extracting, cleaning, and transforming CBP transactional and mission data associated within an identified problem space to build predictive models as well as develop appropriate supporting documentation.
Leverage expert knowledge of a variety of statistical and machine learning techniques and methods to define and develop programming algorithms; train, evaluate, and deploy predictive analytics models that directly inform mission decisions.
Execute projects including those intended to identify patterns and/or anomalies in large datasets; perform automated text/data classification and categorization as well as entity recognition, resolution and extraction; and named entity matching.
Brief project management, technical design, and outcomes to both technical and non-technical audiences including senior government stakeholders throughout the model development/ project lifecycle through written as well as in-person reporting.

Bachelor’s Degree (required), Master’s or Ph.D. degree (preferred) in operations research, industrial engineering, mathematics, statistics, computer science/engineering, or other related technical fields with equivalent practical experience
Significant experience in developing machine learning models and applying advanced analytics solutions to solve complex business problems.
Proficiency with statistical software packages: SAS, SPSS Modeler, R, WEKA, or equivalent.
Experience with programming languages: R, Python, Scala, Java, SQL, or equivalent.
Experience constructing and executing queries to extract data in support of EDA and model development.
Experience with unsupervised and supervised machine learning techniques and methods.
Experience working with large-scale (e.g., terabyte and petabyte) unstructured and structured data sets and databases.
Experience performing data mining, analysis, and training set construction.
Completed CBP Background Investigation clearance (active or re-instate-able)

Experience with big data technologies (e.g., Hadoop, HIVE, HDFS, HBase, MapReduce, Spark, Kafka, Sqoop).
Proficiency with Unsupervised Machine Learning methods including Cluster Analysis (e.g., K-means, K-nearest Neighbor, Hierarchical, Deep Belief Networks, Principal Component Analysis), Segmentation, etc.
Proficiency with Supervised Machine Learning methods including Decision Trees, Support Vector Machines, Logistic Regression, Random/Rotation Forests, Categorization/Classification, Neural Nets, Bayesian Networks, etc.
Experience with pattern recognition and extraction, automated classification, categorization, and entity resolution (e.g., record linking, named-entity matching, deduplication/ disambiguation).
Experience working in a team and deploying solutions in an iterative or agile/DevOps continuous integration and delivery environment using lifecycle management methods and tools.
Experience with visualization tools and techniques (e.g., Periscope, Business Objects, D3, ggplot, Tableau, SAS Visual Analytics, PowerBI).

E3/Sentinel is an equal opportunity employer and Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (VEVRAA) federal contractor. All qualified applicants receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, or status as a qualified individual with a disability. E3/Sentinel hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled.",4.4,"E3 Federal Solutions
4.4","Alexandria, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
26,"Principal Engineer, Software",$103k-$203k (Glassdoor Est.),"Principal Engineer, Software

We’re looking for a Principal Software Engineer who is a self-starter and can learn quickly. Your job will be to help rollout new software systems by inserting directly into execution teams in order to spread and evangelize the latest and greatest technologies.

The ideal candidate has a strong background in software design, developing and managing the delivery of highly-scalable, micro-services driven cloud based systems, leveraging a combination of front end and backend technologies running in containers.

What you’ll do:

Lead, develop and inspire a team of engineers to meet initiative objectives
Help introduce new technologies to engineering teams, taking part in the training, adoption, and execution of new platforms
Work closely with other engineering teams to gain bottom-up consensus in delivering technology solutions
Full-stack hands on development
Design and communicate solutions that help software engineers to deliver to growing business needs, while thoroughly considering the systems impact
Accelerate the development process by suggesting and implementing improvements to the developer pipeline
Foster code reuse, maintainability and consistency across multiple development teams. Provide guidance on how to build reusable components
Develop a deep understanding of the system, write technical specifications, mentor development team, enforce coding standards
Drive the DevOps culture, taking quality into your hands, enabled by automated testing and continuous integration
Present technological solutions to IT leadership that communicates the value, intent, and tradeoffs of your approach
Build and foster stakeholder relationships both within your team and among others
Contribute to the department’s identity, standards, guidelines and best practices
Support the daily operations of the IT/Tech department

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field required
10+ years of hands on programming experience
8+ years of hands on programming in .NET or Java and relational databases (MS SQL, Oracle, MySQL, etc…)
3+ years developing in other backend platforms such as NodeJS, Python, PHP, etc…
3+ years working with NoSQL solutions such as MongoDB, Neo4J, Redis, Cassandra, etc…
Previous experience as a technical leader and/or leading an agile/scrum team
Proven success implementing client side MVVM frameworks such as Angular or React as well as expert proficiency with JavaScript
Experience with Secure Coding Practices and assurance that these practices are consistently followed in the development of all software products
Cloud based computing such as Azure or AWS, especially serverless compute such as Azure Functions or AWS Lambda
Distributed and asynchronous computing experience using message queues, streaming, and event based development using any of SNS, SQS, Azure Service Bus, Kinesis, Kafka, or related products
Production experience with Docker, Kubernetes and/or similar container engines and orchestration including ECS/Fargate or EKS
Advanced experience building web services/APIs using REST based API in a high transaction environment
Knowledge of API security using oAUTH or OpenID Connect
Ability to write complex SQL queries with deep knowledge of database indexing and query optimization
Strong experience with managing change control policies, software builds, deployment strategies, code reviews and software recommendations
Expert experience working with a source control tool (GIT) with strong understanding of how to automate developer workflows
Proven ability to use Design Patterns to accomplish scalable architecture
Proficiency in using architectural design utilities like Visio, ERDs, UML
Proficiency using MS PowerPoint to deliver technical and non-technical presentations
Expert level experience working in a Windows environment
Intermediate experience working in a Linux environment
Strong attention to detail and work ethic
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Excellent communication (both written and verbal) and interpersonal skills

Preferred skills:

AI, Machine Learning, and Natural Language Processing experience is a plus

LegalZoom is an Equal Opportunity Employer, dedicated to diversity.",2.9,"LegalZoom
2.9","Glendale, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
27,Senior Software Engineer,$66k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Ezoic, we're building a better internet experience with our all-in-one digital publishing platform. We are looking for motivated, fast-learning developers who are excited to build products that scale to millions of visitors every day.

At its core, our product uses artificial intelligence to learn how users interact with digital content and proactively delivers the optimal front end for every visitor to our customers' sites. We've built tools to automatically generate progressive web apps, in-depth reporting dashboards to give publishers novel insights into their users, data pipelines to process hundreds of millions of events, and tools to vastly increase throughput and effectiveness of our machine learning decisions, just to name a few. We're continuously growing, and we're looking for frontend and backend developers who love building and solving problems across the entire tech stack.

Technologies you'll work with:
Big Data: It's the backbone of everything we do. We use Redshift and MySQL to store just about everything you could imagine about a visitor's interactions with digital content.
Machine Learning: We use tensorflow, scikit-learn, Python, Golang, and state-of-the-art tools we've developed in-house to make data-driven decisions about the kinds of ads, content, and layouts to show each visitor.
Web Development: We build customer-facing dashboards, apps, and internal tools using whatever framework is best for the job, whether it's Vue.js, Angular, JS, Go or PHP. Plus, with a wide variety of digital publishers, you'll get experience working with a diverse set of web development technologies.
Cloud Computing: Our stack is built primarily upon AWS (EC2, Dynamo, RDS, Kinesis, etc.), along with other tools such as Kubernetes, Docker, and Apache Spark.
What you'll need:

5+ years of experience as a software engineer
Strong coding fundamentals: you're an expert in at least one language (e.g. Golang, Python, JavaScript, C++), and you're eager to learn more.
Web development experience (AJAX, HTML, CSS, PHP, React, Angular, etc.)
Experience with databases (PostgreSQL, Redshift, MySQL, or similar)
A drive to solve problems
Life as an Ezoic engineer:

Ezoic is an inaugural member of the Google Certified Publishing Partner Program. This means we work closely with Google to help websites optimize their ad revenue. We actually have won awards directly from Google for the artificial intelligence that we've built. Cool, right?!?

Ezoic is a technology-first company. Our CEO is a developer by trade, and our engineers are given all the tools needed to succeed. We empower our engineers to make a lot of their own decisions about both design and implementation, and encourage them to come up with new ideas to improve the application. We also aim to keep a good work-life balance, based on our philosophy that happy engineers are more productive. We want you to be working on something that you are passionate about and allow engineers to move around to keep things fresh.

While we are all working remotely now because of Covid, we have a brand new office in Carlsbad, CA, where we plan to return next year sometimes when the world goes back to normal. Every engineer works at their own quad-monitor setup on a standing desk. We pride ourselves on getting stuff done, but when you need a break, Ezoic offers great perks, including unlimited vacation time, catered lunches, snacks, flexible hours, ping pong, video games, and pool.

#ZR",4.9,"Ezoic
4.9","Carlsbad, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
28,Data Scientist,-1,"Back to search results
Previous job

Next job

JOB DESCRIPTION

A BIT ABOUT OUR DATA SCIENCE & ANALYTICS TEAM

Mars Petcare Data Science & Analytics team is core to our strategy. We’re using digital, data and customer insights to transform our business by finding answers to problems that we’ve often never asked ourselves before. Our vast data assets are being combined to build a 360° view of pets and pet owners to not only power Kinship’s businesses but also influence the next great ideas in the pet care space. This role will be key in helping us understand the power of our data, and how this translates into value for our company, our pets, and pet owners everywhere. Frequently the projects will be ambiguous, but that’s part of the fun; you will determine the best way to leverage our data to tell the right story for any given audience.

HOW YOU’LL CREATE A BETTER WORLD FOR PETS
Apply advanced analytics & data science approaches to understand and predict pet and pet owner behaviors
Collaborate with internal and external teams to ensure we focus on pet-centric product and service recommendations
Support new pet technology businesses and partners by generating actionable insights from our data assets
Develop compelling stories that provide insight into the drivers of business performance and pet/pet owner behavior
WHO WE NEED TO CHART THE FUTURE OF PET CARE

We strive to hire people who are passionate about our mission: Shaping the Future of Pet Care. For all of our Kinship roles, we look for candidates who exemplify our core values. We believe what we do is just as important as how we do it, and we aim to hire people who are:
Optimistic
Purposefully Inquisitive
Open to All
And for this role, we hope you have the following skills we require to knock it out of the dog park:
Truly inspired by, and want to live, our purpose of creating a better world for pets.
4+ years’ experience in a data science role handling varied and complex data
Varied technical experience in delivering statistical analytics, data science and insight on large-scale consumer data sets across multiple sectors, including packaged goods and retail
Hands-on experience with Python is required; Familiarity with PySpark is also desirable
Comfortable with ambiguity, with a passion for collaboration to achieve objectives
A Bachelor’s degree in quantitative field (economics, statistics, business, computer science) or equivalent experience
Passion for growing and strengthening a business using data driven approaches
Familiarity with cloud-based computing services e.g. AWS, Databricks, etc.
Enjoys explaining how technical concepts to both non-technical and technical stakeholders.
WHY JOIN US?

We offer our associates a unique opportunity to have a completely customizable career within pet care. Through Kinship you will work with and learn from a community of industry executives, pet partners, entrepreneurs, and fellow associates across our startup investment companies, outside partners, and in Mars Petcare. Our nimble and flexible approach to work allows you to make an immediate impact across businesses, while learning new skills at every stage. The diversity of our work opens doors to big opportunities and unlocks enormous potential for countless career experiences in pet care. Join us in our mission to chart the future of pet care, alongside the industry’s brightest minds.

Kinship’s offices are global, and so are our associates. We are located in NYC, San Francisco, Portland, London, Helsinki, Shanghai, and in Moscow. Many of us flex between our dog-friendly hubs and our home offices. Today, Kinship offers exceptional benefits for you, your family, and your pets, generous paid time off, exponential opportunities to build a career within pet care, and progressive reward packages. Interested? Let’s take big strides, together.",4.0,"Mars
4.0",United States,-1,10000+ Employees,1911,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
29,Data Engineer - AWS,$93k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 400 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.

If you have proven experience working with AWS in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you.

•Design and development of relational and non-relational databases, data warehouses and data lakes
oRDS
oAWS DynamoDB, AWS SimpleDB
oAmazon Redshift
oAWS DB Migration Service
•Development, monitoring and maintenance of data integration and processing tools and pipelines
oAWS Glue, AWS Data Pipeline
oAWS Data Pipeline, AWS Glue
•Design and testing of machine learning and data science tools, including the building and deployment of data models
oAmazon EMR
•Implementation of high-capacity, real-time data streaming technologies
o AWS Kinesis Analytics, AWS Lambda
•Data analysis and visualization tools
oAWS QuickSight
oAmazon Athena
•Leveraging non-database data storage alternatives to maximize performance, costs and data quality
oAWS S3
oAWS ElastiCache
oAWS CloudSearch
•Familiarity with security and security policies within AWS

bonus experience

Bachelor's Degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes

what's in it for you?

Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success as sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology and social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,"Solution Design Group
4.9","Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
30,"Software Engineer (JAVA, C/C++)",$56k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Peraton is seeking highly motivated Software Engineers to perform design, development and integration for SIGINT applications and processing systems for our Intelligence Community customer. The team member will collaborate with a talented group of Software Engineers to bring innovative software solutions and products to our end customers. There are opportunities available for work on multiple programs with varied products and end users.

Provide input into the software components of system design to include hardware/software trade-offs, software reuse, use of COTS/GOTS in place of new development and requirements analysis and synthesis from system level to individual software components. Once software development is complete, the Software Engineer will support integration of the code into the system and testing of the system. The software engineer may also travel with the team to install, test, and train the system at remote sites.

Required Skills

Five to Eight years of experience with a Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Math, Engineering with professional software engineering experience.
Development/Maintenance experience with:
Java
C/C++

Desired Skills

At least 5 years of experience in software development/engineering, including requirements analysis, software development, installation, integration, evaluation, enhancement, maintenance, testing and problem diagnosis/resolution.
Development/Maintenance experience with Java, C/C++, Python, Ruby, Bash, MySQL, Mongo, Machine Learning a plus.
Fundamental software engineering life-cycle experience. Analysis, design, development, debugging, deployment and automated testing.
Familiarity with CM/build tools such as Jenkins, Subversion, Maven, Hudson.
Experience with Agile methods, Scrum, and SharePoint.
Maintaining knowledge of industry trends and standards.
Ability to enhance and support a software application (government or commercial) deployed to production user.
Innovative thinker with good problem solving and communication skills.
Security+ or comparable DoD8570 certification a plus, but not required.
Experience with Digital Signal Processing (DSP) a plus, but not required.
Must possess a TS/SCI clearance and have the ability to obtain a Polygraph and to maintain the clearance.

SECURITY CLEARANCE:

Must possess a current TS/SCI security clearance and maintain the clearance. Having a Polygraph is strongly preferred.

We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We consider applicants without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, ancestry, ethnicity, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, marital status, veteran status, disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or membership in any other group protected by federal, state, or local law.",3.7,"Peraton
3.7","Aurora, CO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
31,Sr. Research Engineer,$70k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"A collective energy and ambition. A place where you can make a real difference.

We’re a company that genuinely cares about our people, our products, our consumers and the environment.

Our unique, informal culture champions courage, determination and collaboration. Knowing we have an open and supportive team means each of us has the freedom to take responsibility and ownership. We have a shared passion to work hard, innovate and push boundaries.

United by the belief that when we strive for growth, anything is possible. While we might not be the largest company in our industry, we believe we can have the biggest impact because: Together We Have the Power to Win.

Role Summary:

As a member of the Product Engineering group, will support the mechanical and electrical product development efforts across all the Church & Dwight bands. Will assist the team by being a project lead as well working to design and develop parts of packaging and device solutions and develop test methods and plans to determine the precise designed solutions. Will work in a manner consistent with the Church & Dwight R&D core principles of teamwork, consumer and customer focus, personal responsibility and integrity.

Responsibilities:
Be a technical project lead for cross functional technical projects
Lead the work to create design engineered solutions to innovative primary packaging
Design, Engineer, and Validate components for Medical Devices
Interface with team and key stake holders to ensure alignment of project expectations
Work with external suppliers to ensure their production equipment meets design intent
Effectively use problem solving skills to identify and assess potential problems and help to develop and implement mitigation or resolution plans and activities.
Meet timelines, manage expectations, and deliver to those expectations.
Travel to vendors and manufacturing locations for support of product activities
Provide regular technical progress updates to R&D partners and potential cross-functional groups within project team, as well as communication to upper management at key project milestones
Work on and lead cross functional teams to create manufacturable and consumer tested designs
Use principles of design thinking to create designs based on true consumer needs
Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in Mechanical Engineering, Electrical Engineering or Applied Sciences from an accredited university or college
Minimum of 7 years of applicable technical experience
Minimum of 2 years applicable project leadership experience
History of successful technical project leadership including projects that span across multiple stake holders and external suppliers
Experience working on Complex multistage projects
Experience with CAD (SolidWorks or Creo preferred), GD&T, BOMs, mechanical drawings, ECOs.
Experience in the product design, development and DFM.
Familiar with Six Sigma tools, (process capability, ANOVA, and statistical techniques) and able to design and execute product test plans utilizing Design of Experiments.
Church & Dwight is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.

For more information on our company, our brands and our culture visit us at http://www.churchdwight.com/",3.5,"Church & Dwight
3.5","Princeton, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1846,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
32,Data Scientist,$57k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"We Are Hiring

Data Scientist

Full-Time, Days

Ascension Via Christi Health - Wichita, KS

Schedule: 8AM-5PM, Monday-Friday

Why Join Ascension?

Ascension Via Christi health has a rich history of serving the people of Kansas. Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, especially to those most in need. We provide care in 22 cities; and employ approximately 6,300 employees.

Working for Ascension is more than just a job. It’s a career where your talent and passion for delivering quality healthcare can make a difference for patients, team members, and the community. Ascension associates are leaders who follow their heart. We give, grow, connect and provide care; together as a team we are committed to our mission of serving the poor and vulnerable.

Our benefits and culture are two aspects of Via Christi that we feel set us apart. We offer tuition reimbursement that is available to both part-time and full-time associates in any position. In Wichita, we also offer child care for day shift workers through our Child Development Center. We also offer a unique program, Breaking Bread, that allows employees to join senior leaders for a meal and conversation about what is working well and ways we can work together to improve. It’s one small way we give employees a voice and work together to offer the best care possible for our patients.

Other reasons to join the Ascension Via Christi team include:
Medical, Dental, Vision, Retirement, PTO, and more!
Tuition Reimbursement
As a non-profit organization, we are a qualified employer for the Public Loan Forgiveness Program
Opportunities to impact your local community
What You Will Do

We are looking for someone who:
Has strong critical thinking skills, decisive judgment, and the ability to work with minimal supervision.
Is able to work in a stressful environment.
Has experience with complex data analysis and modeling.
Has experience designing, developing, and implementing data warehouse architecture.
Has competencies in data transformation and normalization.
Has expert level programming experience (SQL, Python) preferred.
Has the ability to research, interpret, clearly communicate, and apply researched information.
Has knowledge of medical terminology, claims, and coding a plus.
Responsibilities:
Integrates data from multiple sources and supports/performs complex statistical data analysis including multivariate statistical analysis, multilevel modeling, dyadic analysis and/or coarsened exact matching analysis.
Analyzes complex business and competitive issues and discerns the implications for systems support. Identifies, defines, directs and preforms project issue analysis to resolve issues, including analysis of technical and economic feasibility of proposed data solution.
Communicates highly technical information to numerous audiences, including senior management, the user community, and less experienced staff.
Presents data to drive business decisions.
Proposes and leads projects required to support the development of the organization's data infrastructure needs.
What You Will Need

Licenses/Certifications/Registration:

Required Credential(s):
None Required.
Education:
Diploma
High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Bachelor's degree required.
Work Experience:
3 years of experience preferred.
Equal Employment Opportunity
Via Christi Health is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) and Affirmative Action employer. Applicants receive fair and impartial consideration without regard to race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, color, religion, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, genetic data, or other legally protected status.
Please see the link below for more information.
http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf
EEO is the Law Poster Supplement
http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/ofccp_eeo_supplement_final_jrf_qa_508c.pdf

Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

Ascension Health - VIA Christi participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify link below for more information.

E-Verify (link to E-verify site)",3.4,"Ascension
3.4","Wichita, KS",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
33,Data Scientist,$69k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Type :

Full time

Type Of Hire :

Experienced (relevant combo of work and education)

Education Desired :

Bachelor's Degree

Travel Percentage :

0%

Job Description

GENERAL DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES

• Develops financial models through research and creation of new mathematical equations for the efficient pricing of complex financial products, calibration of risk models, regulatory calculation mandates and the changing demands of the market and credit events.

• Creates the prototypes and productizes the innovative software components to address current and future problems in financial risk management and risk-based pricing.

• Contributes to framework design software; models into software pattern.

• Writes code and completes programming on the unique mathematical models developed, with accuracy and consideration of system performance.

• Documents clear and concise reports of both the mathematical finance theory used and software programming implementation details; including procedures for installation and maintenance.

• Explains financial software creation and maintenance by authoring functional requirements, functional design, technical design specifications and effort estimates.

• Verifies the new and existing financial models are correct and are appropriate for their intended use.

• Understands and applies, industry standard model validation best-practice in their work and processes where appropriate.

• Performs large scale system software testing as well as the development of regression tests for all newly coded models and algorithms.

• Manages the whole product life-cycle from defining the functional requirements through development, testing and final documentation and release.

• Supports in the maintenance of released software through analysis of issues, bug fixes and direct client support where required.

• Provides advice, demonstrations, and support to clients and internal stakeholders in both pre- and post-sales processes.

• Defends, validates and assesses model choices and assumptions in high-pressure environments such as during client engagements.

• Understands the realities of model development and is able to make pragmatic and business-aware choices when trading-off sophistication and accuracy versus implementation and performance costs.

• Communicates development progress and work within a wider project managed engagement giving timely and reliable updates and advice.

• Other related duties assigned as needed.

EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS
Bachelor’s degree in Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Financial Engineering, Actuarial Science or Computer Science or the equivalent combination of education, training, or work experience is preferred.

GENERAL KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES

• Evidence of modelling techniques in previous employment and/or research experience.

• Knowledge of financial services industry

• Knowledge of end-to-end systems development life cycles, e.g., waterfall, iterative and other modern approaches to software development

• Knowledge of banking practices, regulations, and operations within assigned line(s) of business

• Proficiency in solutions design and requirements

• Outstanding verbal and written communication skills to technical and non-technical audiences of various levels in the organization, e.g., executive, management, individual contributors

• Understanding of finance and risk management

• Excellent analytical, decision-making, problem-solving, team, and time management skills

• Ability to persuade and influence others on the best approach to take

• Positive outlook, strong work ethic, and responsive to internal and external clients and contacts

• Ability to work as part of a team or alone making a strong contribution in either scenario

• Proven software engineering experience, especially in the field of financial software

• Exceptional mathematical and analytical skills

• Superior interpersonal, communication and presentation skills

• Delivery-oriented team player who takes responsibility for the team’s success and strives to continually learn and improve

• Ability to interface with all levels of employees and effectively interact with various functional areas and facilities

• Ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with employees, management, and clients

FIS JOB LEVEL DESCRIPTION

Career level professional individual contributor role. Experienced, fully qualified professional with a full understanding of their area of expertise. Works independently on problems of diverse scope. Works under general supervision with latitude for independent judgment. Determines financial modelling approaches and then codes the resulting model. Able to identify non-routine issues and routes/escalates to appropriate team member. Works on multiple concurrent projects of medium complexity. Is an active team member, contributes to complex projects to gain experience, shares ideas and suggests process improvements appropriate for level of experience. Consults with senior peers on semi-complex processes to learn through experience. Typically requires a minimum three years of experience of programming mathematical models.

Privacy Statement

FIS is committed to protecting the privacy and security of all personal information that we process in order to provide services to our clients. For specific information on how FIS protects personal information online, please see the Online Privacy Notice.

EEOC Statement

FIS is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, genetic information, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. The EEO is the Law poster is available here supplement document available here

For positions located in the US, the following conditions apply. If you are made a conditional offer of employment, you will be required to undergo a drug test. ADA Disclaimer: In developing this job description care was taken to include all competencies needed to successfully perform in this position. However, for Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) purposes, the essential functions of the job may or may not have been described for purposes of ADA reasonable accommodation. All reasonable accommodation requests will be reviewed and evaluated on a case-by-case basis.

Sourcing Model

Recruitment at FIS works primarily on a direct sourcing model; a relatively small portion of our hiring is through recruitment agencies. FIS does not accept resumes from recruitment agencies which are not on the preferred supplier list and is not responsible for any related fees for resumes submitted to job postings, our employees, or any other part of our company.",3.7,"FIS Global
3.7","Cincinnati, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1968,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
34,Machine Learning Scientists/Engineers,-1,"Machine Learning Scientists/Engineers
Company Name *NovoDynamics, Inc. *

Company Location: Ann Arbor, Michigan

Fast-growing AI company is seeking highly-qualified scientists and engineers with experience in ML
(Machine Learning), DL (Deep Learning) and Computer Vision to address real-world challenges in the
Health Care industry. If you have a successful track record in software development, knowledge of current software technologies and methodologies, and excellent communication and interpersonal skills, we want to talk with you. Experience with image processing technologies is a plus.

Desired skills:

• Experience with data noise removal, data augmentation, dataset truthing and construction
• Expertise in visualizing and manipulating large datasets
• Familiarity with Java and Python a plus
• Proficiency with a deep learning library such as Keras or deeplearning4j a plus

Responsibilities may include:

• Understanding business objectives and developing models that help to achieve them, along with metrics to track progress

• Analyzing DL algorithms that could be used to solve a given problem and ranking them by their success probability

• Exploring and visualizing data to gain an understanding of it, then identifying differences in data distribution that could affect performance when deploying the model in the real world

• Verifying data quality and/or ensuring it via data cleaning
• Defining validation strategies
• Training models and tuning hyperparameters
• Analyzing errors of the model and designing strategies to overcome them

Why work for NovoDynamics?

• Be part of a dynamic team that designs disruptive technologies for the Health Care industry
• Receive great compensation and benefits
• Work in downtown Ann Arbor near the University of Michigan campus
• Enjoy free parking, popcorn, coffee, tea and soft drinks
• Delight in an amazing work environment with interesting and engaged teammates
• Relax with generous and flexible time off
Seniority Level *
Mid-Senior level
Employment Type *
Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $90,000.00 - $170,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Relocation assistance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Location:
Ann Arbor, MI 48104 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available:
No: Not providing sponsorship for this job
Company's website:
https://www.novodynamics.com and https://www.novohealthdental.com/
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.linkedin.com/company/70143/admin/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"NovoDynamics, Inc.
4.0","Ann Arbor, MI",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
35,Sr. DATA SCIENTIST,$155k-$247k (Glassdoor Est.),"Title: Sr. Data Scientist

Company: Samsung Research America (SRA)

Lab: Visual Display Intelligence Lab

Location: Mountain View, CA

Lab Summary:

At Visual Display Intelligence lab, Samsung Research America, we operate as a start-up while leveraging the broader assets of a larger global enterprise. We do advance research and development to immensely benefit our core business verticals in the space of Ads and Marketing. Our team primarily focuses on processing huge data sets, build robust and scalable big data pipelines, conduct advanced research in implementing state-of-the-art ML and AI techniques, build data services that are both real-time and batch based. All those combined provide the best-in-class experience to our customers across consumer electronics and internet of things. Many of our engineers take pride in publications, filing A-grade patents and build robust products and services.

Position Summary:

As a Staff Software Engineer you will primarily focus on building unified Audience platform by working directly with Product Managers, Lab leaders, researchers, Big data/AI/ML engineers, brainstorm different ideas and also build POCs and propose projects that cater to the broader business needs. If there is evinced interest to invest on those projects, you could lead them to fruition. You will help design data pipelines, maintain large scale distributed systems, help manage the modern data warehousing infrastructure, analyze key metrics for decision makers to provide visual insights that will change the company direction and benefit consumers. The ideal candidate will be someone who comes from a strong analytical background that has demonstrated experience in the following areas:

Responsibilities:
Build and maintain large scale distributed systems to support the whole pipeline from data collection and training to deployment and real-time serving
Write efficient implementations of ML algorithms over CPUs & GPUs
Integrate our in-house systems with open source technologies like Kubernetes and Tensorflow
Build abstractions to automate various steps in different ML workflows
Build tools to debug, visualize and inspect various features and models
Work with the engineers who use the platform, and help them be more impactful by improving the platform
Minimum Qualifications:
Strong knowledge of Computer Science fundamentals including object-oriented design, data structures, operating system, computer networks.
(5+ years) Software development experience, ideally in Python, Scala or Java
(5+ years) Experience with MySQL, Postgres, Cassandra, Redis, Redshift, OracleDB or MongoDB
(3+ years) Microservice-oriented architectures and related OSS technologies (e.g. Kubernetes, Kafka, Celery/RabbitMQ, nginx, Redis, Airflow, etc)
(3+ years) Experience working in distributed and streaming environment, preferably using Spark, Kafka, Flink etc
(3+ years) Experience with AWS in an enterprise environment
(3+ years) CI/CD and test automation frameworks (Cypress.io, Jenkins, Appium, UIAutomation, Bazel, etc)
Preferred Qualifications:
BS, MS or PhD in Computer Science, Engineering or a related technical field
Strong communication and inter-personal skills
Experience with leading large-scale multi-engineer projects
Samsung is an EEO/Veterans/Disabled/LGBT employer. We welcome and encourage diversity as we strive to create an inclusive workplace.",3.8,"Samsung Research America
3.8","Mountain View, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1988,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
36,"Sr. Backend Engineer, Machine Learning",$130k-$198k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Globality, we're proud to embody the core values of innovation, collaboration, and trust in both our culture and product.
We're creating ground-breaking technology utilizing a world-class, AI-powered Platform that revolutionizes how businesses buy and sell services. We are an open, inclusive, and diverse organization and our employees are at the heart of the great products we create.

We've raised over $172M and are supported by an impressive group of prominent investors, including Al Gore and SoftBank Vision Fund. Our co-founders, Joel Hyatt and Lior Delgo, are seasoned entrepreneurs who bring an extensive business-building experience to our organization. Our impressive board includes Dennis Nally (former Global Chairman of PwC) and Ron Johnson (former SVP of Apple).

Role Summary:
We seek an engineer with a passion for building machine learning and data pipeline solutions to power intelligent product features at scale.

Does this sound like you?

Are you excited about separating signal from noise in web-scale datasets?

Do you enjoy building software that improves user experience by helping users reach the right conclusions?

Does your ideal work environment involve collaborating within multi-functional teams in a dynamic startup environment?

Are you motivated by directly impacting the core technologies that power a meaningful business platform?

If so, you should join our team.

What you will be doing:
Be a lead contributor to the design and implementation of our core infrastructure and data pipeline, powering our Machine Learning and NLP products. In collaboration with our data scientists and senior engineers, you'll be improving indexing logic, tuning relevancy, and optimizing performance, towards the overall goal of delivering a delightful user experience to our end-users and internal users, across a range of ML-powered products
Wrangle messy data. Real-world data, especially as found on the web, comes in all shapes and sizes, and can often be noisy. Working alongside our NLP engineers, drive solutions for cleaning noisy text, normalizing it and ensuring high-quality data through-out our ML pipeline.
What we are looking for:
You have at least 5 years of software development experience in crafting high performance, reliable and scalable production systems
You have strong engineering experience in Python, in particular in the context of ML applications, using frameworks such as pandas, nltk, Pattern, spaCy.
You have experience working with noisy textual data, and are familiar with the various text normalization methodologies that are employed to index such data effectively
Deep understanding of core computer science fundamentals and distributed systems
Bonus: You have ample experience with Information Retrieval and Web Search systems, such as Elasticsearch, ideally cloud-based deployments such as via AWS or Elastic Cloud.
We are an equal opportunity employer and a participant in the E-Verify program. We believe diversity makes teams better and that discrimination based on race, gender, or anything else is self-defeating.",3.9,"Globality, Inc.
3.9","Menlo Park, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
37,Cybersecurity DevOps Engineer,-1,"ShorePoint is a cybersecurity services firm with a focus on high-profile, high-threat private and public-sector customers who demand experience and proven security models to protect their data. We are seeking a Cybersecurity DevOps Engineer who have experience producing solutions driven by data analysis from complex and high dimensional data sets in the federal market. This is a unique opportunity to shape the growth, development and culture of an exciting and emerging company in the cybersecurity market.

Roles and Responsibilities
Provides engineering support to analyze hardware systems, hardware design, architecture, network design
Developing and building Information Technology solutions, to include installation and configuration of solutions developed through requirements provided by the customer
Actively troubleshoot any issues that arise during testing and production, limiting errors in production and expedite correction of any bugs identified in production
Ability to work through Security requirements prior to deployment of Information Technology solutions
Specifying, documenting and developing new product features, and writing automating scripts
Hands on administration, implementation and configuration of security tools to enhance the risk posture of customer networks. Prepares specifications for hardware by analyzing documented and derived system requirements
Provide Tier 2/3 support for incidents relating to security tools/solutions
Working with customer teams and supporting current tasks and activities
Participation in technical meetings with customers’ technical specialists
Other project and corporate duties as assigned
Required Skills
Possess excellent knowledge of security assessment, vulnerability management and compliance auditing capabilities along with the drive to rapidly learn the newest technologies
Previous experience using R, Matlab, Python Scikit-learn or other statistical modeling packages, with a focus on machine learning; experience with NLP a plus
Previous experience developing production systems for processing large volumes of structured and unstructured data in Java, Python or similar technology stack
Previous experience with Hadoop technology stack (Map reduce, HIVE/PIG, etc)
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Strong team player, capable of working collaboratively in customer teams
Knowledge of scripting languages such as Java, JavaScript, Perl, Ruby, Python, PHP, Groovy, Bash
Desired Skills
Knowledge of Checkpoint, Palo Alto, Cisco, Fortinet, ForcePoint, F5 Firewall appliances
Cloud Cyber strategy, engineer and deployment experience
The candidate should possess deep knowledge of Tenable’s entire product suite
Technical Writing experience for updating System Security Plan, Concept of Operations,
Privileged Users Guide, and other necessary documentation for Approval to Operate
Understanding of federal Cyber Security Guidance such as NIST SP 800-37 – Guide for
Applying the Risk Management Framework to Federal Information Systems and NIST 800-137 – Information Security Continuous Monitoring (ISCM) for Federal Information Systems and Organizations
Education Requirement
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math or other STEM discipline
Years of Experience Requirement
5-7 years of experience administering Windows, Linux and/or virtual infrastructure to include installation, configuration and maintenance of enterprise networks, databases and servers
Certification Requirement
Must have or be willing to obtain IAT Level II certifications within 6 months of hire
Location
Chantilly, VA
Security Clearance
Must posses an active TS/SCI w/Polygraph",4.5,"ShorePoint
4.5","Chantilly, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2017,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
38,US Citizen / Windows Administrator Powershell Automation / DevOps Engineer,-1,"Trewon is a competitive firm providing *enterprise-wide* *solutions* to *federal* and *commercial* *clients*. Trewon brings a sophisticated service line in IT-related solutions from *Business Intelligence, Data Analytics, Big Data, to Cloud technologies* coupled with a diverse skill set in *research* and *evaluation *to federal clients. While working in specified fields, we also understand the importance of meshing *business process* *optimization* with *solid data* and *program management*.
Company Benefits: *
Competitive salary with exceptional benefits
Medical, Dental, Vision
Simple IRA with Employer Matching
Excellent training and career development opportunities
2 Weeks Paid Vacation & Federal Holidays with 1 Week Sick Pay
Friendly, professional, stable working environment where one can grow in their career with Career Advancement assistance
Company Functions & Community Outreach Programs
*Open to 1099 Contract*
\*Signing BONUS after 6 months\**
Your future ""Windows Administrator with Python Automation / DevOps"" duties and responsibilities: *
Work Authorization/Clearance*
Clearance required: US Citizen with Department of Defense*(*DoD) Secret clearance or higher*
An interim Secret clearance is required to begin working onsite with our client, and a Secret clearance must be maintained throughout the project duration. Due to the nature of the government contract requirements and/or clearance requirements, US citizenship is required. *With nature of work involved, individuals without US Citizenship and DoD Security Clearance (Secret or above) will not qualify.*
Summary/Objective*
This is an exciting full-time opportunity to work in a fast-paced environment with a team of passionate technologists. We take an innovative approach to supporting our client, working side-by-side in an agile environment using emerging technologies. As a solution builder, you will be working to support the client’s mission and goals of building an enterprise analytics platform.

• 3+ years of experience of administration of applications in a *windows server administration* including application maintenance, patching, upgrades and troubleshooting.

• 3+ years of experience using *PowerShell, Python*, Perl or other scripting languages to automate and orchestrate technical activities including installation and administration.

• 1+ years of experience designing, documenting and developing *Continuous Integration/Continuous Delivery (CI/CD) Pipelines* for complex applications.

• 9+ years of experience in the creation of mid-to-enterprise level software systems.

• 9+ years of experience in designing, documenting and developing web-based and stand-alone software applications.

• Experience working on analytics and business intelligence platforms.

• Experience working in an Agile based environment.

• Strong technical and troubleshooting techniques.
Other skills*
Demonstrated problem solving, organizational and time management skills.
Experience in a federal government agency, community-based organization, or customer service setting.
Proven ability to plan and coordinate projects and work schedules to use efficiently work related resources and information by Government and departmental policies, procedures, and guidelines.
Sound research and analytical skills, including the ability to identify problems and formulate solutions; appropriate to current policy and communication strategies.
Proven ability to cope with and perform effectively in a demanding environment, giving close attention to detail and accuracy, while meeting tight deadlines.
Ability to continually develop and improve one’s skill and knowledge to perform effectively and adapt to change in the workplace. Development occurs through a variety of learning opportunities, seeking feedback, and individual reflection.
Making use of all personal resources at your disposal (talents, skills, energy, and time) to achieve goals.
Works effectively with others to achieve shared goals through cooperation, sharing knowledge, joint problem-solving, and celebrating success.
Familiarity with application development and usage
Clear understanding of relational database concepts
Highly organized with strong project management skills, and drive to meet organizational and departmental objectives; ability to manage projects on interrelated timelines.
Qualifications*
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed above and below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

• Participate in technical architecture solution efforts by interfacing with feature and product teams to understand business needs.

• Automate technical administration and maintenance activities within a complex technology landscape.

• Build and develop CI/CD pipelines for analytics content including data models, structures and analytics content.

• Demonstrate in-depth technical capabilities with the ability to support multiple work streams and drive assimilation of new techniques and solutions. Develop robust analytics platforms for enterprise analytics business intelligence solutions.

• Follow technology trends within the Big Data road map and inform clients how this technology will benefit the future development platform.

• Participate in team problem solving efforts and offer ideas to solve client issues
Education Required*
Bachelor’s Degree or higher – applicable major preferred (Management Information Systems, Computer Science, Business Management, Project Management, Process Engineering, Statistics/Applied Math,)
Work Environment*
This job operates in a professional office environment. This role routinely uses standard office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopiers, filing cabinets and fax machines. The core working hours are 9 AM – 3 PM. Mandatory Meal Period Employee meal periods are important to company productivity and employee health. Employees will take a mandatory meal break to cover a minimum of 30 minutes. The meal break shall not be scheduled during or before the first hour of scheduled work activity. The meal period will not be included in the total hours of work per day and is not compensable. Manager may grant variance depending on client (government or prime contractor) flow-down specifications, upon employer application.

\*Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.

Job Types: Full-time, Contract

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Signing bonus
COVID-19 considerations:
This project will be a remote position due to COVID-19. As Federal agencies move through opening phases our staff will transition to onsite meetings/remote work/Corporate Stafford Offices work.",5.0,"Trewon Technologies
5.0","Stafford, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Contract,IT Services,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
39,Principal Systems Engineer,$82k-$162k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB SUMMARY

ThePrincipal Systems Engineer is responsible for participating in the research, design and development of test instrumentation for the electric power generation, transmission and distribution industry. This person will be responsible for evaluating architectural choices based on product requirements and ensuring that the architecture works across hardware, firmware and software components. The Principal Systems Engineer must be able to participate in a team environment, while managing their own assigned responsibilities. Responsibilities also include providing system-level architectural leadership to a small team of engineers and participating in the selection and definition of hardware and software architectures for future products.

The ideal candidate would be someone that has past experience with hardware design and/or FPGA programming and currently working in the embedded real-time, multi-processor environment. This position will be located in ourMarlborough, MA corporate headquarters, reporting to the Director of Software Engineering

ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS
Help evaluate new technologies and leverage those into product architectures resulting in the implementation of requested product functions.
Innovate new product features based on your ability to realize product from technical possibilities.
Provide technical leadership in the realm of system design.
Design, develop, test and document firmware components and applications.
Design, Develop and Test embedded real-time, multi-processor systems.
Work with engineering project teams to provide architectural technical leadership.
Lead technical requirements gathering, estimating, and planning efforts.
Leverage internal component reusability and open source solutions to improve time to market.
Develop products to promote the ease of implementing automated test suites (Nice-to-have).
Develop clear metrics for testing status and progress monitoring dashboards.
Mentorship of more junior engineers and on-going professional development activities.
As a member of the Engineering team, interface with mechanical, electrical, systems, and test engineers.
Participate in project team meetings.
Identify and implement process and development environment improvements.
Work with Development and project managers to assist in technical decision making.
Ensure cross product implementation consistency.
Work with other product teams on solutions.
Travel requirement: less than 5%.
DECISION-MAKING LATITUDE

This employee will be a member of design teams and, as a Principal engineer, will be responsible for guiding these teams in system designs.

QUALIFICATIONS

EDUCATION:

Bachelor’s Degree in Electrical or Computer Engineering required.

REQUIRED EXPERIENCE:
15+ years of work experience in firmware and software development.
5+ years of work experience in a technical leadership role.
Ability to quickly prototype new concepts and ideas.
Ability to provide creativity while solving complex problems without known solutions.
Familiarity and experience working with Matlab, Linux, and scripting languages.
Knowledge of PC based applications.
Knowledge of FPGA programming.
Knowledge of hardware design Familiar with message bus technologies and implementations.
Team communication and collaboration experience (Such as a wiki).
Ability to assess new technologies via comprehensive reviews.
Experience working with hardware teams to isolate failure causes.
Proven track record of proactively working with the development and QA stakeholders.
Strong technical capabilities of a developer combined with a passion for assuring product quality.
DSP FPGA/CPLD implementations.
Project management skills, including planning, estimation and requirements management.
Expert level skills in one or more scripting languages such as TCL, Python and Perl.
Experience with embedded and host applications developed in C, C++, C# and .NET
PREFERRED EXPERIENCE (Not Required):
FPGA or DSP based digital loop control.
Simulation with PSpice, LTSpice, MATLAB, PSIM and/or Simulink.
Complete product life-cycle experience.
IEC61010-1 compliance experience.
Experience working in an agile engineering environment.
Experience working with Atlassian Jira, Confluence and Bitbucket products.
Experience or the desire to learn about utility power systems.
Experience with Protocol development and messaging systems.
Knowledge of equipment such as protectors, relays, transformers and power cable.


KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS& ABILITIES:
Ability to express ideas clearly in written and oral communications.
Willingness and excited to assume increased responsibility.
Expert knowledge of scripting and programming languages including C/C++ and Perl/Python/PHP.
Development experience Linux, Windows.
Expert knowledge of embedded multiprocessor systems, software/hardware test and validation, bug life cycle management, software development methodologies (waterfall and agile).
Strong communication skills that interweave presentation skills with the problem- solving process.
Strong interpersonal skill set.
Strong computer skills including network load flow software.
Well-developed technical writing skills.
PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS:

While performing the duties of this job the employee is often required to stand, sit, use computers, read, write, type, use fax machines, use copy machines, file paperwork, use telephones, and utilize written and oral communication to interact with clients, co-workers and customers. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals to perform the essential functions of this job. Must be capable of lifting 30 pounds.

---

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

We are an Equal Employment Opportunity employer that values the strength diversity brings to the workplace. All qualified applicants, regardless of race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, gender identity or expression, national origin, genetics, age, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by applicable law, are strongly encouraged to apply.

The Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA) prohibits discrimination by employers, in compensation and employment opportunities, against qualified individuals with disabilities who, with or without reasonable accommodation, can perform the“essential functions” of a job. A function may be essential for any of several reasons, including: the job exists to perform that function, the employee holding the job was hired for his/her expertise in performing the function, or only a limited number of employees are available to perform that function.",3.1,"Doble Engineering Company
3.1","Marlborough, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1920,Company - Public,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
40,Senior Full Stack Engineer,$118k-$140k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tamr is the enterprise-scale data unification company trusted by industry leaders like GE, Toyota, Thomson Reuters, and GSK. The company’s patented software platform uses machine learning supplemented with customers’ knowledge to unify and prepare data across myriad silos to deliver previously unavailable business-changing insights. With a co-founding team led by Andy Palmer (founding CEO of Vertica) and Mike Stonebraker (Turing Award winner) and backed by founding investors NEA and GV, Tamr is transforming how companies get value from their data.

As we rapidly grow our engineering team, we are seeking for outstanding engineers interested in building products that solve customer problems & enable customer innovation. This is an opportunity to build enterprise software that solves the most time-consuming, manually intensive problem in data science and modern data pipelines: enriching, curating, and preparing data. As part of a talented team, you will design and implement creative solutions to problems in data pipelining, distributed computing, cloud computing, machine learning and user experience.
This job might be a good fit for you if you have:
At least 5 years industry experience in software development
Strong computer science fundamentals. BS or MS in Computer Science preferred. Equivalent industry experience acceptable
Strong experience with Java or any other modern programming language
Experience with Big Data technologies, Distributed systems or Cloud native software
Excellent problem-solving skills
A collaborative working style
A hunger to learn new things and achieve big outcomes
Additional Information

This position is available in Cambridge MA. Tamr does sponsor employees requiring a visa.

Tamr provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, marital status, amnesty, or status as a covered veteran in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.",4.3,"Tamr
4.3","Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
41,"Principal Engineer, Web",$101k-$222k (Glassdoor Est.),"Principal Engineer, Web

We’re looking for a Principal Software Engineer who is a self-starter and can learn quickly. Your job will be to help rollout new software systems by inserting directly into execution teams in order to spread and evangelize the latest and greatest technologies.

The ideal candidate has a strong background in software design, developing and managing the delivery of highly-scalable, micro-services driven cloud based systems, leveraging a combination of front end and backend technologies running in containers.

What you’ll do:

Lead, develop and inspire a team of engineers to meet initiative objectives
Help introduce new technologies to engineering teams, taking part in the training, adoption, and execution of new platforms
Work closely with other engineering teams to gain bottom-up consensus in delivering technology solutions
Full-stack hands on development
Design and communicate solutions that help software engineers to deliver to growing business needs, while thoroughly considering the systems impact
Accelerate the development process by suggesting and implementing improvements to the developer pipeline
Develop a deep understanding of the system, write technical specifications, mentor development team, enforce coding standards
Drive the DevOps culture, taking quality into your hands, enabled by automated testing and continuous integration
Present technological solutions to IT leadership that communicates the value, intent, and tradeoffs of your approach
Build and foster stakeholder relationships both within your team and among others
Contribute to the department’s identity, standards, guidelines and best practices
Support the daily operations of the IT/Tech department

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or related field required
10+ years of intense technical experience in the areas of web development and application integration
3+ years working in the role of principal or staff engineer in a high transaction, fast paced and dynamic environment
5+ years of hands on programming in .NET or Java and relational databases (MS SQL, Oracle, MySQL, etc…)
3+ years developing in other backend platforms such as NodeJS, Python, PHP, etc…
3+ years working with NoSQL solutions such as MongoDB, Neo4J, Redis, Cassandra, etc…
Previous experience as a technical leader and/or leading an agile/scrum team
Proven success implementing client side MVVM frameworks such as Angular or React as well as expert proficiency with JavaScript
Hands-on experience writing tests using popular automation frameworks (Jasmine, Mocha, Karma, etc.)
Expert hands on knowledge of front-end frameworks and layout systems such as Bootstrap, Foundation
Previous experience building out design systems, pattern libraries, and/or style guides
Extensive experience building component driven JavaScript SDKs
Proficient in JavaScript, ES6/ES7, TypeScript, JQuery, HTML5, CSS3, CSS pre-processing platforms such as : SASS, LESS, automation tools such as Gulp
Proven delivery of responsive and adaptive web solutions including progressive web applications
Experience working with CDN and edge caching
Strong understanding of website optimization, minification, compression
Experience with Secure Coding Practices and assurance that these practices are consistently followed in the development of all software products
Production experience with Docker, Kubernetes and/or similar container engines and orchestration including ECS/Fargate or EKS
Experience with continuous integration, unit testing, static analysis, and automated integration tests. Continuous delivery experience preferred
Expert experience working with a source control tool (GIT) with strong understanding of how to automate developer workflows
Proven ability to use Design Patterns to accomplish scalable architecture
Proficiency in using architectural design utilities like Visio, ERDs, UML
Proficiency using MS PowerPoint to deliver technical and non-technical presentations
Experienced in both Windows and Linux
Strong attention to detail and work ethic
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Excellent communication (both written and verbal) and interpersonal skills

Preferred skills

AI, Machine Learning, and Natural Language Processing experience is a plus

LegalZoom is an Equal Opportunity Employer, dedicated to diversity.",2.9,"LegalZoom
2.9","Glendale, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
42,Sr. Software Engineer,-1,"Job Summary

We are One. That’s the foundation of our company culture at TVH. We’re the worldwide leading supplier of quality replacement parts, safety equipment, and accessories for the material handling and industrial equipment industry and we’re growing our team!

We’re seeking a results-oriented Sr. Software Engineer-AI to be a lead developer for models on AI Technology Platforms and ensure the Models meet functional and non-functional requirements, that the model execution performs as expected and model performance consistently meets or exceeds the requirements established while accounting for Cyber-security and Operational Excellence.

Essential Functions & Responsibilities

Analyze requirements identified in close collaboration with the Business and in tight cooperation with other IT colleagues and assist in converting these requirements into a algorithmic model
Perform and document (together with other Center of Excellence members) the modeling and iterations of the proposals from the Digital Product Managers / Product Owner to make sure that qualitative applications can be developed.
Converting the functional/technical analysis into a model within the sprint time box (Agile methodology), according to development standards and methodologies (Enterprise Architecture) in order to resolve the product backlog and thus deliver on business value.
Provide continuous consultancy about possible process improvements and the quality of the tools being used in order to strengthen the cooperation with the business and/or end user.
Key Responsibilities
Assist the Digital Product Managers / Product Owners and project leader in the functional area by providing follow-up and guidance of programming and implementation of new or modified programs or applications so as to guarantee a fluent execution of the product roadmap/project
Design and challenge future proof functional solutions that take into account the global context of all different business lines in order to have a solid basis for future implementations
Update and maintain professional knowledge and demonstrate up-to-date expertise on the company processes within the assigned functional domain in order to do profound research and recommend solutions and improvements for the benefit of the organization

Education:
Bachelor's degree from an accredited four-year college or university in Business, Computer Science, Information Technology, Management Information Systems, Business Administration, or another applicable field OR a minimum of 4 years substantially similar AI Engineering experience

Preferred Qualifications

Experience & Skills

Must possess a minimum of two years of work substantially similar work experience in data wrangling, management or technologies
Demonstrated knowledge and experience with algorithmic modelling using structured and unstructured data
Experience in and/or proficient knowledge of business processes
Experience working with non-relational and unstructured data
Demonstrated proficiency working with Python, R and/or machine learning libraries
Proven knowledge and experience in creating visualizations and explanations to successfully communicate results and/or findings from applying models to solve business problems
Demonstrates proficiency using Microsoft Word, Excel, and PowerPoint
Demonstrates proficient presentation and facilitation skills
Proven experience and demonstrated ability to exercise discretion and maintain strict confidentiality
Demonstrates effective written and verbal communication and interpersonal skills with a proven ability to communicate technical information to individuals with non-technical backgrounds/experience
Demonstrated ability to collaborate in an effective, positive manner with employees at all levels across the organization
Demonstrated attention to detail with proficient organization and time management skills
Willingness and ability to travel up to 10% internationally

TVH offers a competitive benefits package including medical, dental, and vision insurance, access to an onsite health clinic for you and your family, vacation and sick time, a retirement plan. And, if you need to take a quick break, take a lap around the TVH campus and earn points through our Wellness program or grab your laptop for a quick walk on one of the treadmills located on our Olathe campus. That’s just the start. Want to learn more and see our dynamic work environment? Take a virtual tour by clicking www.tvhamericas.com/360/tour.html. Don’t wait a minute longer. Apply today to join the TVH team.

EEO/AA/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans",4.0,"TVH Group / mateco GmbH
4.0","Olathe, KS",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1969,Company - Private,Automotive Parts & Accessories Stores,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
43,Analytic Software Engineer - TS/SCI w/FSP Required,-1,"Job Description:
Join our team of talented engineers in the Fort Meade area supporting critical national security programs. As an analytic software engineer, youll work closely with mission SMEs to develop niche analytics for the Intelligence Community. These may be batch analytics that operate over large volumes of data at-rest, or they may be streaming analytics that operate over smaller volumes of data in-motion. When operational, your analytics will support Phoenixs core mission of Arming the Analyst.

This position will support multiple programs and is open to both mid-level and senior candidates. A typical day includes engineering activities across a mid-sized team, exploring mission data sets, working with mission SMEs to understand tradecraft, and developing analytics to support that tradecraft. All development will be conducted within an Agile process using standard Scrum practices (daily stands-ups, sprint planning, sprint demos/retrospectives).

*** Top Secret SCI Clearance with Full-Scope Polygraph Required ***

Technical Skills Required
5+ years of experience in Java software development
3+ years of experience with distributed technologies such as Hadoop, Spark and Kafka
3+ years of experience implementing RESTful web services
3+ years of experience processing XML and JSON data formats
3+ years of experience using Git, JUnit, Maven and Jenkins
3+years of experience developing software in a Linux environment
3+ years of experience supporting Defense or Intelligence programs
Technical Skill Preferred
Experience developing analytics with MapReduce, Spark or similar technologies
Experience with distributed databases such as Accumulo or HBase
Experience working in an Agile environment using Jira and Confluence
Basic understanding of Python or Scala
Basic Machine Learning algorithms & techniques
Benefits Offered:
Medical, Dental, Vision Insurance - 100% Company Paid Premiums
STD, LTD, and Life Insurance - 100% Company paid
401K Automatic 10% company contribution; no matching required
PTO - 4 weeks/year
Holidays - 10 paid/year
Birthdays off with pay
Company laptop built to your specification
Referral Bonuses Upfront AND Annually Recurring
Open Source Bonuses Contribute to our GitHub projects
Professional Development Paid training, Certifications and Enrichment
ABOUT PHOENIX OPERATIONS GROUP:
Phoenix Operations Group is an engineering services company that protects US Warfighters and supports US Intelligence efforts. As a small business operating in the Baltimore & DC areas, we rely on innovation to continually advance our employees' skills and provide game-changing solutions to our customers.

Phoenix specializes in inter-agency functionality that connects our federal, military and commercial clients with shared mission solutions. We do this with Big Data technologies, Machine Learning techniques, Cloud-Hosted platforms, and enterprise architectures.

Our team is geographically dispersed across the country. Thus, we rely on innovative techniques to advance our employees' skills and promote company culture:
We incentivize employees to participate in our Open-Source GitHub projects
We incentivize and support employees in writing whitepapers for the community
We invest in research and development (R&D) to expand our mission capabilities
We promote technical discussion across Slack, Google Meet and Social Media platforms
With these innovations, Phoenix provides a dynamic and inclusive environment for our employees. Please visit us at https://www.phoenix-opsgroup.com/ for more information.

Phoenix Operations Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Phoenix Operations Group does not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, non-disqualifying physical or mental disability, national origin, veteran status or any other basis covered by appropriate law. All employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need.",5.0,"Phoenix Operations Group
5.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2011,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
44,Senior Data Scientist with Top Secret,$109k-$180k (Glassdoor Est.),"What You'll Get to Do as a Data Scientist: *
Leads data science efforts, working closely with clients and data to understand mission and data.
Develops algorithms leveraging modern data science technologies including reinforcement learning systems, machine learning and more.
Provides clients with technical expertise for a project or program. Able to manage technology projects or lead technology solutioning.
Provides highly technical and specialized guidance and solutions to complex IT problems; performs elaborate analyses and studies.
Evaluates, recommends, and executes new technologies and updates existing infrastructure to ensure optimal performance and efficiency.
Develops IT strategies to ensure the systems meet existing and future requirements based on needs and regulations.
Works in a variety of environments and has excellent verbal and non-verbal communication skills. Works effectively and independently.
You’ll Bring These Qualifications: *
Must have an active TS or TS/SCI
At least 5 years of experience developing in languages commonly used for data analysis such as Python, R, Julia, or SAS
Experience working with multiple database types such as SQL, Redis and MongoDB
Experience building and integrating the at the application and database level
Experience developing REST/SOAP APIs and messaging protocols and formats
At least 2 years of theoretical and practical background in statistical analysis, machine learning, predictive modeling, and/or optimization
Experience implementing event/data streaming services such as Kafka
Experience prototyping front-end visualizations utilizing data visualization suites such as Kibana or Splunk
At least 2 years of experience developing Reinforcement learning systems utilizing at least one of the following methodologies. Finite Markov Decision Processes, Support Vector Machines, Q-Learning, Stochastic Finite State Machines, MCTS or other hybrid Deep Reinforcement Learning processes
Experience in theoretical and practical background in statistical analysis, machine learning, predictive modeling, and/or optimization.
Experience developing in languages commonly used for data analysis such as Python, R, Julia, or SAS
Experience working with databases such as SQL or MongoDB.
Experience working with large-scale data sets.
Experience producing data visualizations for a variety of different audiences.
Excellent verbal and written communications skills along with the ability to present technical data and approaches to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Professional Development Assistance
Retirement Plan
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
On Call
Experience:
SAS: 5 years (Preferred)
Data Science: 5 years (Preferred)
Machine Learning: 5 years (Preferred)
Data Engineering: 5 years (Preferred)
R: 5 years (Preferred)
Python: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Washington, DC 20016 (Preferred)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.oneglobeit.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"OneGlobe LLC
4.4","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
45,Associate Machine Learning Engineer,$78k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE is seeking recent college graduates and M.S. recipients in technical disciplines who are strongly motivated to contribute directly to solving real defense and intelligence challenges by providing ""game-changing"" operational solutions for our government sponsors. These individuals will join a team that is developing state-of-the-art algorithms to automatically analyze and identify key attributes from a wide variety of data sources. As part of the Advanced ISR Solutions team, you will work closely with domain experts and have access to cutting edge hardware to analyze large datasets, create new analytical tools, and address problems of critical national importance. This is an excellent opportunity to be part of an ambitious team committed to strong collaboration and intellectual rigor.

Responsibilities include:
Keep current with computer vision and machine learning research to replicate and baseline new techniques published in academia
Run experiments comparing state-of-the-art methods with a strong focus on performance when these methods are applied to sponsor driven data and real-world conditions
Adapt research done in academia and industry to our sponsors’ uniquely challenging data sources and problems sets
Develop prototype software to demonstrate feasibility of the algorithm/approach to our sponsors
Code in MATLAB, Python, or other scripting languages for prototyping/testing algorithms and software tools in a team environment
Analyzing data from cutting-edge sensor systems including video, infrared, hyperspectral, and others
Brainstorming/problem solving with experienced technical staff to develop solutions for challenging problems and working with small teams to implement those solutions
Developing front-end interface software for web applications or mobile devices
Possess demonstrated ability to provide deliverables or parts of deliverables to customer
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree in Electrical, Computer or Systems Engineering or related field
1+ years of relevant experience
Required Qualifications:
Must be a U.S. citizen with the ability to possess/maintain a DoD clearance
Proficiency in use of Microsoft Office including Outlook, Excel, and Word
Must have demonstrated proficiency and strength in verbal, written, PC, presentation, and communications skills
Strong problem-solving skills and capable of working with scientists, analysts, and technical software developers
Strong software development skills, preferably with knowledge of machine learning and/or deep learning frameworks
Domain knowledge of machine learning and computer vision techniques for classification, detection, and key attribute extraction
Practical experience in statistics and knowledge of big data biases
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degree in technical field of study
Candidates that possess a current/active DoD clearance are preferred
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
46,Data Engineer,-1,"Data Engineer Northern, VA

Data Engineer

NuWave Solutions is seeking Data Engineers to design and implement distributed, cloud-native data pipelines, storage systems, and query support. These capabilities will support next-generation defense and intelligence operations with a focus on enabling machine learning and automation. Teams will be working in an Agile development environment and expected to identify and mitigate risks and bottlenecks associated with big data environments. Other responsibilities include:
Architect, design, and implement updates and enhancements to data repositories and indices to support data ingest, enrichment, analysis, visualization, and dissemination
Perform database engineering and management activities associated with designing, developing, maintaining, and enhancing Big Data analytic systems using an Agile DevSecOps model
Integrate data from multiple sources in batches and real-time
Review, design, and develop data quality management processes and automated procedures intended to produce high levels of data integrity
Research and recommend solutions to complex problems
Oversee code reviews and delivering feedback regarding designs/code
Perform research and development and provide technical support to identify and integrate new and emerging technologies into the data environment
Design and implement storage and indexing strategies to provide efficient storage and retrieval to support visualizations such as graph-based and geospatial indices
Support design and development of data access APIs that allow enterprise access (as appropriate) to data
Develop or provide input to engineering artifacts associated with the data repositories
Requirements
Active Top-Secret clearance required
Minimum (positions are available at multiple levels of seniority) of a bachelor’s degree and 3 years of experience in a science or engineering field
Experience with SQL databases
Data transformation experience with scripting (Python, Java, Perl, PL/SQL) or platforms such as Spark, Talend, Knime, or Pentaho
Strong problem-solving skills
Good written and oral communications skills
Preferred Skills
Familiarity with no-SQL databases like Neo4j, ElasticSearch, or Cassandra
Familiarity with SQL query engines, preferably PrestoDB or SparkSQL
Familiarity with distributed platforms (i.e. HBase, Kafka, Spark, NiFi) and the cloud (i.e. AWS, GCP, Azure), preferably Amazon Web Services
Experience integrating open API based data access and processing
DOD8570 IAT Level 1 or 2 certified (A+, Security+, etc. certification)
About NuWave Solutions

NuWave Solutions is a recognized leader in providing anticipatory intelligence and advanced data analytics to the defense, intelligence, and private sectors for over 20 years. Leveraging artificial intelligence and machine learning methodologies, NuWave Solutions streamlines the Data-to-Decision lifecycle faster than traditional practices allowing clients to take action with confidence.

For more information on how NuWave Solutions supports its clients and builds upon success, please visit https://www.nuwavesolutions.com

Position Details

Locations of Positions: Reston, McLean, or Herndon, VA; Joint Base Andrews-Bolling, DC; Suitland, MD

Travel Required (CONUS/OCONUS): CONUS

If Travel is required, how much? 5%

Work Schedule: Day Shift

Authorization to work in US is required

8570 Requirements: N/A

NuWave Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

Tagged as: Data Engineer",4.5,"NuWave Solutions
4.5",Virginia,-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
47,Mid-Level Data Scientist,-1,Job Description BTS is seeking a Mid Level Data Scientist to support NORTHCOM J2 in Colorado Springs CO Conducts data analytics data engineering data mining exploratory analysis predictive analysis and statistical analysis and uses scientific techniques to correlate data into graphical written visual and verbal narrative products enabling more informed analytic decisions Proactively retrieves information from various sources analyzes it for better understanding about the data set and builds AI tools that automate certain processes Duties typically include creating various ML based tools or processes such as recommendation engines or automated lead scoring systems Performs statistical analysis applies data mining techniques and builds high quality prediction systems Should be skilled in data visualization and use of graphical applications including Microsoft Office Power BI and Tableau; major data science languages such as R and Python; managing and merging of disparate data sources preferably through R Python or SQL; statistical analysis; and data mining algorithms Should have prior experience with large data Multi INT analytics ML and automated predictive analytics Requisite Skill Requirements Bachelor degree with 4 6 years of relevant subject matter experience or specialized training & 4 8 years subject matter experience or equivalent intelligenceacademic experience Senior level contractor personnel work independently with moderate Government oversight provide comprehensive and completed products that may require multiple Senior Intelligence AnalystOfficer SIASIO minor revisions andor editing and develop and manage plan of actions and milestones Additional duties as directed Demonstrates comprehensive mission knowledge and skills that affirms completion of all developmental training and experiences for the labor categoryDemonstrates ability to communicate understanding from information that may be incomplete indirect highly complex seemingly unrelated and or technically advanced Demonstrates ability to structure analysis based on trends in reporting and a range of analytic perspectives from other analysts organizations and intelligence disciplinesDemonstrates ability to work independently with minimal oversight and directionDemonstrates ability to collaborate and work with other IC members on information sharing driving collection and addressing analytic disputes and conflict resolutionDemonstrates ability to develop concise insightful and comprehensive products for defense intelligenceDemonstrates ability to lead teams in researching multifaceted or critical problems Provides guidance in selecting designing and applying analytic methodologies Uses argument evaluation and validated analytic methodologies to challenge differing perspectivesDesired Experience At least 8 years of experience conducting analysis relevant to the specific labor category with at least a portion of the experience within the last 2 yearsDesired Education Bachelors degree in an area related to the labor category from a college or university accredited by an agency recognized by the US Department of EducationCompany Overview BTS Software Solutions is a Service Disabled Veteran Owned Small Business who are community focused innovators who transform ideas into technology to serve people We recognize that innovation is only valuable when applied towards a needed solution Technology has no value without the hard work to turn ideas into reality Our roots are in helping save Soldiers lives through technology We bring that ethos to serving our community We create solutions that touch peoples lives products to communicate to connect companies with customers to stay informed to save lives and to enhance lives We have a small company persona with a large company ethos and capabilities; we create elegant solutions for complex problems that will enrich peoples lives We offer one of the best benefits packages in the industry Competitive health benefits package PTO 401K matching and vested from day one to name just a few of our benefits and perks BTS Software Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer EOE All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age race creed color religion sex national origin ancestry disability status veteran status sexual orientation gender identity or expression genetic information marital status citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal state or local law,4.9,"BTS Software Solutions
4.9",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
48,Senior Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Introduction to Shield
Shield AI’s mission is to protect service members and civilians with artificially intelligent systems. For our team, no idea is too ambitious. We don’t ever want to stop working to make possible what looks out of reach today. We have assembled a world-class team dedicated to shaping the future of artificially intelligent systems. We are backed by top tier venture capital investors, have been shipping product since 2018 and are rapidly expanding.

Job Description
Are you a passionate and innovative software engineer looking to help develop state of the art AI products? Are you eager to make a positive difference in the world? Do you want to work alongside mission driven and values focused teammates? Shield AI is just the place for you!
As a Machine Learning Engineer, you will work on exciting applications of machine learning for robotic systems. You will work alongside a team of passionate and driven engineers to solve a wide variety of challenging problems to include object detection, scene understanding, face verification, and action recognition. You will conduct literature reviews to drive team decisions and develop a framework for training, validation, and evaluation. Your contributions will help provide the situational awareness that is essential to the safety of our users!
Join us to push the state of the art in autonomous robotics for protecting lives.
What you'll do
Develop algorithms for the accurate detection, classification, and localization of high-value objects for tracking and analysis
Develop algorithms for scene understanding; build scene graphs, recognize obstacles for navigation, and estimate threat or intent
Contribute to our machine learning foundation tools for curating data and developing/analyzing models
Inform sensor decisions for optimal approaches to machine learning for product requirements
Develop state-of-the-art approaches in the areas described above, as applied to our unique problems
Projects you might work on
Improving the tooling and pipelines that allow us to develop models at scale
Developing and optimizing models for multiple tasks of interest
Extending models to optimize execution and pull in more functionality such as tracking or motion prediction
Developing robust APIs for easy interfacing with internal and external software components
People we're looking for have the following required education and experience
5+ years of professional work experience as a machine learning and/or software engineer
MS in Computer Science or Engineering, similar degree, or equivalent practical experience
Experience with contributing to large and complex software projects
Practical experience with machine learning frameworks such as PyTorch and TensorFlow
Competencies
Deep learning model development
Software Engineering
C++
Python
TensorFlow
Caffe/Caffe2
PyTorch
scikit-learn
OpenCV
Multi-threaded development
Excellent communication skills
Preferred qualifications
Experience producing, deploying, and improving production models
Experience with ROS
Experience with CUDA
Passion for solving problems that make a difference
If you're interested in being part of our team, apply now!

Shield AI is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.

To conform to U.S. Government regulations, applicant must be a U.S. citizen, lawful permanent resident of the U.S., protected individual as defined by 8 U.S.C. 1324b(a)(3), or eligible to obtain the required authorizations from the U.S. Department of State.",4.8,"Shield AI
4.8","San Diego, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
49,Big Data Engineer - Chicago - Future Opportunity,$71k-$129k (Glassdoor Est.),"ABOUT US

Are you ready to transform an industry? At Centro we are building a comprehensive tech platform that radically increases efficiencies and impact across businesses, teams, and campaigns. Our clients can run all their digital business through Basis, with robust business intelligence, workflow automation, search and social integrations, and the number one rated DSP.
We’re taking the digital advertising world by storm and are proud to be headquartered in the rapidly growing tech hub of Chicago, with offices that span across the United States, Canada, Mexico, and London. Join us in our mission to improve the lives of everyone working in the industry!
WHY WORK WITH US?
At Centro, we believe that lasting success is achieved through continual dedication to the growth and well-being of the individual. Our people are the core of what makes Centro unique. Driven by the Centro Manifesto and our guiding principles, we look to hire the best and brightest minds—curious, passionate learners who are driven to create impact.
We are committed to building a culture of highly motivated individuals who create a positive and supportive environment together. When we work hard, stay focused, and act in service to others, we believe that anything is possible. Come grow with us!

ABOUT THE TEAM

Technology is at the core of what we do. Centro’s innovative Engineering team designs and develops new features and integrations for Basis, our industry-leading, comprehensive software solution. Our platform processes over 300 billion events per day and uses AI and machine learning to automate and simplify the entire digital campaign process.

This team is all about data—and in order to create value from the massive amount of data we collect, engineering leverages their dynamic Data Engineering, Data Science, and Business Intelligence teams to create insights that benefit the industry as a whole.

Our Tech Stack:
• Ruby, Java, Python, and React.js
• Kubernetes, Docker, Kafka
• PostgreSQL, NoSQL
• AWS

Ways You’ll Contribute
We are looking for engineers who are excited about building distributed data pipelines. We want you to help us shape our internal and external brand-new data warehouses, leveraging the latest advances of big data processing: a combination of Kafka Streams, Hadoop, and traditional RDBMS. You will also contribute by:

Implementing scalable, fault tolerant and accurate ETL pipelines that work in a distributed Hadoop environment.
Developing platform services to operate the big data applications at scale.
Gathering and processing raw data at scale from diversified sources into Hadoop.
Building enterprise business analytics and reporting applications on Hadoop.

What You Bring to the Table
Solid understanding of distributed system fundamentals.
Experience in developing, troubleshooting, diagnosing, and performance tuning of distributed data pipelines at scale.
Demonstrated professional experience working with various components of Big Data ecosystem: Spark/Spark Streaming, Hive, Kafka/KSQL, Hadoop (or similar NoSQL ecosystem), et. al, in a production system.
Strong software engineering skills with Python.
Knowledge of some flavor of SQL (MySQL, Oracle, Hive, Impala), including the fundamentals of data modeling and performance.
Bonus Points
Skills in real-time streaming applications.
Knowledge of Scala.
A development workflow using Docker containers.
Compulsion for automating your day-to-day processes.
LIFE WITH CENTRO

We take care of our people. Our team has put together a thoughtful benefits package and provides a wide range of perks, including competitive 401k matching, a tax-free health savings account, tuition reimbursement, generous maternity/paternity leave, and more.

Aside from benefits, we’re always finding new ways to invest in the personal and professional growth our employees. We’re proud to support a variety of employee-led communities that enrich our culture of uniqueness, inclusivity, and empowerment. Centro is more than a workplace.

Centro is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and support an inclusive workplace diverse in thought, perspective and culture. We celebrate all team members regardless of gender/identity, sexual orientation, race or cultural background, religion, physical disability and age. We are better together.",4.0,"Centro
4.0","Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
50,Machine Learning Engineer,$48k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"/

Olive is healthcare's first intelligent digital workforce and has been successfully deployed at numerous healthcare systems across the country. Olive helps streamline and automate the most high-volume, repetitive tasks so healthcare professionals can concentrate on their patients and solving healthcare's most challenging problems. Olive's promise to her customers is that she finds out where she can make an impact, onboards quickly, shows up to work everyday, does her job extremely well, and gets smarter over time.

/

The focus of the Machine Learning Engineering team is to develop models and logic to address customers' needs, package the codebase for testing, and deploy it to production environments. The ideal candidate understands machine learning as well as software development best practices— from collecting and preprocessing data for training, validating, and testing machine learning models to unit and integration testing, deployment, and maintenance. As a Machine Learning Engineer, you will be expected to have the ability to work collaboratively with customers and other engineers to demonstrate value in sprints.

/

Responsibilities:

/
/
Collaborate with team members to deliver ML and RPA solutions including but not limited to data analytics and analysis, ML model training, and RPA implementation
/
Identify machine learning architectures and models to solve complex data problems
/
Work with multiple stakeholders to deliver automated workflows in a timely fashion
/
Use software development programs and operating systems for development
/
Define new techniques and best practices for all areas of req and ML
/
Provide feedback to product and development teams to improve our in house tools
/
Document process, procedures, and training materials for staff and stakeholders
/
Attend daily stand-up and periodic team meetings
/
/

/
Bachelor Degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Systems Engineering, Electrical Engineering or other related degree or experience
/
Strong mathematical and data analysis skills
/
Solid understanding of data types and structures
/
Knowledge of remote connectivity applications: Citrix Receiver, Horizon VMWare Client, RDP
/
Version control such as GIT, Subversion, Team Foundation
/
Ability to understand large scale software & system architecture
/
Able to communicate technical issues with technical & non-technical stakeholders
/
Experience in one of the following programming languages: Python, R, SQL, and Javascript
/
/

Preferred Skills/Experience Nice to Have:

/
/
Experience with Python ML tools: Keras, Jupyter Notebooks, Pandas, scikit-learn, Flask, OpenCV, Tesseract, and Numpy
/
Experience with Agile tools, Jira, Trello, Pivotal Tracker
/
Understanding of Continuous integration, testing, deployment & release methodologies
/
Automation Anywhere, Blue Prism, Autolt experience
/
Understanding of Computer Vision
/
Proficiency with recent Windows Server operating systems
/
Healthcare IT and EHR knowledge
/

PI124788843",4.0,"Olive
4.0","Columbus, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
51,Manufacturing Data Engineer,$64k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us as a Manufacturing Data Engineer.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

OBJECTIVES:

Leads complex data analysis, uses and explores data, languages, tools and software to best construct data for predictive modelling, tests the model, trains data to deploy the modelling within the global GMS GQ environment, and embed new capabilities in the global Enterprise Architecture.
Manages and develops technical existing and new computer science platforms to design, to analyze and implement complex and new data driven solutions, with an impact on the daily operation of our manufacturing facilities.
Interprets and develops advance techniques in partly structured and unstructured big data across different partner organizations.
Oversee and guide efforts of Advanced Analytics in a GxP environment from an IT perspective in all US GMS sites and for our collaboration with CMO’s.

ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Determines data analysis approaches, uses different technologies, big data preparations, programming and loading as well as initial exploration in the process of searching and finding data patterns.
Oversees data science input and requests, translates these from data exploration - large record (billions) and unstructured data sets - to mathematic algorithms and uses various tooling from programming languages to new tools (artificial and machine learning) to translate, build and optimize models.
Leads and conducts ongoing tests in the search for solutions in the data modelling, collects and prepares the training of data, tones the data, optimizes algorithm implementations to test, scale, and deploy future models.
Designs/builds/deploys complex data models related to R&D questions independently.
Develops technical roadmaps and approaches for data analyses to find patterns, to design data models, to scale the model to a managed production environment within the current or a technical landscape to develop.
Influences and guides data exploration from analysis to scalable models, works independently and decides quick on transfers in complex data analysis and modelling.
Interprets the impact on IT Structure and Architecture and influences this discipline.
Independently use own judgement to identify data requirements and influences the design and implementation of the IS/IT data strategy.
Ensures execution and documentation to Takeda Quality Management System (QMS), suggest adjustments to the Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) and other standards, policies and procedures.
Work independently on tough problems with other team members and independently solve, with some guidance, very difficult technology problems.
Demonstrates advanced tooling and techniques to other engineers and traditional analytics organizations throughout the company
Maintains up-to-data knowledge on modern data technologies, explores new platforms and beta tooling.
Represent the team while working on project across R&D and commercial. Is internal and external expert to-go-to in how to drive advanced Computer Science and Engineering skills and techniques.
Influences and maintains relationships with partner organizations in support of data analysis, modelling and deployment.

COMPETENCES, EDUCATIONAL AND SKILLS

Required:

Master Degree in Computer Science or equivalent
2 years or more of relevant experience.
Ability to write, speak and lead in the English language
Excellent oral and written communications skills, business acumen and excels in problem solving and analytical skills.
Have a good understanding of the pharmaceutical industry and experience with validated systems.
Up-to-date specialized knowledge of data wrangling, manipulation and management of technologies to affect change across business units.
Ability to work in an agile and rapid changing environment with high quality deliverables.
Experience Programming Java or Scala (Python?)
Understanding of Web Services as well as JSON formats
Working knowledge of SQL and Relational Databases
Experience with at least one NoSQL datastore (Cassandra, MongoDB, Neo4J, …)
Understand the concepts of Hadoop and Spark
Experience in Computer Systems Validation GAMP

Preferred:

Understanding of AWS (S3, EC2, Redshift, EMR, Athena)
Experience with Business Intelligence and Tools (Qlik/PowerBI)
Additional Languages: Python, Scala, Chef, R, Javascript
Experience with Multiple NoSQL datastores (Cassandra, MongoDB, Neo4J, …)
Experience with data formats including Parquet, ORC or AVRO
Experience with any of the following Frameworks: Spring, Django, R Shiny, Tensorflow, MXNet
Understanding or Application of Machine Learning and / or Deep Learning

Notice to Employment / Recruitment Agents:

Employment / Recruitment agents may only submit candidates for vacancies only if they have written authorization to do so from Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda’s Talent Acquisition department. Any agency candidate submission may only be submitted to positions opened to the agency through the specific Agency Portal. Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda will only pay a fee for candidates submitted or presented where there is a fully executed contract in place between the Employment / Recruitment agents and Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda and only if the candidate is submitted via the Agency Portal. Candidates submitted or presented by Employment / Recruitment Agents without a fully executed contract or submitted through this site shall not be deemed to form part of any Engagement for which the Agency may claim remuneration.

Equal Employment Opportunity

Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

EEO is the Law - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf

EEO is the Law – Supplement - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/OFCCP_EEO_Supplement_Final_JRF_QA_508c.pdf

Pay Transparency Policy - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/pdf/pay-transp_formattedESQA508c.pdf

Reasonable Accommodations

Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodation to individuals with disabilities. If, because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application process, or in order to perform the essential functions of a position, please call 484-595-8400 and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Social Circle, GA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
52,Industrial IoT System Integration Developer / Engineer,-1,"Industrial IoT System Integration Developer / Engineer*
BID Group*
Location: South Eastern US*
The BID Group of Companies is a North American leader in the design, manufacture and support of World Class equipment, services and turnkey solutions for the solid wood processing industry. BID Group serves primarily the North American market and offers the most comprehensive range of products available, producing everything from mechanical equipment and control systems to optimization systems equipped with digital machine vision and AI technology. The company integrates its products & technology to deliver fully automated production lines. BID Group has over 1500 employees working in our many divisions located around North America.

The OPER8 offering is an Industrial Internet of Things (IoT) platform with custom BID-designed architecture centered around PTC ThingWorx that connects to operations and business/IT data sources and orchestrates the data to drive efficiency, reliability, and uptime in our customer’s operations through the use of data visualization, data analytics, and custom IoT applications.

The Industrial IoT System Integration Developer / Engineer is a highly motivated professional working with the OPER8 team. As a key member of the team, the successful candidate will be responsible for designing, developing, and deploying various end to end production, throughput, asset health and quality control solutions for our customers. The successful candidate must be technically inclined and willing and able to learn new technologies as they are required. We’re a small but growing team of highly motivated professionals that feed on results. We strive to create a fun, flexible and rewarding work environment.

Responsibilities Include:
Deploying data connectivity software and customized Edge programming on-premise.
Working extensively with the cloud based IIoT platform to deploy and develop offerings.
Configuring cloud databases.
Building and QA of queries for KPI development and dashboarding.
Preparing design documentation for technical and non-technical audiences.
Contributing to the product development team by staying up to date on disruptive, breakthrough technologies and processes.
Working closely with customer reliability engineers, data analysts, electrical/automation groups, and management.
Ensuring customer satisfaction and foster loyalty to the BID Group.
Skills and Qualifications
Background and/or education in one of the following: electrical or software engineering or computer science or 4+ years of relevant work experience.
2+ years of experience with programming languages: Javascript, Python, Java, C or Shell.
2+ years of experience with databases is required: TSDBs, SQL variants or Mongo, TICK stack experience preferred.
Familiarity with communication protocols and web standards: HTTP, Websocket, REST, RPC, KepServerEx, CIP, OPC, Ethernet/IP, MQTT.
Understanding of OOP or other programming models: composition, inheritance, polymorphism, async, flow inversion of control.
Allen Bradley ControlLogix system knowledge is beneficial, but training is provided as required.
PTC ThingWorx knowledge is beneficial, but training is provided as required.
IT/computer networking skills are an asset: LANs, subnets, troubleshooting communication issues.
Methodical, able to pay close attention to detail, and possess excellent communication skills.
Flexibility in learning new technologies, often independently and under pressure.
Able to work independently and be results driven.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
This Job Is:
A job for which military experienced candidates are encouraged to apply
A “Fair Chance” job (you or the employer follow Fair Chance hiring practices when performing background checks)
A job for which all ages, including older job seekers, are encouraged to apply
A job for which people with disabilities are encouraged to apply
Company's website:
www.bidgroup.ca
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.9,"BID Group Technologies, US Inc
2.9",South Carolina,-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
53,ENGINEER - RESEARCH ENGINEER - SIGINT SOLUTIONS,$58k-$84k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are:


The SIGINT Solutions Department's mission is to support US Government, military, Intelligence Agencies, and US Allies in Research, Development, Design, Integration, Test, and Deployment of Signals Intelligence (SIGINT) and Specialized Communications Solutions.


Objectives of this Role:

Work with multidisciplinary team of engineers, software developers, and technicians in the execution of complex research and development, design and programs in support of national security.

Daily and Monthly Responsibilities:


Design, develop, integrate, test and deploy new signal processing capabilities in the areas of energy detection, channelization, signal recognition, signal demodulation/decoding & encoding/modulating, RF geolocation and electronic warfare and support programs
Work with a team of engineers, software development staff and technicians to create innovative solutions that include antenna arrays, RF processing hardware, and extensive software processing capabilities including application of machine learning techniques.
Collaborate with client technical representatives and SwRI senior engineering and software staff.
Work at SwRI laboratories and support short-term travel to government facilities/military bases or other customer facilities for system installations and to provide technical support within and outside the United States
Prepare technical documents and support proposal preparation as required.

Requirements:


Requires an Bachelors with a 3.00 GPA in Electrical Engineering or Computer Engineering
0-5 years with telecommunications and communications signal processing with understanding of radar system concepts and waveforms
Proficiency with Matlab, Linux and C/C++
Must be familiar with telecommunications and communications signal processing with understanding of radar system concepts and waveforms desired.
Experience with software defined radios and SDR frameworks like GNU radio and/or Redhawk/OSSIE is beneficial
Familiarity with GPU technology and the CUDA development environment and application of AI/ML to signal processing application is beneficial
A valid/clear driver's license is required


Special Requirements:


Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: San Antonio, Texas


For more information about this division, visit the Defense & Intelligence Solutions home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.1,"Southwest Research Institute
4.1","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
54,Software Engineer,$56k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"Software Engineer-AIT00039
Description

Prudential Financial is seeking a Software Engineer for the Global Technology organization supporting our Individual Solutions Group (ISG) businesses. This candidate will work with client management to identify and specify business requirements and processes for diverse development platforms computing environments e.g. host based distributed systems client server software hardware technologies and tools. Researches and evaluates alternative solutions and recommends the most efficient and cost effective solution for the systems design. Formulates logical statements of business problems and devises tests and implements efficient cost effective application program solutions e.g. codes and or reuses existing code through the use of program development software alternatives and or integrates purchased solutions. May give some direction and guidance to other systems analysts programmers. Prepares charts tables and diagrams to assist in analyzing problems utilizing various business scientific engineering and mathematical techniques. Analyzes existing system and programming logic to provide more efficient machine operations or to identify difficulties and revises the logic and procedures involved as necessary. Performs related duties as assigned or requested. May contribute towards application availability health checks and business continuation with a sense of urgency. May also assist with incident and problem resolution. Works independently receives minimal guidance. Acts as a resource for colleagues with less experience. Solves complex problems takes a new perspective using existing solutions.

Qualifications

Position Overview: Prudential’s Integration Team supports Annuities and Life Insurance business in enabling integrations of system where data is migrated, broadcasted, consolidated, aggregated and correlated. The team develops various patterns (API’s Microservices Stream Processors) and technologies (APIGEE, Spring Boot, Full/MEAN Stack, Message Broker, Kafka)

Responsibilities:

Working with various team in understanding business need, performing analysis and transforming them to testable components

Employ industry best practices to deliver world-class solutions. Ensure developed solutions remain compliant with all applicable Prudential standards, non-functional requirements and quality targets

Provide experienced software development skills to team and coordinate with other technical leaders across the organization

Drive software development activities to meet schedules and timelines

Thrive to ensure code quality is high supporting testing (component and integration tests) and automation

Research problems with a strong sense of ownership and develop solutions to address the problems

Stay abreast od emerging technologies and how they can be applied to Prudential

Enable change, help accelerate innovation

Demonstrating experience with taking intelligent risks and leveraging a “test and learn” mentality

Committed to a spirit of authentic partnership – to colleagues both internal and external to the organization

Qualifications:
Strong problem-solving and analysis capabilities
Clear, professional communications (listening, oral and written communications)
Strong relationship building and collaboration skills
Demonstrated track record as a team player

Preferred Qualifications:

Bachelor of Computer Science or Engineering or experience in related fields
Experience with agile development methodologies and Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Excellent problem-solving techniques
Ability to work independently with minimal guidance
Experience working on agile scrum teams or under a SAFe@ framework
A successful candidate will possess 5+ years of experience with the following:
Working knowledge of branching techniques and usage of Github or Bitbucket
Experience in distributed systems, object-oriented programming, design patterns and design methodology
Exposure to Kafka or a stream processor platform, desired but not required
Experience deploying applications to AWS, ECS, EC2 instances. Working knowledge of AWS Services such as Cloudwatch, CodeDeploy.
Experience with FULL/MEAN STACK a strong plus
Experience implementing service-oriented architecture (SOA) patterns
Experience with Web service technologies such as REST, JSON, SOAP, XML, JDBC, MySQL
Experience in JAVA/J2EE services using Spring Boot, Spring CLI, Maven, Microservice, multi-threading, Concurrency and parallel processing
Exposure to monitoring and logging techniques
Knowledge working with MongoDB or similar NoSQL database
Message Broker, desired but not required
Knowledge of Annuities and Insurance products a plus

Prudential is a multinational financial services leader with operations in the United States Asia Europe and Latin America. Leveraging its heritage of life insurance and asset management expertise Prudential is focused on helping individual and institutional customers grow and protect their wealth. The company’s well-known Rock symbol is an icon of strength stability expertise and innovation that has stood the test of time. Prudential's businesses offer a variety of products and services including life insurance annuities retirement-related services mutual funds asset management and real estate services. For more information please visit www.prudential.com.

Prudential is not accepting unsolicited resumes from search firms for this open position unless contracted with Staffing. Agencies must work with Staffing as the primary point of contact and follow the Prudential application process to be considered for business. All resumes submitted by search firms to any employee at Prudential via-email Internet or directly to hiring managers in any form without a valid written search agreement in place for that position will be deemed the sole property of Prudential and no fee will be paid in the event the candidate is hired by Prudential.
Note: Any search agreement entered into with Prudential before January 2004 is null and void. Search firms are essential to the recruitment and staffing efforts at Prudential and we value the partnerships we have built with our preferred vendors. Prudential has established and regularly maintains a preferred vendor list and even preferred vendors need to have a written search agreement signed by the Director Recruiting Programs Staffing at Prudential in place for the specific position in order for a fee to be paid for any candidate referrals.

Job Function Software/System Development
Primary Location United States-New Jersey-Roseland
Schedule Full-time
Travel No",3.7,"Prudential
3.7","Roseland, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1875,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
55,Computer Vision Software Engineer,$66k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"With time, CMOS image sensor (CIS) technology has evolved with dramatic improvement over the years. Finding usage in variety of applications such as mobile devices, IoT devices and robotics, it is now feasible to integrate computer vision and machine learning into a single CMOS chip at an attractive cost/performance point.

As SK hynix America, a research facility in San Jose, we are building a CIS Research and Development team located in San Jose R&D campus. In bringing great talent together, we are building a team of pathfinders to new technological developments in computer vision processor designs and AI hardware accelerators for next-generation CMOS Image Sensors.

With SK hynix America CIS team, you will work on state-of-the-art edge device computer vision. As a founding member of the team, you will have much freedom in initiating projects, and you will be working with highly motivated team members in a start-up environment.

Responsibilities:
With strong technical background, this position should lead and/or perform architect, design and development of classical and deep learning base computer vision pipelines.
With a start-up mindset, this position requires hands-on implementation of the computer vision architectures. This positions must work closely with HW team, and sensor design team to optimize the computer vision pipeline to the specific sensors.
Focuses are design of computer vision pipeline for object detection, object recognition, object tracking, and depth sensing but not limited to these pipelines.
This position may need to build the development environment if it is necessary.
Requirements:
PhD degree in Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Science or related degree
Experience in working with HW team to optimize the computer vision pipeline to reduce power, chie area, and memory BW.
Experience in optimizing DNN model parameters to reduce memory size.
Experience in computer vision architecture.
Experience in computer vision algorithm with both classical method and deep learning base method.
Deep understanding in computer vision chip architecture.
Proficient in C++, Python, Tensorflow, Caffe.
Start-up mindset.",3.7,"SK hynix America
3.7","San Jose, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
56,Senior 3D Vision & Signal Processing Engineer,$55k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior 3D Vision & Signal Processing Engineer

Springfield, VA

No Clearance Requirement

Rail Technologies

Job Description

ENSCO’s Applied Technology and Engineering (ATE) Division designs, develops, and manufactures precision, high speed, real-time inspection systems for the national and international transportation market. Here at ATE, we believe innovation is the key to our success and growth, so we work diligently to advance our technologies and to incorporate state of the art academic research methods. We are encouraged to apply for internal and external research grants and to develop and improve our solutions to better serve customer needs. In addition, we also believe in the importance of a healthy work-life balance and provide competitive compensation and benefits.

We are presently seeking a skilled computer vision engineer with a background in 3D computer vision and point cloud processing who has a strong understanding of signal processing to join our engineering staff and work with software, electrical, and computer vision engineers in the design, development, and support of our track inspection and computer vision oriented applications and products.

Responsibilities will include:
• Design, develop, and test 3D vision and point cloud processing algorithms for railroad and transportation applications.
• Provide signal processing solutions for incorporating sensors into new inspection technologies
• Perform software design, coding, integration and testing for the development of real-time and large-scale measurement and analysis systems.
• Model system performance and response.
• Develop detailed technical specifications.
• Provide accurate time estimates for design and development work.
• Create and maintain detailed technical documentation for internal and customer use.
• Support existing products through system and software changes, improvements, testing and release.
• Conduct field tests and provide customer support/troubleshooting

Want to learn more about working for ENSCO Rail?
Click the below link or copy/paste in your browser to view the ENSCO Rail Careers & Culture Handbook:
https://bit.ly/2Opq1sw

Qualifications Required (Skills)

Bachelor’s degree or equivalent in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, or related fields.
3 years’ relevant work experience.
Solid knowledge of 3D vision and point cloud processing.
Background knowledge of signal processing techniques.
Hands-on experience with 3D sensor interface and data formats.
Hands-on experience with 3D point filtering, feature extraction, and registration; 3D object segmentation, recognition, surface reconstruction, and visualization.
Proficiency in developing real-time software applications, using C++, for large scale computation.
Proficiency in algorithm prototyping and system modeling with MATLAB, Python, or other software.
Ability to perform system research, design, and analysis functions.
Ability to work independently and be self-motivated.
Excellent time management skills.
Excellent written and oral communications skills
Ability to climb a ladder 15 feet high to gain access to railway cars
Ability and willingness to travel up to 10% of the time

The selected candidate may be required to submit to fingerprinting, drug screening, and additional background investigations in connection with this position.

Wearing safety equipment (hardhat, steel-toe boots, protective vest and protective eyeglasses) when working on railroad properties is also a requirement. ENSCO will provide all necessary safety equipment.

Qualifications Desired

Master’s or PhD degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, or related fields
Experience developing 3D vision algorithm and software for railway or transportation related inspection applications
Experience in digital signal processing and filter design
Experience with GUI design and multi-thread programming in Qt
Competent knowledge and experience in applying and utilizing open source libraries and tools.
Competent knowledge and experience in distributed and scalable software design and development.
Experience with vision algorithm development and implementation on a GPU.
#LI-DM1

Req ID

1917BR

Internal Position Title

Software Engineer III

Employment Status

Regular Full-time

General Education/Years of Experience

BS or equiv; min 3 yrs relevant exp

U.S. Citizenship

No

Background Check Type

7 year

Drug Screen Type

None

Export Control and Licensing

This position may involve access to technology or technical data that is controlled under U.S. export control laws and regulations and the release of which to a foreign national may require an export license from the U.S. Government.

Contract Award Contingency

No

Recruiter

Deborah Morse

Division Description

ENSCO’s ATE Division is recognized globally as a leading provider of railway infrastructure inspection technology. Our products and services are provided to governments and railways in more than 12 countries on five continents. ENSCO work helps prevent train derailments and has a significant impact on the protection of human life, the environment and the economy.

Our team of more than 145 staff supports leading-edge technology projects in many exciting areas:
Sensor systems integration: inertial, positioning (GPS/RFID), laser scanners, imaging (line scan, area scan, thermal), ultrasonic, ground penetrating radar, LIDAR
Autonomous deployment of sensors, positioning systems and wireless communications on active rail cars to inspect railways
Machine vision algorithm development to detect conditions traditionally inspected by humans
Enterprise web-based data management systems to display, report and conduct big data analytics

ENSCO’s ATE Division is an exciting place to work and grow with many key benefits for technical staff, including:

“Innovation Fridays:” Staff is given time to create and experiment with new processes, best practices, and technologies in their field.
Involvement in all levels of the design and development process: Significant experience is gained that is not always available at larger companies that typically reserve serious engineering tasks for more seasoned staff.
Direct exposure to customer management, financial management and business development.

Working in ENSCO’s Rail Division provides a means to acquire a wide range of practical skills and experience in a short period of time, work on exciting and ground-breaking technology projects that impact transportation safety and offers domestic and international travel opportunities if desired.

ENSCO provides a stimulating, collaborative, multi-discipline environment with coworkers from diverse technical and cultural backgrounds working together to make the world a safer place. Come join a stable and growing company and experience the reward of seeing the results of your work make a real impact on solving some of the world’s most challenging problems.

Strength in Diversity

ENSCO, Inc. and its wholly owned U.S. subsidiaries are equal opportunity/affirmative action employers, committed to diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status, or any other protected characteristic under state or local law.",3.6,"ENSCO, Inc.
3.6","Springfield, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1969,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
57,Senior Engineer,$55k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"British American Tobacco
Job Number: 28238

Reynolds American Incorporated is positively transforming the tobacco industry. We’re a family of companies that strives for success in everything we do. The future inspires us because our people are igniting the breakthroughs that are redefining the ways adult tobacco consumers enjoy tobacco in the 21st century.

When other companies talk about growth, they only talk about size. At Reynolds American, we focus on the growth of our people. We take pride in each other’s growth and well-being throughout our careers. We invest in your career and total well-being because we know our companies succeed when our people thrive.

ABOUT OUR ORGANIZATION:

Reynolds American Inc. is an indirect, wholly owned subsidiary of British American Tobacco p.l.c., and the U.S. parent company of R. J. Reynolds Tobacco Company; Santa Fe Natural Tobacco Company, Inc.; American Snuff Company, LLC; Modoral Brands, Inc.; R. J. Reynolds Vapor Company; Lorillard Licensing Company, LLC; Reynolds Brands, Inc.; and Vuse Stores LLC. This position is with American Snuff Company, LLC (4040).

Here, you’ll have the opportunity to work on iconic brands and revolutionary products by collaborating with visionary, principled and passionate people every day.

Job Summary:

This position manages technical related projects, with emphasis on providing technical leadership for functional area or specific engineering field of expertise. The role proactively initiates and drives projects or segments of projects consistent with RAI strategic business and continuous improvement plans; develops project proposals, scopes, and implementation plans ensuring appropriate stakeholder participation and holistic process approach; and aligns with resources across the organization to ensure delivery of results. The role serves as a technical resource to broader organization, providing technical information, guidance, and engineering recommendations that support broader project initiatives and technical training requirements, and may lead or coordinate the work of others.

Principal Duties and Responsibilities:
Demonstrated proficiency in functional processes, technology, and engineering practices.
Engage with internal business partners to ensure that technical decisions are based on the broad vision of the organization and achieve optimum results.
Develop and ensure appropriate timelines, milestones, cost estimates, and project objectives are achieved
Identify, evaluate, specify, and select appropriate technologies, vendors, and construction services consistent with short-term and long-term requirements
Assist with negotiations with third party suppliers and equipment manufacturers in the development, evaluation, coordination, and resolution of issues.
Ensure project evaluations and implementations are in line with economic, personnel, environmental, product quality, machine performance, and engineering related requirements.
Identify and drive innovative solutions to address business/process opportunities and issues.
Develops partnership with external vendors, agencies, suppliers, and service providers to drive business success and enhance effectiveness of processes.
Drives continuous improvement by identifying root cause of issues and implementing new methods or technology to enhance effectiveness and drive business success.
Manage capital projects including estimating, specifying equipment, controlling project costs and maintaining project timelines.
The role is approximately 80% execution, 20% strategic in nature.
Job Requirements:

Education
Sr. Engineer: Bachelor of Science Degree in Engineering or: Licensure as a Professional Engineer, with 2+ years of progressive experience.
Sr. Engineering Technologist: Associate Degree in Engineering or related field with 2+ years of progressive experience or; 5+ years of relevant progressive work experience in a technical field.
Experience
Previous experience with project management
Exposure to industry and technology trends in order to identify opportunities
Required Skills:
Analytical problem solving, and decision making skills
Understanding of engineering practices, standards, design principles, and environmental requirements
Knowledge of manufacturing and packaging of consumer goods
Project management skills with the ability to lead or support the execution of projects
Demonstrated ability to lead a cross functional team
Demonstrated ability to work efficiently, be pro-active, and communicate effectively with team members and management
Proficiency in computer skills (Microsoft Office Suite, etc.) and the ability to quickly learn new computer skills
Excellent interpersonal, oral, and written communication skills
Demonstrated ability to perform with urgency
Preferred Skills:
Engineering experience within a regulated environment.
Proficiency in Computer Aided Design (CAD) applications.
Physical Requirements:
Regular attendance at work.
LIMITATIONS AND DISCLAIMER:

The above information on this description has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job. The Company reserves the right to change or modify job descriptions and employee job duties. Requirements are representative of minimum levels of knowledge, skills and/or abilities. To perform this job successfully, the employee must possess the abilities or aptitudes to perform each duty proficiently. Employees will be required to follow any other job-related instructions and to perform other job-related duties requested by their supervisor in compliance with Federal and State Laws.

Compensation/Targeted Bonus
Competitive Annual Salary
Targeted Annual Bonus
Relocation assistance available for those who qualify.
Benefit Summary

Our company offers very competitive benefit plans, including:
401(k) plan that offers opportunity to save on pre- and post-tax basis up to 50 percent of eligible compensation. Company matches 100 percent of employee pre-tax/Roth (401k) contributions up to six percent
Comprehensive health- and welfare-benefits package
Eleven paid company holidays annually, plus a generous paid vacation plan based on length of service
Company-paid sick and personal days, funeral leave and jury duty leave
Confidential personal financial counseling service
On-site health clinics and fitness centers
A matching grants program that enables employees to direct and double their donations to qualifying charitable organizations of their choice
Health-care advocacy service
Volunteer service opportunities
Federal credit union membership through Allegacy Federal Credit Union
Extensive training opportunities
Reynolds American Inc. and its affiliated companies is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action Employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, or disability status.

Our organization offers a level of challenge, responsibility and creativity for motivated employees that stands apart from the crowd.

We are also committed to employing a diverse workforce and valuing different perspectives, experiences and talents to maximize the company's potential for successfully achieving its business objectives.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Only applicants requiring reasonable accommodation for any part of the application and hiring process should contact us directly via email at TalentAcquisition@RJRT.com.

California Privacy Notice

Nearest Major Market: Clarksville
Nearest Secondary Market: Nashville
Job Segment:
Manufacturing Engineer, Engineer, Construction, Drafting, CAD, Engineering",3.3,"Reynolds American
3.3","Clarksville, TN",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1875,Company - Private,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
58,Data Scientist,$88k-$148k (Glassdoor Est.),"POSITION SUMMARY:

The Data Scientist is a highly motivated and experienced individual who likes to work in a multi-disciplinary team. The Data Scientist will be instrumental in the analysis and interpretation of high-throughput molecular data. Additionally, the individual in this role should have solid Data Science background and be strongly goal-oriented with a focus on real-world impact.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Statistical and bioinformatics analyses of high-throughput molecular data
Interaction with internal and external collaborators to understand, design, and develop the requested solutions
Development and execution of data analysis protocols to support the company's discovery pipeline
Presentation of scientific results internally and externally
Preparation and submission of scientific manuscripts for review and publication
Other duties as assigned
REQUIREMENTS:
Requires a Ph.D. in Bioinformatics, Statistics, Applied Math, Computer Sciences or related field with 0-3 years of experience; or an MS with 5-7 years of industry experience
Proficiency in R is required. Experience in Bioconductor is preferred
Experience in Linux and Big Data technologies
Experience in Scala, C, Python and MySQL is a plus
Experience in working with Graph Neural Networks (GNNs) is a plus
Proven ability to find creative and practical solutions to complex problems
Proven experience in applying Data Science methodologies to extract, process, and transform data from multiple sources
Proven ability to deliver outputs in a comprehensive format that highlights major trends, avoid miss-interpretations and value the conclusions
Proven ability to demonstrate attention to detail and record-keeping
Quick learner, extremely flexible and adaptable to the needs of internal collaborators in a dynamic environment
Ability to efficiently work in multiple projects
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills
Must be able to work in a team-oriented environment",4.2,"Berg Health
4.2","Framingham, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
59,ENGINEER - RESEARCH ENGINEER - MUSCULOSKELETAL BIOMECHANICS,$51k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:


Join our Mechanical Engineering team to conduct innovative research for a wide range of commercial and military biomechanics and human performance applications utilizing advanced computational and experimental techniques. Use advanced motion capture systems and other sensor data (e.g. force plate, EMG, IMU, etc.) in combination with biomechanical modeling and simulation to determine the performance of the human body during various activities including physical rehabilitation, physical athletic training, and other human performance applications. Interact and engage with commercial and government clients to develop solutions that fit their requirements. Write and present reports and technical papers and manage the technical and financial performance of projects. Participate in and eventually lead individual and collaborative research projects as well as develop, promote, and write proposals for research and development programs.


Education/Experience:


Requires a MS degree or PhD degree in Mechanical Engineering, Engineering Mechanics, or Biomedical Engineering or closely related engineering degree with 0-5 years of experience. Must have at least a 3.25 GPA. Must have experience in developing multi-body dynamics models of musculoskeletal systems, experience with commercial motion capture systems, force plates, wearable sensors, and EMG. Must have experience with commercial and open source biomechanical modeling software and programming languages such as OpenSim, AnyBody, Python, or Matlab. Must have the ability to work collaboratively n a multidisciplinary team environment as well as individually. Must have excellent problem-solving skills, be self-motivated, and be driven to solve challenging problems. Must have good organizational skills and attention to detail with an aptitude for continuous learning and leadership potential. Excellent verbal and written communication skills are required. Experience and interest in advanced data analysis methods, uncertainty analysis or probabilistic mechanics, experimental methods and data collection, machine vision, machine learning, and deep neural networks is desired. A valid/clear driver's license is required.


Special Requirements:


Job Locations: San Antonio, Texas


For more information about this division, visit the Mechanical Engineering home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.1,"Southwest Research Institute
4.1","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
60,Senior Data Scientist,$110k-$176k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Overview:
Age of Learning is a leading education technology innovator based in Glendale, California, with a talented team of more than 600 individuals comprised of nationally-renowned educators, curriculum experts, developers, artists, writers, designers, engineers, producers, product managers, analysts and marketing experts! Together we develop engaging, effective digital learning technology and content to help children build a strong academic foundation for lifelong success.
Our flagship product ABCmouse.com Early Learning Academy® is a comprehensive online curriculum and the #1 digital learning product for young children. To-date, more than 30 million children worldwide have completed over 7 billion Learning Activities on ABCmouse. We recently launched Adventure Academy, the first massively multiplayer online (MMO) game designed specifically to help elementary- and middle-school-aged children learn. It features thousands of engaging Learning Activities—including minigames, books, original animated and live action series, and more—in a fun and safe virtual world. Other Age of Learning programs include immersive English language learning products for children in China and Japan; ReadingIQ, a digital library and literacy platform; and a groundbreaking personalized, adaptive digital learning system that individualizes math instruction for every child through AI-driven technology.

We are committed to helping all children succeed. We provide our educational programs at no cost to teachers, Head Start programs, public libraries, and other community organizations, and have served millions of children through these initiatives. We recently established the Age of Learning Foundation to expand this work globally.
As we expand our global reach and increase the educational impact of our programs, we’re looking for passionate, ambitious, and collaborative leaders to become a part of our growing team.


Summary:
We are seeking a strong, highly-motivated, results-oriented Senior Data Scientist to help conduct in-depth analyses and derive relevant insights. You will be an integral part of a newly-formed central analytics team and your work will influence business operations and strategy throughout the company.
In this senior role, you will be the go-to person for advanced analytics and data science projects as well as mentoring and assisting junior analysts on our centralized data and analytics team as need be.
Responsibilities:
Partner closely with stakeholders from a variety of teams, including the executive team, curriculum, brand marketing, partnerships, strategy and customer success, to surface insights and learnings that solve key business challenges
Develop statistical analyses and build and deploy machine learning models to understand and predict customer behavior and product performance
Create, report and interpret key metrics to assess performance, measure the impact of strategic initiatives, and identify ways to grow revenue and reduce costs
Drive A/B and multivariate testing strategy and implementation of user behavior to inform media tactics, audience acquisition and targeting, churn, lifetime value, product and content recommendations and personalized experiences
Create beautiful visualizations
Communicate results to technical and non-technical stakeholders and mentor/lead more junior analysts as needed
Drive data capture and data integrity requirements while partnering with other teams so that the right data is captured
Maintain vigilant eye on data quality
Develop frameworks, models, tools, and processes to ensure data-driven decisions across org
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative field and 5+ years of experience in professional data-intensive role excluding any independent data-related projects or internships that may or may not have been part of an undergraduate program
OR Master’s and/or Ph.D. in a quantitative field and 3+ years of experience in professional data-intensive role excluding any independent data-related projects or internships that may or may not have been part of an graduate program
Advanced knowledge of analytical, statistical and machine learning methods
Proficiency in SQL and complex SQL querying
Experience modeling in R and/or Python
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Proven ability to explain technical concepts to non-technical stakeholders
Must be intellectually curious, self-motivated, collaborative, and a team player
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience productionalizing models a plus
Experience with testing and optimization a plus, ideally in a digital environment
Experience in games or education a plus
We Provide:
Medical, Dental, Vision + 401k
Highly competitive PTO policy
Casual Dress Code
Snacks + Drinks (Coca Cola Freestyle Machine)
Gaming room including an Arcade (2,000+ games)
Frequent team and company outings
Limitless opportunities for professional growth!",3.1,"Age of Learning
3.1","Glendale, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,K-12 Education,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
61,Senior System Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE),$66k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior System Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE)
Job Description:
Title: Senior System Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE)
Location: Remote Eligible
About your role
Youll work on the execution engine of an analytics database that is used by thousands of enterprise customers, around the world, each with unique requirements.
Youll implement high-performance, scalable, and distributed execution frameworks capable of crunching petabytes of data. Use your algorithmic skills to tune low-level system code and make queries run orders of magnitude faster, using fewer resources, and increasing the overall query throughput.
Its an exciting time to join the team. There is high demand for innovative functionality and our engineers are constantly thinking of new ways to do things faster.
Required skills
C and an object-orientated language (e.g. C++ or Java)
Proficient with multi-threaded applications
Customer focused with the ability to work in a cross-functional team with QA, documentation and others
Advanced knowledge of algorithms and data structures
Excellent communication
Desired skills
Database internals
Distributed systems
Operating systems
Ability to read assembly
Willingness and ability to mentor interns and junior team members
SQL, Postgres, SQL Server, Oracle
About our team
The best ideas often come from fresh perspectives. At Vertica, our open-minded, diverse and inclusive team is always learning from each other. We approach intellectually challenging work with a ""get it done"" attitude. Vertica Engineers are given significant latitude and support to pursue what they are passionate about to make Vertica an even better place. If you are excited about building great technology with a proactive team, you will find yourself in good company at Vertica. Welcome to the family.
About our product
Vertica is a recognized leader in analytics powering some of the worlds most data driven organizations like Uber, Wayfair, Intuit, Cerner, and more. Our columnar, MPP, distributed database delivers unprecedented speed, petabyte scale, with analytics and machine learning functions built into the core.
We believe the future belongs to the fast. Join us for the ride!
#LI-GC2
#DiceGC

Job:
Engineering
Micro Focus is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Prospective employees will receive consideration without discrimination because of race, colour, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, marital or veteran status, sexual orientation, genetic information, citizenship or any other legally protected status",3.3,"Micro Focus
3.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
62,Project lead - Systems engineer,-1,"L&T Technology Services Limited (LTTS) is a listed subsidiary of Larsen & Toubro Limited focused on Engineering and R&D (ER&D) services. We offer consultancy, design, development and testing services across the product and process development life cycle. Our customer base includes 52 Fortune 500 companies and 51 of the world’s top ER&D companies, across industrial products, medical devices, transportation, telecom & hi-tech, and the process industries. Headquartered in India, we have over 14,700 employees spread across 17 global design centers, 27 global sales offices and 48 innovation labs as of December 31, 2018. For additional information about L&T Technology Services log on to www.LntTechservices.com

Experience Range
5 -7 Years

Job Description & Skill Requirement
The project lead/system engineer role involves system and software design activities as it pertains to the camera and radar based detection systems which provide increased operator awareness for construction and mining machines.
The engineer will work within an immediate team of 4-5 engineers and with numerous internal process partner teams (software and systems). The engineer will be responsible for creating detailed design documentation with internal development teams.
System engineering responsibilities include, but are not limited to: o Gathering requirements from internal customers, process partners, and regulatory teams
o Creating and managing detailed design documentation (system, hardware, software)
o Develop the system architecture
o Participate in use case development
o Support system level activities with our operator & safety systems team
o Participate or support EMC system level tests
o Travel to proving ground or customer sites for test support when needed
Software engineering responsibilities include, but are not limited to: o Develop software requirements based on system level requirements
o Support software activities with our internal process partners
o Participate in test case development
o Occasionally perform software verification on concept flash files
o Coordinate feature development across the system
o Validate that project deliverables are completed correctly
o Troubleshoot identified software/system defects
o Investigate source code implementation (C/C++) as needed
o Travel to proving ground or customer sites for test support when needed
The candidate must have: o Excellent written and verbal communication (ability to coordinate with global teams)
o 3+ years of experience creating and managing requirements & detailed design documentation
o 1+ year of experience with CAN/J1939 communication and CANalyzer
o 1+ year of experience with perception technology (RADAR, LIDAR, Ethernet/LVDS cameras)
o 1+ year of experience with Ethernet/image associated protocols (UDP, TCP, AVB, etc)
o Ability to debug in C/C++ developer environments
Top candidates will have: o Familiarity with Agile development practices and methodologies
o Experience with machine learning algorithms, Kalman filtering, image processing
o Familiarity with advanced driver assist systems
#IND123",4.1,"L&T TECHNOLOGY SERVICES LIMITED
4.1","Peoria, IL",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
63,Software Development Engineer,$127k-$187k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are seeking passionate and driven Software Development Engineers who love solving big problems using well-designed and elegantly-written code. You’ll be working on cutting-edge technologies, including Big Data, Cloud Services, Analytics, Visualization, and Machine Learning to solve real-world problems for some of the biggest and most respected Fortune 500 companies in the world.
Responsibilities
Design and develop sophisticated on-premise and cloud-based software
Engage directly with major Adaptiva customers to help define the functionality of current and future Adaptiva products
Work collaboratively with product marketing, sales, solutions engineering, and support teams to ensure that Adaptiva products deliver outstanding experiences to all our customers
Requirements
Bachelors or Masters degree in Computer Science or Engineering
1-3 years of proven software development experience using C, C++, C#, or Java
Demonstrated ability to design and develop high quality code
Excellent knowledge of data structures, algorithms, and object oriented programming
Ability to develop multi-threaded, asynchronous code, using extensive synchronization mechanisms
Experience with high-volume, high-performance transaction processing systems or other high-performance client-server software
Willingness to write design documents and specifications
APPLY NOWAPAC Support ResourceBusiness Development RepresentativeMarketing Events ManagerProduct Marketing ManagerRecruiterSenior Product ManagerSoftware Development EngineerSr. Software Development EngineerSenior Solutions Architect, USHOW TO APPLY
Email your resume and cover letter to Company
Adaptiva is a leading, global enterprise systems management company headquartered in Bellevue, WA. Our breakthrough peer-to-peer distributed computing technology is trusted by hundreds of large enterprises around the world. Our environment and culture incorporate our four core values: Integrity, Excellence, Work Ethic, and Dignity of Labor. As an employer, we offer above-market compensation structures, industry-leading benefits packages, and incredible learning and growth opportunities, in a fast-paced and collaborative environment.
Job Summary
We are seeking passionate and driven Software Development Engineers who love solving big problems using well-designed and elegantly-written code. You’ll be working on cutting-edge technologies, including Big Data, Cloud Services, Analytics, Visualization, and Machine Learning to solve real-world problems for some of the biggest and most respected Fortune 500 companies in the world.
Responsibilities
Design and develop sophisticated on-premise and cloud-based software
Engage directly with major Adaptiva customers to help define the functionality of current and future Adaptiva products
Work collaboratively with product marketing, sales, solutions engineering, and support teams to ensure that Adaptiva products deliver outstanding experiences to all our customers
Requirements
Bachelors or Masters degree in Computer Science or Engineering
1-3 years of proven software development experience using C, C++, C#, or Java
Demonstrated ability to design and develop high quality code
Excellent knowledge of data structures, algorithms, and object oriented programming
Ability to develop multi-threaded, asynchronous code, using extensive synchronization mechanisms
Experience with high-volume, high-performance transaction processing systems or other high-performance client-server software
Willingness to write design documents and specifications",3.8,"Adaptiva
3.8","Kirkland, WA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
64,Senior Systems Software Engineer Database Operations at Vertica (US - REMOTE),$88k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Systems Software Engineer Database Operations at Vertica (US - REMOTE)

Job Description:
Title: Senior Systems Software Engineer Database Operations at Vertica (US - REMOTE)

Location: Remote Eligible

Vertica believes that each of us knows the work environment that makes us the most productive. Thats why we provide our employees with the ability to work how and where they will be the most successful. We enable a flexible approach to work location, meaning for roles where it makes sense, you can work from the office or from home, or a combination of both, but you make that choice including where you choose to live. Vertica invests in the best technologies and provides flexible benefits and collaborative work environments to empower employees to work productively in the setting that meets their personal needs. Thats why were so proud to have a highly productive and engaged team in every function of the company.

About your role
The Vertica Ecosystem Team is looking for an experienced software engineer and python expert to help us take our Big Data Analytics Platform to the next level.

Our team is responsible for the components that enable deployment and operation of our distributed database: installation, upgrade, orchestration, administration, configuration, and diagnostics. Our users experience these parts of the product first and rely on these components during critical points in their deployments lifetime. In this role you will make contributions that impact Verticas entire customer base and help us expand to new customers who want to deploy in novel ways.

We need a self-directed engineer who is capable of solving problems in diverse areas, including:
Distributed systems
Systems programming
Networking
Operating system integration
The candidates responsibilities will include:
Design and implement features in the Vertica Analytics Platform to improve distributed database installation, upgrade, orchestration, administration, configuration, and diagnostics
Define requirements for new features in collaboration with Product Managers, Support Engineers, and customers
Diagnose, debug, and resolve product issues discovered during the development process and coming from customers
Influence the design of other in-database features based on their interaction with the deployment mechanisms
Provide technical leadership and support for junior members of the team by conducting thorough design and code reviews
The recommended requirements the candidate should meet are:
Bachelor, Masters, or PhD in Computer Science, Engineering, or related field
At least 4 years of experience working full time as a software engineer
Strong understanding of data structures, algorithms, and software engineering practices for sustainable development
Strong working knowledge of python3
Experience writing software for Linux and working on the command line
Familiarity with popular cloud deployment, provisioning and infrastructure-as-code tools

About our team
The best ideas often come from fresh perspectives. At Vertica, our open-minded, diverse and inclusive team is always learning from each other. We approach intellectually challenging work with a ""get it done"" attitude. Vertica Engineers are given significant latitude and support to pursue what they are passionate about to make Vertica an even better place. If you are excited about building great technology with a proactive team, you will find yourself in good company at Vertica. Welcome to the family.
About our product
Vertica is a recognized leader in analytics powering some of the worlds most data driven organizations like Uber, Wayfair, Intuit, Cerner, and more. Our columnar, MPP, distributed database delivers unprecedented speed, petabyte scale, with analytics and machine learning functions built into the core.
We believe the future belongs to the fast. Join us for the ride!

#LI-GC2
#DiceGC

Job:

Engineering

Micro Focus is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Prospective employees will receive consideration without discrimination because of race, colour, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, marital or veteran status, sexual orientation, genetic information, citizenship or any other legally protected status",3.3,"Micro Focus
3.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
65,Computer Vision Software Engineer,-1,"We are actively recruiting for this role, with all interviews, hiring and new hire on-boarding being done virtually. The start date is immediate, with work to be performed remotely until bans for onsite work are lifted.

Alaant is now recruiting for a Computer Vision Software Engineer to support the work of a leading software research and development company. Our client specializes in computer vision, data and analytics, scientific computing, medical computing, and software process. This company works with and develops solutions for Fortune 500 companies along with government and academic laboratories worldwide.

What you will do:
Design and implement large scale frameworks using C++ to conduct high level algorithms while working cross-functionally using various platforms from desktop to cloud infrastructure. You will also be working with object detection, image manipulation along with 3D detection to name a few.

Why this is a great job!
You will be given the opportunity to work on large scale projects that will stretch you
You will be working with computer vision, machine learning and artificial intelligence technologies and be part of various test sites
You will collaborate with leaders in this space and collaborate with professionals nationally & worldwide
What you will bring:
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, master’s degree preferred
3-5 years’ experience as Software Developer
Strong C++ skills
Experience with designing and implementing complex systems
Experience with optimizing code
Experience with Python a plus
Experience with GPU a plus
Strong knowledge of Computer Vision applications
Strong verbal communication
Military Occupation Specialty (M.O.S) Code Equivalents:
Army: 255A, Marine: 4025, Navy: DP

For more details on this role contact:
Megan Ermalowicz, Talent Acquisition Manager megan.ermalowicz@alaant.com 518-689-0710 phone

This is an active role, with an immediate start date. All hiring and on boarding will be done virtually.

Due to government/contractual restrictions, only candidates that are US Persons (citizens, permanent residents, green card) will be considered.

Alaant Workforce Solutions wants all interested applicants to know we are hiring a diverse workforce and are actively recruiting candidates in accordance with diversity, inclusion and equal opportunity policies.

Connect with us on LinkedIn, Facebook, Twitter, Instagram & Glassdoor

At Alaant we believe in People First! We Care. We Listen & We Support.

www.alaant.com",5.0,"Alaant Workforce Solutions
5.0","Albany, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
66,Electrical Engineer (1 yr manufacturing exp required),-1,"Job Description: Electrical Engineer

Reporting Status: Salary

Directly reports to: Manager of Engineering

Overview:

The primary focus is reducing costs thru process improvement by the reduction and/or improvement of material utilization, job quality capability, overall pack efficiency and cycle time/machine speed. Increase productivity by integrating electronic and mechanical systems to support production and engineering. Including but not limited to computer systems, software, hardware, vision systems and automation. The role is responsible for keeping current with technology and employ best practices for improving, process’s, equipment, devices, systems or machinery.

Goals:

• Work on technical projects, tasks and electrical breakdowns.

• Support and develop PLC logic and electronic devices.

• Develop process’s through documentation, DOE, root cause analysis & trail/error.

• Measure and document improvements thru provided systems and documentation to ensure knowledge learned is properly delivered and transferred in a Winning Team approach.

• Reduce ACT COST to STD COST and this will be the direct result of the above mentioned goals.

• Integrate all platforms to properly communicate and work as required. (Business system, quality systems, SCADA systems and shop floor data collection)

• Lead IT support for all computers, printers, switches, routers, scanners and other future equipment in both the front office and production buildings.

• Communicate status of projects and tasks.

Responsibilities:

• Support/implement PLC, AC/DC Drives, servo/stepper motors/controllers, all vision systems, pneumatic system, sensors, etc., as required.

• Communicate improvements to dept. and staff personnel

• Improve processes and monitor results

• Document and make recommendation to improve production and reduce costs.

• Continued support and practice 5S.

• Support all computers, printers, switches, routers, scanners and other future equipment in both the front office and production buildings.

• Communicate status of projects and tasks.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $70,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

COVID-19 considerations:
We have established Prevention & Control Protocols for Covid-19. Management meets every morning at 8:30 to review current state information about Covid-19. Every employee and visitor is pre-screened before entering the building. Masks are required.

Experience:
Manufacturing: 1 year (Required)
electrical engineering: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"Richland Glass Company
4.0","Cumberland, NJ",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
67,Senior Full Stack Engineer/ Leader,-1,"Position Summary: Senior Full Stack Engineer/Leader
The Opportunity: Leadership at an extremely innovative cloud security startup
Must Have Requirements:
8+ years of SW development building highly available enterprise systems
6+ years of full stack development. Experience to include the following:
React: Multi-page web applications using React and Material
Python, Golang, NodeJS, etc.
Client-side JavaScript, CSS, SQL
4+ years of cloud development experience; ideally with AWS
Must be a Player/Coach
Prolific coder with demonstrable experience as a system level architect
Leadership experience with multiple direct reports
Ability to create realistic schedules and manage cross disciplinary projects
Demonstrable experience managing off-shore teams either contracted or FTEs
Detailed Job Description
This is an opportunity for a skilled architect and full stack developer to work alongside a team of creative and talented software engineers who are building an industry-leading, cloud-native, next generation email security platform. Help us beat bad actors and make a difference to millions of users.
The ideal candidate will be comfortable working with a multi-tenant, highly scalable, microserviced infrastructure with demonstrable experience therein. In addition to contributing significantly to product development, the successful candidate will be comfortable mentoring other members of the team, serving as a key voice in the product management process, and helping to ensure on-time delivery of high-quality code which protects our customers’ mission critical communication systems.
The ideal candidate has the following additional experience:
Tools including the following:
Kubernetes, Docker, Jaeger, Jenkins, etc.
ElasticSearch, Redis, PostgreSQL, Cassandra, etc.
Kafka, RabbitMQ, nginx, Kubernetes, Docker
HA architectural development experience
Bonus: Cybersecurity and startup experience

Team
You will be joining a highly talented team made up of security start-up experts who care deeply about their customers. This team is passionate about safeguarding the mission critical communication capabilities of businesses globally. We are fanatically driven to make one of the most basic communication modalities, email, safe and secure to use in a world which is not only constantly evolving, but which is constantly under attack with phishing attempts, identity theft, ransomware, and more.
We are a “work family”. As such, we are highly selective as to who we ask to join. However, if we mutually agree that it makes sense, you will be joining a highly collaborative, supportive, skilled, thoughtful, and intellectually curious group of people who are focused on making GreatHorn a great place to work!
Benefits
We offer competitive salaries, stock options, medical, vision, and dental insurance, a matched 401k, unlimited vacation time, a fully stocked kitchen, and weekly catered team lunches.
About GreatHorn
GreatHorn is disrupting the email security industry to better protect organizations against advanced email threats through modern data analytics, machine learning, and cloud-native design. Our execution of this mission has driven triple-digit growth for three years in a row, and we’re poised to accelerate that growth in the coming year.
Run by a team of cybersecurity veterans with a track record of success, we solve a pervasive problem with smart technology, employ clever people with common sense from diverse backgrounds, and adhere to a “No A**holes” policy. If that sounds like a place you’d fit in, we hope you’ll come join us!
We believe strongly in diversity, and seek to recognize, develop, and support talent from all backgrounds.
To apply for this position, email your resume to jluciani@greathorn.com",4.8,"GreatHorn
4.8","Waltham, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
68,Machine Shop Mfg Engineer,-1,"We are looking for an experienced Manufacturing Engineer, machining discipline. GNB KL group is a custom manufacturer of vacuum products for Aerospace, Space, Industrial vacuum and National Lab vacuum products. Including large custom vacuum chambers, large custom vacuum valves and associated product. GNB KL builds equipment that makes a difference in the world in the area of leading-edge technology. Feel free to look us up on the internet.
Requirements: *
Manufacturing background with shop floor experience a plus.
Experience supporting machining operations.
Experience with TPS, Lean Manufacturing and 5s.
Six Sigma Green Belt or Black a plus.
Experience with GD&T, Master cam, Solid works, Mastercam all pluses.
Advanced understanding of overall machining and manufacturing practices.
Able to effectively manage time, meet deadlines, lean new task.
Flexible, able to adapt easily to shifting priorities and adjust to change in a fast-paced manufacturing environment.
Highly organized with meticulous attention to detail and follow through.
Strong interpersonal, verbal and written communication skills.
Able to work in a team environment. And take direction well.
3,4,5 axis programming
This job as machining manufacturing engineer could lead to a supervisory position.
Extensive knowledge of theoretical and practical aspects of machining and programming, cutting tools, holders and associated technology. Extensive troubleshooting skills.
Use proper feeds, speeds, cutting tools and other cutting parameters based on materials
Must be able to design fixtures, and tooling, Holding and fixturing design a must
Support set up on new work. Help upgrade existing fixturing for productivity enhancements.
Probe and tool experience.
Must have s good understanding of cutting tools
Required 3D machining expert
Knowledge of machining processes, tooling, metal cutting processes.
Adapts or creates tooling and fixtures to complete a machining assignment.
Develop and test CNC mill programs for new product and complex production parts by determining sequencing, tooling, reference points, machine cutting paths, hole location, computing angular and linear dimensions, radii and curvatures.
General Requirements: *
Ability to speak and write in English, knowledge of shop safety practices.
Motivated self-starter.
Desire to satisfy and exceed customer requirements
Pride in workmanship.
Ability to take ownership in a project from quote and process input to programming, fixturing, set up, run and inspection.
Desire to work with and transfer knowledge to others.
Manual editing on floor.
Computer and Microsoft Office skills a must.
Ability to post new programs, develop standardized document packages showing tooling and set up information.
Direct hire position. Pay depends on experience.
Must have a very good mechanical ability.
Read and understand Prints.
Work closely with other operators for quality, productivity and troubleshooting have a sense of urgency.
This is not an entry level position.
Must be able to work well with others
Design a process to enhance the Set-up process for one off custom parts.
Excellent work ethic and dependability
Multitask in a fast-paced environment effectively while meeting deadlines with frequent changes and interruptions.
Excellent organizational skills, verbal and written communication skills.
Creates, verifies and communicates machine set up instructions and tool lists.
Troubleshoots and assesses new and current manufacturing processes applying appropriate machining solutions.
Develops and maintains positive and respectful relationships with engineering team, quality, machine shop and all other personnel.
Advanced problem-solving skills.
Position Duties and Responsibilities: *
Responsible for continuous improvement activities, Cycle time improvements, Labor reduction through process improvements.
Planning and budgeting for machine maintenance and part replacement.
Communicate with other departments on lessons learned, benchmarking, best practices.
Provide technical support for maintenance and production as required.
Quick learner and Strong mechanical ability.
Gather requirements from customer drawings and models and create robust manufacturing plans.
Interface with Master Scheduling to assess capacity and implement achievable schedules.
Work closely with CNC programmers to optimize tool paths and reduce set ups.
Flow down all process specifications to job travelers and ensure alignment of manufacturing and processing with customer needs.
Maintain awareness of emerging cutting tool technology and assist with tool selection. Develop and implement manufacturing process improvements by applying knowledge of product design, fabrication, assembly, tooling, and materials.
Education / Experience: *
Prefer Bachelor of science in Mechanical, Mechanical Aerospace, Industrial or Manufacturing Engineering. Would consider extensive high-end machining experience in 3d multi axis machines and programming with knowledge in the areas listed in this document. We are a custom machine shop and manufacturing facility.
Benefits: *
Health, Dental, Vision, 401k and paid time off. Professional Development Assistance, Tuition Reimbursement. Occasional Travel.
Job Type: Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: Up to $35.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",-1,GNB KL Group,"Elk Grove, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
69,Senior Mechanical Engineer,-1,"The Company

EME leverages its deep engineering expertise, proprietary software, and product design knowledge to provide full lifecycle solutions for power generators. In particular, the Company uprates, adapts and repurposes a wide variety of conventional and renewable generators and their auxiliaries, focused primarily on turbo, hydro, pumped storage, and wind. This adaption and repurposing significantly enhances an asset’s value by improving its ability to support the evolving power grid.
The Company is a leading independent provider of custom engineered generator solutions, including: *
*Analysis*
*Product development*
*Innovative design*
*Manufacturing *
*Field installation services *
As a well-known enabling partner for many of the largest engineering and service organizations in its markets, EME is trusted by major corporate and utility customers to design, build, install and retrofit their largest generation assets. With a 35+ year history, EME is recognized as a technical expert for custom design, maintenance and operation of utility scale generators, motors, and auxiliary components. Its management and employees are highly experienced across all business lines and have an average of 10+ years with the Company, with a solid track record of developing new engineering talent.
Job Title: *Senior Mechanical Engineer
Reports to: *Manager, Engineering Services
Primary Work Location: * Monroeville, PA Headquarters
Employee Classification: *Full time exempt
Core Work Hours: *8:00 am – 5:00 pm Monday through Friday
Travel: *Required approximately 10-25%
Eligibility for Flexible Work Arrangements: *
Eligible for work from home with manager approval
Position Summary*
The Senior Engineer is a key part of EME’s Engineering Services Team and is responsible for performing engineering analysis, designing new equipment, assessing the condition of existing equipment, supporting EME’s field crews and managing Engineering Services projects. Senior Engineers must be comfortable frequently interacting with customers and vendors, both in the office and the field, and directing the work of junior engineering staff.
Responsibilities *
Use classic and finite element methods for thermal and structural analysis.
Analyze vibration data to troubleshoot machine vibration. Perform field vibration testing and use field acquired data to calibrate classic and finite element vibration models, use these models to simulate repairs and modifications to correct vibration problems and design solutions.
Design of new and upgraded generator and motor components and their auxiliaries.
Failure analysis of rotating equipment.
Reverse engineering of existing components.
Creation of manufacturing drawings from solid models and specifications to support production.
Lead engineering projects by developing quality assurance documentation, project plans and by providing input to costing and schedules and resolving technical issues.
Interface with shop floor personnel and vendors to ensure products are manufactured in accordance with drawings and specifications.
Perform field inspections and testing to provide input to analyses and designs.
Other duties as assigned.
Required Skills and Abilities*
Must pass a preemployment drug screening and background check.
Must have reliable transportation.
Must have valid driver’s license.
Bachelors of Science in Mechanical Engineering from an ABET accredited program.
Licensed Professional Engineer.
Minimum five years’ experience in engineering design and analysis with specific experience in:
Structural analysis, classically and via finite element analysis
Vibration testing and analysis
Thermal and ventilation analysis
Existing equipment condition assessments
Creation of manufacturing drawings
New component design
Proficiency in:
Mathcad
Solidworks or similar solid modeling software package
ANSYS
Ability to create engineering drawings and written technical work instructions that machinists and craft laborers can follow.
Strong verbal and written communication skills.
Strong computer skills.
Physical Requirements*
Able to walk, push, pull, reach, grasp, twist, bend and climb including at heights of over six feet.
Capable of standing for length of shift.
Keen sight, peripheral vision and hearing.
Able to wear fall protection.
Performance Measurement Metrics*
Performance is measured three ways:
A post-project survey completed by the Project Manger and Product Area Manager measuring five key process indicators by asking the following five questions, each scored from 1 (never) to 5 (always):
Did the team member provide deliverables on time?
Was the team member’s work done correctly the first time?
Did the team member exhibit safety conscience behavior and follow protocols without prompting?
Did the team member follow company and QA policies without prompting?
Was the team member’s level of productivity commensurate with their role and experience?
A 360 review survey, done yearly, which measures performance with respect to EME’s values of Unyielding Integrity, Commitment to Engineering Excellence and Innovation, Passion for Knowledge through Teaching, Learning, and Collaboration, Bold Industry Leadership through Technical Expertise and Foster a Responsive, Open and Respectful Culture
And a scorecard. The scorecard includes 12 items (one of which is the 360 review survey score) collaboratively selected each year with your manager and customized to your role. Each line represents a specific measurable result.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
Mechanical Engineering: 5 years (Preferred)
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.0,"EME Associates, Inc.
3.0","Pennsylvania, AL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
70,Associate Cloud Automation Engineer- AWS,-1,"Who YOU are:

As a future Cloud Automation Engineer at Plus3 IT Systems, you:
Are passionate about working on cutting edge, high profile projects and are motivated by delivering solutions on an aggressive schedule
Aren't satisfied with status quo, and regularly look for creative ways to solve problems and help your team meet commitments
Are insatiably curious you ask why, you explore, and you're not afraid to blurt out your crazy idea
Love learning new technologies and sharing them with your team
Have a keen interest in using any and all appropriate tools, especially Cloud-based and Open Source, to solve the problem at hand
Have strong verbal and written communication skills, due to the dynamic nature of collaborations with customers, vendors, and other engineering teams to solve complex business problems together
Use your experience and leadership skills to motivate your teammates to deliver high quality results in a fast-paced work environment
Are obsessed with automation, simplicity, and smooth-running systems
What you'll be doing:
Building automation tooling and pipelines that enable secured systems to be deployed across a variety of environments, including public/private cloud, virtual machines, or bare metal servers.
Developing automation to standardize and secure cloud services such as server operating system builds, including Red Hat Linux and CENTOS, that are compliant with enterprise standards and security policy.
Solving challenging problems involving system and environment internals, to provide solutions that are simple to use, but can be customized to meet customer needs.
Collaborating with stakeholders to test build releases and ensure builds provide a consistent core foundation for hosting government and commercial applications.
Supporting technologies and products, including AWS, Microsoft Azure, RedHat Linux, CentOS, Saltstack, Terraform, Git, GitOps, Python
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or other Technical discipline or equivalent relevant experience
2+ years of relevant experience.
Desired Qualifications:
Masters Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or other Technical discipline or equivalent relevant experience
8+ years of relevant experience.
DoD 8570 IAT Level II certification
Top Secret Clearance with ability to obtain an SCI and CI poly
Desired experience with following tools and products: Python, Javascript, Terraform, Saltstack, Ansible, Docker, Git, Jenkins, Travis-CI, Azure Pipelines, CodeBuild, Powershell
Desired experience with practices and concepts: DevSecOps, GitOps, ConfigOps, Configuration as Code, Infrastructure as Code, CI/CD, Declarative Programming, Event-driven Architectures/Pipelines
Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status.",4.5,"Plus3 IT Systems
4.5","Colorado Springs, CO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
71,Machine Learning Compiler Engineer,$71k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company:
Qualcomm Technologies, Inc.
Job Area:
Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Machine Learning Engineering
Job Overview:


Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in.

Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G - ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in. We are investing in several supporting technologies including 4G, 5G, Edge Computing, and Deep Learning.

The Qualcomm CR&D team is developing hardware and software for Machine Learning solutions spanning the data center, edge, infrastructure, automotive markets and beyond. We are seeking ambitious, bright and innovative engineers with experience in compiler technology, vectorization and optimization, and machine learning toolchains.

Job activities span the whole product life cycle from early R&D to commercial deployment. The environment is fast-paced and requires cross-functional interaction on a daily basis so good communication, planning and execution skills are a must.

We are looking to staff engineers at multiple levels in systems & software, integration and test. Details of one of the roles we are looking to staff are listed below.

Responsibilities:
Research, design, develop, enhance, and implement the different components of machine learning compiler based on performance and code-size needs of the customer workloads and benchmarks.
Analyze software requirements, determine the feasibility of design within the given constraints, consult with architecture and HW engineers, and implement software solutions best suited for Qualcomm's SOCs.
Analyze and identify system level integration issues, interface with the software development, integration and test teams.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Engineering, Information Systems, Computer Science, or related field.
2+ years of academic or professional experience with compiler development required
3+ years Software Engineering or related work experience.
3+ years experience with Programming Language such as C/C++ and Python
Preferred Qualifications
LLVM or any industrial strength compiler development experience is a plus.
Knowledge of the structure and function of the compiler internals.
Hands on experience writing SIMD and/or multi-threaded high-performance code
Hands-on experience implementing DSP Kernels a plus
Hands-on Experience in C/C++, Python development (3+ years)
Hands-on Experience with Object Orientated Design, TDD development solutions such as GoogleTest etc. (2+ years)
Experience with Source Code and Configuration management tools, git knowledge is required
Willingness to work in a cohesive software development environment with ability to work on low level implementation (code & test) and interfacing with hardware and simulators
Experience in machine learning frameworks and neural network architectures + ML compiler workload synthesis, a plus
Prior working experience of hardware accelerators and hardware software co-design
Experience in using C++ 14/17 (advanced features)
Experience at both the firmware (RTOS) and system level (Linux) in SOC
Experience of profiling software and optimization techniques
Passion to drive to develop leading-edge \""deep learning\"" framework and algorithms working on mobile and embedded platforms.
Applicants: If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, please call Qualcomm’s toll-free number found here for assistance. Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations, upon request, to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Qualcomm. Staffing and recruiting agencies and individuals being represented by an agency are not authorized to use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes, and any such submissions will be considered unsolicited. Qualcomm does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Qualcomm employees or any other company location. Qualcomm is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.

EEO Employer: Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer; all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or any other protected classification.",4.0,"Qualcomm
4.0","Raleigh, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
72,NLP Data Engineer,-1,"Job Description:
The Opportunity:


Are you interested in changing the world of work? We’re building a world-class analytics team to apply data science to the soft side of how work gets done. We’re working hard, having fun, and making history; come join us!

Workhuman is seeking a Natural Language Processing (NLP) Data Engineer to join our Workhuman iQ team as a domain expert. This role is responsible for developing infrastructures and platforms for a wide variety of NLP /AI and data analytics products. The person will work with data scientists and engineering teams to build products that uncover insights hidden in recognition moments across dozens of countries for our customers, the industry and our company.

The projects that our team work on are built from the ground up and we look for individuals who want to take ownership and implement solutions independently and thrive in a collaborative environment. Your work will be project-oriented, and you will often be responsible for bringing together the needs of data scientists, engineering team, product managers and other internal customers to provide viable solutions and communicating your thoughts effectively.

This position will report to the NLP Manager.

Main duties & responsibilities:
Work with Engineering and Architect teams to implement data pipeline on AWS (including data collection, data pre-processing, data sampling and validation) for Workhuman data products
Partner and collaborate with Data Scientists to build training pipeline to facilitate the training of large-scale machine learning models for Workhuman AI products
Implement processes to gather usage data generated from Workhuman AI products and build tools to facilitate performance analysis
Develop cloud-based platforms and web apps for launching Workhuman AI and analytics products
Develop tools to facilitate data review and analysis
Required skills and experience:

Bachelor’s (or above) degree in software engineer, computer science, computer engineering, data engineering or other related field
3+ years of industry experience in software development, data engineering, or related field
Experience with and track record of building data pipeline for machine learning product
Strong knowledge of AWS (S3, EC2, GLUE)
Experience with AWS Sagemaker
Good in programming languages such as: Python, Spark, and Java
Good understanding with state-of-art machine learning framework such as: Tensorflow, Pytorch, Pandas, Scikit-learn, Keras, etc.
Knowledge with web app development such as: database, REST API and cloud
Practical knowledge of data processing needs and trade-offs
Comfortable handling a high volume of work daily
Comfortable working in a fast paced, highly collaborative, dynamic work environment
Willingness to support several projects at one time, and to accept reprioritization as necessary
Experience with process design and documentation
Preferred skills:

Exposure to ML, NLP, and deep learning methods
Knowledge with the front-end languages such as: Javascript, HTML, React, or CSS
Experience with developing back end and front end of web applications for data analytics and business intelligence apps
Experience with working with large-scale of text data across languages
Understanding in model inferencing, monitoring, feedback loop and data capture in real time at scale
The Company:


Workhuman® is the world’s fastest-growing integrated Social Recognition® and continuous performance management platform. Our human applications are shaping the future of work by helping organizations connect culture to shared purpose. With a consistent stream of gratitude fueling unparalleled, provocative workplace data and human insights, Workhuman® Cloud is a critical software engine for global companies seeking to motivate and empower their people to do the best work of their lives. Workhuman® (formerly known as Globoforce) was founded in 1999 and is co-headquartered in Framingham, Mass., and Dublin, Ireland.

Did you know:
We are #1 Great Place to Work in Ireland for the 2019 medium-sized workplace category and have been named one of the 2018 Top Places to Work in Massachusetts by the Boston Globe
Workhuman® is used by 4.5 million employees across 160 countries.
Our core values are; Respect, Determination, Innovation and Imagination
Perks & Benefits for our Happy Healthy Humans:
Comprehensive Health Plans
Fully paid parental leave (12-week maternity/4-week paternity) effective day 1
Peer-to-peer recognition program
401(k)
Tuition Reimbursement
Commuter bus from downtown Boston
On-site fitness center
Wellness rewards and reimbursements
Fully stocked kitchen (cold brew on tap - snacks and coffee machines as far as the eye can see…)
Regular celebrations for employees, families and special guests
At Workhuman, we love what we do because we’re shaping the future of work through our people and our technology. Our human cloud-based applications are helping some of the world’s leading global brands connect culture to shared purpose. The Workhuman Cloud empowers employees to thank, talk and celebrate each other, creating an environment that sparks gratitude and human connection while increasing employee engagement and productivity.

Workhuman is an Equal Opportunity Employer and is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees. We proudly provide a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. Employment decisions at Workhuman are based on solely on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex (including pregnancy), age, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Workhuman believes that diversity and inclusion among our teammates is critical to our success as a global company, and we seek to recruit, develop and retain the most talented people from a diverse candidate pool.",4.3,"Workhuman
4.3",California,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
73,Data Scientist,-1,"At White Ops, we are all about keeping it human. We are the global leader in bot mitigation. We protect more than 200 enterprises—including the largest internet platforms—from sophisticated bots by verifying the humanity of nearly one trillion online interactions every week. The most sophisticated bots look and act like humans when they click on ads, visit websites, fill out forms, take over accounts, and commit payment fraud. We stop them.

Founded in 2012 in a Brooklyn sci-fi bookstore, our Bot Mitigation Platform protects enterprises from the sophisticated bots that threaten them. It's an ongoing war that we fight passionately every day. Join our mission to stop bots, disrupt the economics of cyber crime, and keep it human.

The Data Science team at White Ops is building the algorithms that run behind the scenes and power our bot detection engine. We deploy state-of-the-art statistical and machine learning models at a massive scale that distinguish human activity from automated bots.

What you'll do:
Develop algorithms (i.e. rule based, statistical, machine learning) that automatically detect emerging threats
Evaluate and implement data analysis strategies to improve detection efficacy at internet-scale
Ad hoc investigations to respond to emerging threats with velocity and quality
Collaborate with product, engineering, customer success, to define and develop new product features that will delight our customers
Research for case studies and white papers on bot detection
Contribute to toolkits and platforms that scale detection analytics
Who you are:
You have a strong sense of ownership which drives you to find ways to do things better, faster, and cheaper
You look to find new and innovative ways to solve complex problems through rigorous experimentation, all by yourself
You are open, transparent and work in tight collaboration with anyone
You constantly drive for correctness and performance, in that order
You are a data scientist, analyst, engineer and have solved difficult problems to prove it
You have proficiency with SQL, Python
You have familiarity with tools, libraries and platforms such as Jupyter notebooks, Pandas, NumPy etc
Track record of independent, creative problem solving with large amounts of complex data
Knowledge of how the Internet works
Comfort with ad tech terminology
Background in data science for security is a plus
Knowledge of how web browsers work is a plus
Benefits and Perks
Unlimited vacation policy
Stock options, 401(k), and commuter benefits
Competitive salary and benefits
Medical and dental insurance for all full-time employees
Fully paid parental leave
Professional development fund
Great coaching from senior leaders and challenging development opportunities
Life at White Ops:

Our HQ office is located in the heart of New York City. We are growing the company deliberately with a keen eye towards maintaining a culture that values diversity, lifestyle, and career growth. We are doing meaningful work and we need people to join our mighty team. We are proud of our overwhelmingly positive presence on Glassdoor and Built in NYC. We have offices located in NYC, DC, Victoria, and London.",3.8,"White Ops
3.8",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
74,Engineer,$48k-$115k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you interested in learning the mechanical and physical principles of machines? We have 57 different mechanical jobs for you to chose from. Pick what best fits you and your future plans

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $1,733.00 - $2,263.00 per month

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Relocation assistance
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
10 hour shift
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Signing bonus
Work Remotely:
No",3.9,"U.S. Army
3.9","Plymouth, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,1775,Government,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
75,Software Engineer,$115k-$129k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join a growing, venture-funded startup! You'll be developing core components of our litigation infrastructure, an online platform for lawyers to review, analyze, and collaborate on millions of documents.

Tackling litigation with technology is a surprisingly deep challenge, and it requires in-depth computer science, including machine learning, data visualization, search, distributed systems, databases, real-time collaboration, nifty user interfaces, and more.

We're looking for full-stack generalists. We value great CS fundamentals and humility, over experience with any particular platform, technology, or specialization. If you happen to have a specialty, we'll put that to use -- but we won't restrict you to that area.

We care a lot about finding the best engineers, writing correct software, using the right tools for the job, and avoiding dogma. As a result we've been able to build quite a bit of sophisticated technology with a small, talented team. It's the kind of culture where you'll own serious features, write great code, learn a huge amount, and have a lot of fun.

We code primarily in Java, TypeScript and Python.

Qualifications
Experience with a compiled language, such as C, C++, or Java
Good knowledge of algorithms and fundamental computer science concepts
A love of building systems
An eye for aesthetics and user experience
An eagerness to learn new technologies
Authorization to work in the United States; please note that at this time, Everlaw is not sponsoring visas for any positions.
Pluses
BS or MS in Computer Science, or equivalent coursework
Scripting language experience (Python, Perl, Ruby, etc.)
UNIX-itude
Good writing and communication skills
Benefits
Competitive salary
Substantial equity
401k with company matching
Health, dental, and vision
Flexible Spending Accounts for health and dependent care expenses
Paid parental leave and sick leave
Seventeen paid vacation days plus ten bankable federal holidays
Annual allocation for Learning & Development opportunities and applicable professional membership dues
Company-sponsored life and disability insurance
Perks
Work in Downtown Oakland, just steps from the BART line and dozens of restaurants
Bond over team lunches and out-of-the-box events
Voted one of ""San Francisco Bay Area's Best and Brightest Companies"" and one of ""Inc Magazine's Best Workplaces""


About Everlaw

We help law firms, government agencies, and corporations sift through millions of documents of evidence in big lawsuits and investigations to find the proverbial smoking gun (or needle in the haystack -- pick your metaphor). It's a multi-billion dollar space typically dominated by service-oriented vendors, and we're coming at it with cutting-edge technology and elegant design. It's working, and we've been growing very rapidly: we host scores of terabytes of data and work with all 50 state Attorneys General and hundreds of law firms on some of the most high-profile cases litigated today.

If you’re looking for an open, democratic company culture that values passion, integrity, and a desire to learn, we want to hear from you.

Everlaw is an equal opportunity employer. We pride ourselves on having a diverse workforce and we do not discriminate against any employee or applicant because of race, creed, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, national origin, disability, age, genetic information, veteran status, marital status, pregnancy or related condition, or any other basis protected by law. We respect the gender, gender identity and gender expression of our applicants and employees, and we honor requests for preferred pronouns. It is our policy to comply with all applicable national, state and local laws pertaining to nondiscrimination and equal opportunity.",4.7,"Everlaw
4.7","Oakland, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
76,Principal Full Stack Engineer,$92k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tamr is the enterprise-scale data unification company trusted by industry leaders like GE, Toyota, Thomson Reuters, and GSK. The company’s patented software platform uses machine learning supplemented with customers’ knowledge to unify and prepare data across myriad silos to deliver previously unavailable business-changing insights. With a co-founding team led by Andy Palmer (founding CEO of Vertica) and Mike Stonebraker (Turing Award winner) and backed by founding investors NEA and GV, Tamr is transforming how companies get value from their data.

As we rapidly grow our engineering team, we are seeking for outstanding engineers interested in building products that solve customer problems & enable customer innovation. This is an opportunity to build enterprise software that solves the most time-consuming, manually intensive problem in data science and modern data pipelines: enriching, curating, and preparing data. As part of a talented team, you will design and implement creative solutions to problems in data pipelining, distributed computing, cloud computing, machine learning and user experience.
This job might be a good fit for you if you have:
At least 10 years of industry experience in software development
Strong computer science fundamentals. BS or MS in Computer Science preferred. Equivalent industry experience acceptable
Strong experience with Java or any other modern programming language
Experience with Big Data technologies, Distributed systems or Cloud native software
Excellent problem-solving skills
A collaborative working style
A hunger to learn new things and achieve big outcomes
Additional Information

This position is available in Cambridge MA. Tamr does sponsor employees requiring a visa.

Tamr provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, marital status, amnesty, or status as a covered veteran in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.",4.3,"Tamr
4.3","Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
77,Distinguished Machine Learning Engineer,$166k-$280k (Glassdoor Est.),"About ForgeRock:

In today's highly connected digital world, understanding, managing and securing the identity of individuals and things is essential to safety and success of both businesses and their customers. Billions of people connect from anywhere, use a wide variety of devices and expect a seamless yet secure experience.

The ForgeRock mission is to provide the most simple and comprehensive Identity and Access Management Platform to help our customers deepen their relationships with their consumers and improve the productivity and connectivity of their employees and partners. Our identity solution enables great digital experiences and is embedded with a rich set of security, privacy and consent features. We deliver our platform through both cloud services and on-premises software.

Our customers are some of the biggest companies, organizations, and even countries in the world. On any given day, it's likely that the ForgeRock Identity Platform helped keep your data safe, gave you access to stuff, and supported trusted relationships between you, companies and the devices you were using.

ForgeRock is headquartered in San Francisco, but we are a global company with offices in the following cities: Vancouver, WA; Austin, TX; Munich, Germany; London & Bristol, UK; Grenoble & Paris, FR; Oslo, NO; Singapore and Sydney, Australia. Please read more about us at forgerock.com or follow ForgeRock on Twitter at http://www.twitter.com/forgerock.

The Role:

We are looking for a highly motivated,Principal Machine Learning Engineer to build out the next generation Identity platform. This role requires someone to develop the technology and platform for data processing, feature engineering and analysis to propel company transformation into a data insight driven organization. Work with peers in cloud engineering, SRE to drive data driven insight through the enterprise. Work on complex, high scale machine learning models in production and develop cutting edge algorithms that are deployed directly to customers in real-time. If you are self-driven, passionate about learning, work well in a collaborative environment and have effective communication skills, then we'd love to hear from you!

Responsibilities:
Provide architectural leadership; conduct regular reviews of project work and peer review.
Help in development and scaling of data pipelines, feature pipelines and data lakes to support large scale processing of millions of data events.
Develop an industry view of analytics and design-driven problem solving. Use academic and competitor research to understand recent advances and best practices and inform our approach to developing solutions.
Required Skills and Qualifications:
Masters or PhD degree in computer science, mathematics, statistics, physics, or related quantitative field
Ten years of progressive experience in a data engineering or quantitative role.
Business acumen to work with business partners and understand their domains, processes, and issues to identify strategies to optimize and innovate
Ability to leverage data visualizations to highlight insights to business partners and make a business case for a recommended action or innovation opportunity
Proficient in the language of statistics with an advanced understanding of mathematical statistics, including combinatorics, probability, common discrete and continuous distributions, univariate and multivariate distributions, conditional probability, random variables, expectation, variance, convergence, estimation (bias, MSE, consistency, sufficiency, maximum likelihood, moments, etc.), hypothesis testing, and confidence intervals.
Ability to collaborate effectively with Data Scientists, product management, engineering, UI/UX
Theoretical and practical understanding of a range of machine learning techniques including unsupervised learning (e.g. clustering, outlier detection, PCA, ICA, NNMF, SVD, etc.), supervised learning (e.g., regression techniques, naive bayes, support vector machines, LDA, decision trees, neural networks, etc.), reinforcement learning (e.g., Q-learning, neural networks, etc.), and meta-methods (e.g., boosting, bagging)
Written communication skills to engage partners, document methodology and results, and publish research
Organizational and project management skills for overall project planning and task management
Solid understanding of (1) data structures, (2) sequential algorithms, (3) distributed algorithms, (4) runtime and space complexity
Knowledge of information technology integration and deployment patterns to design and implement solutions
Advanced proficiency in one of the programming languages like Java, Scala or Python.
Advanced proficiency in data processing frameworks like Pandas.
Advanced proficiency in TensorFlow, Keras, Cloud based ML frameworks, external ML libraries and NLP libraries.
Nice to haves:
Project and/or program management experience.
Experience in representing company in International ML conferences.
Proficiency in cloud and ML deployment strategies.
Docker, Kubernetes and VM experience
Life at ForgeRock:

We believe in and facilitate a flexible, collaborative work environment. We've grown enormously, but remain true to the innovative, can-do startup values that got us here. Most important of all, we keep hiring talented, smart, fun, and genuinely nice people because that's who we want to succeed with every day. Below are just a few of the great things we have to offer at ForgeRock:
A great team of smart, fun and genuinely nice individuals.
Awesome company culture focused around providing a flexible and collaborative work environment
Regular office bonding events, from lunches and happy hours to group offsites and hack-days
Well-stocked fridges, whether you're hungry or thirsty
Competitive benefits and perks
We're Mac-friendly!
Generous employee referral bonus program
Amazing offices across the globe San Francisco HQ; Vancouver, WA; Austin, TX; Munich, Germany; London & Bristol, UK; Grenoble & Paris, FR; Oslo, NO; Singapore, Australia & counting!
ForgeRock is the collective sum of all our individual experiences, backgrounds and influences and we pride ourselves in growing and learning together. We are committed to building an inclusive and diverse environment where everyone's individuality is respected and everyone has an Identity. In recruiting for new colleagues, we welcome the unique contributions you can bring and encourage you to be your best self.

We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex including sexual orientation and gender identity, national origin, disability, protected Veteran Status, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.",4.2,"ForgeRock
4.2","Austin, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
78,"Sr. Engineer- Windows Kernel (C, C++ and GO)",-1,"Sr. Engineer- Windows Kernel (C, C++ and Go)*
W2 engagement, sorry no C2C*
Boston, MA*
Remote W2 engagement- 9+ month with the opportunity to go FT
BigR.io is a technology consulting firm empowering data to drive innovation and advanced analytics. We specialize in cutting-edge Big Data, Machine Learning, and Custom Software strategy, analysis, architecture, and implementation solutions. We are an elite group with MIT roots, shining when tasked with complex missions. Whether it’s assembling mounds of data from a variety of sources, surfacing intelligence with Deep Learning, or building high-volume, highly-available systems, we consistently deliver.

About the Job:
You will join this high-caliber team as a Sr. Windows Kernel Engineer, who will have a role in driving our client’s product design, performance, and security goals with appropriate architectures and technologies.
For you to be successful in this role, you will have exceptional technical abilities, a very strong background in working with C, C++ and Go in a Windows OS strong database design experience, broad knowledge across different technologies and frameworks, and an exceptional ability to communicate effectively.

You have:

An excellent understanding of Windows OS kernel engineering.
Strong technical skills in C, C++, GO
Strong client interaction skills and ability to work in a dynamic environment.
A good grasp of the Digital Security industry.
PKI Encryption skills are a must.
Hands-on ability to build proof of concept products.
64 Bit Programming experience
Skilled working with Windows 32 API
Bonus if you can work in iOS and Linux in addition to Windows OS.
MS Information Protection experience.
An ability to deliver high-quality, well-tested, and highly-scalable software solutions.
A desire to focus your architecture on problem based solutions.
Strong GIT skills
Strong experience in Evaluating and optimizing design proposals from agile teams
JIRA, Confluence to track work.
A drive to think differently by leading and embracing change when needed

Bonus: MS Information Protection (MIP/AIP) experience.
Bonus: PKI Encryption skills.
Bonus: Windows kernel experience
Bonus: if you can work in iOS and Linux in addition to Windows OS.

Your Experience:
10+ years in software development with increasing responsibly in architecture and design.
BS or higher degree in Computer Science, or equivalent experience
Experience developing system-level software in Windows development environment.
Windows device driver programming.
Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal.
Experience with Agile methodology.
Self-driven and ability to work with minimal or no supervision.
Work in an agile team environment with other senior engineers and architects.

Job Type: Contract

Pay: $64,903.00 - $180,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
C/C++: 5 years (Required)
Go: 1 year (Preferred)
Golang: 1 year (Preferred)
Contract Length:
7 - 11 months
Full Time Opportunity:
Yes
Work Location:
Fully Remote
Company's website:
bigr.io
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Yes",3.0,"BigR.io
3.0",Massachusetts,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
79,ML/Camera Engineer,$79k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company:
Qualcomm Technologies, Inc.
Job Area:
Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Camera Software Engineering
Job Overview:


Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in.

We are looking for a talented, motivated and experienced embedded software Engineer with expertise in camera and ML technologies. This position in the IoT software team at Qualcomm will be primarily focused around the areas of camera, machine learning frameworks, deep neural networks, computer vision, and algorithm optimizations for embedded targets.

Minimum Qualifications:
• Bachelor's degree or equivalent in Electrical Engineering, Electronics, Computer Science, or related field.
• 2+ years Software Engineering, Hardware Engineering, Systems Engineering, or related work experience.
• 2+ years of relevant camera software experience.

Preferred Qualifications:
• 3-4 years industry experience and well-versed in Python and/or C/C++ programming (minimum qualification)
• Experience with object-oriented design, coding and testing software (minimum qualification)
• Experience with camera architecture, camera tuning, image stabilization and other camera algorithms, and/or camera APIs (minimum qualification)
• Proficiency with embedded system programming (minimum qualification)
• Good understanding of machine learning concepts, computer vision and machine learning frameworks (preferred qualification)
• Familiarity with open-source frameworks like gstreamer, pulseaudio, wayland/weston, etc (preferred qualification)
Applicants: If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, please call Qualcomm’s toll-free number found here for assistance. Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations, upon request, to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Qualcomm. Staffing and recruiting agencies and individuals being represented by an agency are not authorized to use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes, and any such submissions will be considered unsolicited. Qualcomm does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Qualcomm employees or any other company location. Qualcomm is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.

EEO Employer: Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer; all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or any other protected classification.",4.0,"Qualcomm Incorporated
4.0","San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
80,Research Engineer,-1,"As the world’s leader in location assistance technology, we are growing. Do you have experience and passion for GNSS, high precision positioning and emerging location technologies? Come join our team!
Location. Enlightened.™ Rx Networks is a leader in location technology. We help shape the mobile location industry and empower devices to get fast and accurate locations in more places than originally possible. We ensure device manufacturers and mobile operators deliver the best possible user location experience. Every day, nearly two billion devices rely on us for accurate assistance for positioning. Along the way, we’ve become very good at dealing with massive amounts of data and deploying cloud-based, high-availability solutions. We’re naturally proud of this. But really, we’re just getting started!
With the growth of autonomous navigation and driving, unmanned vehicles and IoT – the Internet of Things – the need for high-quality assistance data and data management is only growing. If you like large scale technical challenges and working in a diverse environment with a passionate team, then we should talk…


Environment:
We empower our employees to lead, innovate and create. Here’s what our employees enjoy:
High autonomy
Ownership of work and flexibility
Challenging work with immediate impact on customers
Work/life balance and remote work benefit
Collaboration and open communication
Employees’ voice matters
Culture of respect, trust, non-hierarchical and learning
Invest in employee growth (training and promoting from within)
Great downtown Vancouver office location near a major transit hub
Employee lounge and a rooftop overlooking the city (BBQ’s, big screen TV and Foosball)
Competitive total compensation and benefits

Position Summary:
As part of the Research & Development group at Rx Networks, the successful candidate will develop state-of-art algorithms in A-GNSS, high precision positioning area, and improves existing positioning algorithms.
Accountabilities:
Responsible for research of Rx Networks key short and long-term projects and products
Reporting to the Principal Engineer, support the company’s overall strategies and goals
Research, optimize, evaluate, analyze and modify existing location algorithms for improvement working collaboratively with teams
Develop and debug MATLAB scripts / C++ & Java code
Conducts research within their own field of expertise. Applies scientific methodology and principles to new products and ideas
Keep apprised of developments in Global Navigation Satellite Systems and share findings
Brings and maintains a deep knowledge within their own field of expertise and may continue to contribute to the academic community through publications and conference presentations.
Attend workshops/conferences as appropriate, as well as learning independently from available literature
Skills and Qualifications:
Master's or Ph.D. in Geomatics Engineering, Geodesy, Electrical Engineering, Computer Science or related field with 3 to 5 years of experience in GNSS industry or research
Strong background in GNSS technologies, Positioning, Navigation and location-based services, Estimation for Navigation
Experience with MATLAB® or equivalent
Hands-on GNSS data processing experience with standard formats and interfaces (RINEX, RTCM, etc.)
A solid understanding of product lifecycles, software development, software testing, and release practices in a mobile client-server environment
Working Conditions:
This is a full-time position based in Vancouver or remote work within a 4 hour time zone from Vancouver.",4.0,"Rx Networks
4.0",Remote,-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
81,Data Scientist - TS/SCI w/ Poly,$76k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

Job Description:

Why wake up every day and want more when YOU CAN HAVE IT? Do you love KNOWING at the end of each day that your work made a difference? We embrace and solve some of the world's toughest challenges. We’re focused on ensuring our intelligence customers have the right tools, technologies, and tactics to keep pace with an ever evolving threat landscape and succeed in their mission to protect people and critical assets around the world. Who wouldn’t be fulfilled being part of that every day? We know once you join Team Leidos, you are sure to go home at the end of every day knowing YOU MADE A DIFFERENCE, resulting in one of the most REWARDING careers you could have imagined. EACH DAY MATTERS!

We have an IMMEDIATE NEED for a Jr Data Scientist to provide mission critical support to our customer. As part of an Agile Team, you will design, develop, and maintain software applications using a tailored SAFe Agile DevSecOps Scrum process. This role implements data auditing, reporting, and security through the use of existing tools and developing new ones. This role requires familiarization with a broad range of data analysis tools and techniques This role leads complex projects requiring data analysis, interpretation, and communication to support decision-makers and customers.

Primary Responsibilities

Create innovative solutions to meet the technical needs of customers.
Develop custom data models and algorithms to apply to data sets.
Participate in the development of documentation.
Coordinate closely with customers, Scrum Masters, and cross-functional areas to communicate project statuses and initiatives.
Analyze data to effectively coordinate the installation of new systems or modifications to existing systems.
Support the Agile software development lifecycle.
Communicate key project data to team members and build team cohesion and effectiveness.
Develop and execute project plans leveraging Atlassian tool suite like JIRA and Confluence to track activities.
Apply best practices and standard operating procedures.

Basic Qualifications

Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders.
Experience querying and analyzing machine logs.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordinating across team
Candidate must have a BS and 4-8 years or prior relevant experience or Masters and 2-6 years or prior relevant experience.
Additional years of experience can be accepted in lieu of education.

Clearance/Citizenship

Candidate must be US Citizen.
Candidate must have an active TS/SCI with Polygraph

""External Referral Eligible""

NSOINT

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph

Travel:
No

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world’s toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company’s 38,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Va., Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $11.09 billion for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2020. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.7,"Leidos
3.7","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
82,Chief Engineer - Bluefin Robotics,-1,"Basic Qualifications :

Bachelor's degree in engineering or a related technical field and is required plus a minimum of 10 years of relevant experience; or Master's degree in engineering or a related technical field plus a minimum of 8 years of relevant experience.

CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS:
Department of Defense Secret security clearance is required at time of hire. Applicants selected will be subject to a U.S. Government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Due to the nature of work performed within our facilities, U.S. citizenship is required.

Responsibilities for this Position:

Bluefin Robotics is seeking a Chief Engineer to lead the delivery, sustainment, and future improvements on a current Unmanned Underwater Vehicle (UUV) program. Candidates should have extensive subsea domain technical expertise and the proven ability to make technical decisions from a position of leadership.

Responsibilities include:

Technical team leadership and program execution: execute program with a focus on technical execution to achieve program milestones on schedule and on budget
Work effectively with the Program Manager and Deputy Program Manager Engineering to set program priorities while balancing resource, cost, schedule and technical constraints to achieve program milestones.
Lead the team to deliver quick, cost-effective, and reliable technical solutions to challenging technical issues factoring in resource, cost, schedule and technical constraints and impacts.
Lead and manage the program with multiple baselines and tasks ranging including baseline management, system production, capability enhancement integration and Government tests.
Operate and practice disciplined systems engineering processes for the entire program life cycle: CONOPS, requirements, design, assembly, integration, test, production and analysis.
Quickly build schedule, cost and resource plans to complete program tasks including resolving technical issues, integrating new capabilities, and conducting tests. Also assess the plans’ risks, tradeoffs and program impacts.
Make sound technical and program decisions to achieve program milestones.
Effectively communicate (written and oral) technical reports, discussions and presentations with the team, independent technical experts, US Government /US Navy customers and GD senior leadership.
Empower and mentor technical team members to excel, grow and achieve program milestones.
Provide technical oversight of subcontractor tasks.
Collaborate with AUS Chief Engineer and other GDMS technical leads to develop technology roadmaps to identify, propose, manage Internal Research and Development (IRAD) investments and projects to benefit and other GD programs.
Identify and propose customer funded investments in new technologies to integrate as future system capabilities.
Lead, support and contribute to new business pursuits and proposals to capture additional scope related to the program and Autonomous Undersea Systems (AUS) business.
Leverage and reach out to the larger GD organization for additional resources and technical expertise as needed.
Actively and proactively manage and mitigate technical risks:
Identify, anticipate, and assess, technical risks as early as possible.
Develop and actively mitigate technical and program risks.
Build and maintain strong customer relationships:
Maintain clear, honest and open communications with both internal (GD) and external (US Govt, US Navy) stakeholders.
Effectively communicate technical issues, impacts, corrective actions and execution plans to both internal (GD) and external (US Govt, US Navy) stakeholders.
Establish and maintain technical credibility through exceptional technical expertise and leadership.
Understand and anticipate customer’s concerns and challenges and propose creative solutions.
Some (25%) Travel is required.
Some Off-shore testing is required.
SECRET Security clearance is required.

Experience and Qualifications:

Technical leadership experience working multiple project and programs throughout a system or product life cycle including concept design, requirements development, detailed design, assembly, integration, test, analysis and production.
Strong track record of solving complex problems, building, testing, delivering complex systems and achieving program milestones on time and on budget.
Technical expertise and recognized technical leader (subject matter expert) in one or more of the following technical areas: naval architecture, SONAR systems, analog and digital electrical hardware design and development, control systems & autonomy, signal and image processing, artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Experience working on projects or programs with multiple organizations including subcontractor technical oversight and management.
At least 5 years of experience of technical project leadership and management, large scale projects and programs preferred.
At least 5 years of experience leading diverse, multi-disciplinary teams to achieve program milestones.
At least 5 years of experience effectively communicating (written and oral) technical reports, presentations and discussions with a diverse audience including the program team, technical subject-matter experts, customers and senior leadership.
Experience working on US Government and US Navy programs.
Experience developing and testing undersea sensors, systems and UUVs to verify requirements.
Experience working designing, building, integrating and testing SONAR sensor systems, preferably on more than one platform/application.
Acoustic signal processing and automated target recognition algorithm development, data analysis and modeling and simulation experience.
Experience with MATLAB, R or similar data analysis software tools.
Demonstrated ability to understand and apply project leadership principles including SPI/CPI, Earned Value, Cost Account Management (CAM), and Statistical Process Controls for large complex programs.

Company Overview:

General Dynamics Mission Systems (GDMS) engineers a diverse portfolio of high technology solutions, products and services that enable customers to successfully execute missions across all domains of operation. With a global team of 12,000+ top professionals, we partner with the best in industry to expand the bounds of innovation in the defense and scientific arenas. Given the nature of our work and who we are, we value trust, honesty, alignment and transparency. We offer highly competitive benefits and pride ourselves in being a great place to work with a shared sense of purpose. You will also enjoy a flexible work environment where contributions are recognized and rewarded. If who we are and what we do resonates with you, we invite you to join our high performance team!

General Dynamics is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer that is committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/Disability/Veteran",3.6,"General Dynamics Mission Systems, Inc
3.6","Quincy, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1952,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
83,Machine Tool Sales Engineer,-1,"Job Description: Machine Tool Sales Engineer *
Reports to: VP Sales – Machine Tools
Job Summary *
Concept Machine, a leading industrial equipment supplier in the Midwest, provides quality metal working machine tools including CNC Vertical and Horizontal Machining Centers, Wire EDM, Sinkers, Grinders, Swiss

Lathes, machines for turning, grinding, boring, milling, drilling and tapping. In addition to the machine tool solutions, Concept also has a complete metrology solutions portfolio, making us a full partner to our manufacturing partners.

We are seeking a *Machine Tool Sales Engineer* to promote and sell machine tools in the MN market. This individual must be highly motivated and a self‐starter. Responsibilities include professionally promoting
Concept Machine and our products to new and existing customers to maximize our market share and the employee’s earning potential through capital equipment sales.

This individual must possess the desire to learn and react to a fast-moving pace. They must be skilled at strengthening existing customer relationships as the customer advocate in their territory, along with building the customer base. They must enjoy working on a team and collaborating with cross-functional departments to best serve our customers and drive an exceptional customer experience.

Manufacturing industry and machine tool sales experience is helpful, however, it is not required. Training is provided to ensure sales staff is informed on our products and given the tools to be successful.
Key Responsibilities*
• Represent Concept as the main relationship point of contact and interface

• Manage their own territory and performance of Concept Machine in that territory

• Report, log and manage CRM data related to the owned market area

• Expand Concept’s market via new account relationships and business development efforts
Qualifications and Skills *
• Understanding of sales process in a technical and capital equipment market

• Exposure and understanding of CNC machine tools and related equipment

• Reliable vehicle and valid driver’s license

• Detail Orientated

• Self-motivated and independently driven

• Meets deadlines with minimal supervision

• Expected routine travel to customers within territory, including potential for occasional overnight projects

Concept provides excellent benefits including medical and dental coverage, paid holidays and sick time, and
401(k) with a company match.

Job Types: Full-time, Commission

Pay: $100,000.00 - $300,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Industrial sales: 2 years (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Commission Only:
Yes
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.conceptmachine.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Concept Machine Tool Sales,"Plymouth, MN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
84,Data Scientist/ Data Automation Engineer,$110k-$178k (Glassdoor Est.),"JSR is a global leader in material sciences and chemical engineering committed to contributing to social good by supplying materials to serve future generations and providing new value today for our customers and society in the areas of digital solutions, life sciences, elastomers, and next generation solutions.
We value Innovation, Quality, Customers, and People!  JSR combines a deep Japanese heritage of materials innovation, with speed propelled by our strong customer partnerships with premier tech & life sciences companies.  Are you interested in taking JSR and your career to the next stage?
The Opportunity
The role of the successful candidate is to accelerate the technology and product development cycles through focused automation initiatives. This engineer will lead cross functional teams to develop tools and applications to manage data from multiple chemical manufacturing sites as well as quality and development data to enable proactive process management and system troubleshooting.
Collaborates with the Manufacturing teams and Digital Transformation Office to develop product roadmaps in the digital space.
Works closely with technology development, product design teams and IT teams to rapidly establish the data science infrastructure necessary to meet the above goals
Communication of project updates including status, needs, and risks throughout the management chain.
Establish Way-of-Working guidelines and deliver communication and training sessions to ensure seamless implementation of the automation framework.
About You
7+ years plus B.S. or 5+ years with M.S. desired
B.S. degree in Engineering, Data Science, Material Science, or equivalent. M.S. a plus
Experience in chemical processing, organic chemistry, and analytical chemistry a plus
Proficiency and experience with Solution Focused Thinking - evaluating current problem patterns and devising a workable plan/process/solution
Experience working in an Agile environment.
Excellent data analysis proficiency required. Ability to do data manipulation via basic scripting techniques, macros or programming languages (i.e., Python) is preferred.
Knowledge of chemical processes and basic chemical structures, reactions and interactions needed to tie data into current troubleshooting or experimental work.
Proficiency and experience with Statistical Process Control (SPC) needed.
Strong computer skills essential – JMP, Access, Excel, PowerPoint, database and statistical software experience highly desired.
Detail-oriented and strong organizational skills. Quick problem-solving skills, able to communicate in-depth to customers, internal and external.
Experience in working within a cross-functional team is necessary.
Here's More of What You'll Be Doing
Work safely by observing safety rules, policies and procedures. Identify unsafe conditions or actions to the immediate supervisor.
Perform analyses and report results with minimal supervision.
Identify and execute improvements to existing quality procedures for data analytics, following guidelines on accuracy and validation
Act as Product Owner for development of digital solutions that assist in more efficient and effective issue resolution.
Do deep, wide and detailed data analysis using existing across a variety of platforms (databases, LIMS, other operational flows).
Work on and resolve various issues with data sets, including standardization of values, units and naming conventions, as well as bigger problems with current calculation methods and any underlying assumptions behind the calculations.
Initiate and perform a variety of analyses and recommend statistically designed experiments to address customer issues with general instructions.
Maintain and verify reliability of calculation methods, language or programming behind current macros or other scripts for data analysis.
Create reports and group presentations using Excel, Access, JMP and PowerPoint, to communicate data to other teams – Production, Quality Control, R&D, Sales and Management.
Independently design experiments using statistical methods (Does) towards developing and optimizing new test methods for products and raw materials and facilitate the implementation of these procedures by educating and assisting other members of the Data Automation Team.
Work in a team environment, especially the cross-departmental Data Automation Team (Cleans Engineering, Quality Control, Production, Litho Engineering, Sales, Logistics and Materials).
Make suggestions to management for improving this position or improving work processes

JSR is an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender perception or identity, national origin, age, marital status, protected veteran status, or disability status.
**Recruitment agencies/Headhunter do not submit resumes/CVs through our Web site or directly to managers. JSR will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with JSR. JSR do not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resumes. **",3.8,"JSR Micro
3.8","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1990,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
85,Senior Data Scientist 3 Artificial Intelligence,$70k-$115k (Glassdoor Est.),"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311094

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing & Analytics

Group: Data Sciences & Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and artificial intelligence research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to AI assurance, remote sensing and geo-spatial analytics, human language technologies, computer vision, and other related fields.

+ The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as geospatial intelligence, natural language processing, few-shot learning, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery (e.g., publication in conferences such as NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred)

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 5 years of experience, Masters with 3 years of experience or PHD with 1 year of experience
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-23_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-11-21_",4.0,"Pacific Northwest National Laboratory
4.0","Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1965,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
86,Claims Data Scientist,-1,"About ConcertAI

ConcertAI is the leading provider of precision oncology solutions for biopharma and healthcare, leveraging the largest collection of research-grade Real-world Data and the only broadly deployed oncology-specific AI solutions. Our mission is to improve translational sciences; accelerate therapeutic clinical development; and provide new capabilities for post-approval studies to accelerate needed new medical innovations to patients and to improve patient outcomes.
ConcertAI has emerged as one of the highest growth technology companies in Real-world Data and AI, backed by industry leading private equity companies: SymphonyAI, Declaration Partners, Maverick Ventures, and Alliance|Bernstein.

Role Summary
As a Claims Data Scientist at ConcertAI, you will be responsible for data exploration, and analysis on patient data for various stakeholders in the oncology and healthcare domain, including claims and claims-clinical linked data assets. You will report to the Vice President of Data Products. You should have a good mix of programming/CS, visualization, stats/math, and ML skills (with a particular strength in at least 2 of those areas), and ideally, you have been applying those skills in healthcare. You should have previous experience with healthcare claims. You will design methods and models around client driven needs and you will collaborate with various subject matter experts to inform those methods. You will assist the client delivery team with insights, dashboards, and ad-hoc analytics. You will also work with the engineering team to build prototypes and models for new product development.
Responsibilities
Understand external claims data assets and oversee the ingestion, processing, de-identification, and provisioning for data assets and research projects.
Understand client / product needs and translate them into tactical R&D initiatives with defined goals and timelines.
Reason about healthcare specific problems to analyze visualize, interpret, and contextualize results.
Run a variety of analytics from data QA to complex models.
Become the internal subject matter expert on all things claims.
Implement models using high level software packages (SKlearn, R, TensorFlow, Spark).
Collaborate on software projects with engineers, providing analytical guidance and contributing to codebase.
Requirements
BSc or higher in a STEM field, with formal training in CS, stats, and math.
Strong programming abilities in at least one high level language (python, stata, R).
Knowledge of statistical methods- regression, ANOVA, EDA, PCA, etc.
Basic visualization skills- matplotlib/seaborn/plotly/etc, tableau.
Experience with big data – Cloud data warehouses, cluster computing, Spark, MapReduce/Hadoop.
Experience with healthcare claims data
Intimate familiarity with the python data science stack (pandas, sklearn, numpy/scipy).
Firm understanding of claims data processing and adjudication, including rejections, re-submissions, and identifying final claims.
Ideal candidate would have a competency around linking EMR and claims data via identity management.
Learn More About ConcertAI

ConcertAI is transforming how healthcare is delivered and dedicated to improving patient outcomes in oncology by offering innovative solutions on how data and intelligence is used to solve healthcare problems. We are creating something special in our culture, by building a collaborative, engaged, patient focused, team approach to our mission. Our high-performance teams are looking to add great talent to the mix and we are hiring for the right mix of new skills and diverse mindset. Learn more about ConcertAI at www.concertai.com or on LinkedIn .",3.6,"ConcertAI
3.6",Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
87,"Sr. Software Engineer, Machine Learning",-1,"About Alpha Health
We’re on a mission to remedy the financial complexity crippling healthcare in America.

Our aim is to organize and use all healthcare information to reduce the cost of care and improve the patient experience.

As the first Unified Automation company for healthcare, we use the same machine learning approaches that made driverless cars possible to provide health systems with a single solution for revenue cycle management. Alpha Health’s Unified Automation brings together the best of people, data and technology to efficiently, accurately and autonomously navigate the complex state of medical reimbursement in the United States.

We are growing rapidly:
- The contracting process in healthcare typically averages nine months. Yet, in less than 12 months time, the team has landed multiple provider clients of all sizes across the US.
- The team has also deployed at several of these customers, providing meaningful and measurable value within 90 days.

We’ve built a cross-functional skill set deep into the DNA of the company. We have technology experts from the top Silicon Valley technology companies (Google, Facebook, etc) and machine learning PhD programs (Stanford, etc). We also have senior leaders from the frontlines of healthcare with decades of experience leading teams of medical billers at some of the most prominent healthcare institutions in the US. And we have a deep bench of talent from healthcare services firms like the Advisory Board, Optum and Triage Consulting.

Our founding team includes Silicon Valley leaders who have founded or been founding team members of multiple companies with successful exits, including in excess of $350 million.

We are expanding our team to support our work with existing customers as well as new customers. If you love to execute, we’d love to hear from you.

Alpha Health is based in South San Francisco. As a company we embraced remote work opportunities before COVID-19. We consider ourselves experts in working collaboratively wherever our team members happen to reside.

As a Sr. Software Engineer on the Machine Learning team, you'll be putting machine learning into practice so your code directly affects our customers immediately. You'll participate in developing state-of-the-art machine learning solutions to address large scale healthcare problems.
What You'll Do
· Write production-ready software with fast and efficient algorithms
· Design and build pipelines that collect, preprocess, and deliver data with a measurable quality
· Work with large proprietary medical and clinical datasets containing both structured documents, natural language and images
Skills & Qualifications
· Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or equivalent (Master's a plus) and/or relevant practical work experience
· 5+ years of work experience as a software engineer in a machine learning environment
· Must have experience launching production systems from the ground up
· Strong proficiency in one or more programming languages such as Python and C++
· Hands-on development experience with big data technologies such as SQL and AWS/Cloud Platform
· Some knowledge of machine learning frameworks such as Scikit-Learn, Keras, Tensorflow
· Full-stack development experience for an end to end machine learning solution preferred
· Strong communication and interpersonal skills with meticulous attention to detail",5.0,"Alpha Health
5.0","South San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
88,Sr Software Engineer,-1,"*This position is contingent upon contract award.**
Raytheon Technologies intends to offer a proposal in support of STARGAZER. We are looking for an experienced Sr. Software Engineer effective at applying world-class expertise in one or more areas involving development and application of programmatic and quantitative methods to find patterns and relationships in large data sets.

Would you like to work in a collaborative environment at a state of the art facility in Dulles, Virginia? Then join our Intelligence, Information and Services (IIS) team of smart people solving problems that make the world a safer place and help to secure our great nation! Come support those who provide us with all the freedoms we enjoy. Our facility in Dulles VA offers amenities that create work and life balance. The Dulles site includes 4 modern facilities with 3 industrial buildings. On site we have a fitness center plus a fun space with a pool table, foosball and video games. Additionally, employee appreciation lunches, bonus opportunities, and great benefits that include medical, dental, vision, 401K match, flexible work schedules, are just a few of the reasons people come to work at Raytheon Technologies!

IIS, is a technology and innovation leader specializing in defense, homeland security and other government markets throughout the world. With a history of innovation spanning 90+ years, IIS provides state-of-the-art electronics, mission systems integration and other capabilities in the areas of sensing; effects; and command, control, communications and intelligence systems, as well as cyber security and a broad range of mission support services

At IIS we transform data into intelligence. As a leading systems and solutions provider of intelligence, security, and advanced information technologies to government customers in the United States and internationally, IIS provides the right knowledge at the right time, enabling our customers to make timely and accurate decisions to achieve mission goals of national significance.

Our latest company video is about our people, our technology, our vision, and the values we hold dear at IIS. Click here to view: https://youtu.be/qvbCgKpkEds

Bring your talent and skills to the IIS engineering team!

Job duties may include but are not limited to:
Conducting mathematical, statistical, or other data-driven problem solving analysis to identify business operations or intelligence questions by internal and external customers.
Working independently with minimal supervision by first line supervisor or government client.
Providing technical leadership in area of expertise.
Experience:
Prefer eight (8) or more years combined experience in engineering lifecycle software solutions
Proficient with major data science tools and languages such as PostgreSQL/SQL, Python, R, NiFi, and Git
Experience with cleaning, managing, optimizing performance with, and processing large volumes of data
Familiar with industry best-practices for software-hardware optimization when processing large data sets
Desired:
Five or more years combined experience in engineering lifecycle software solutions
Experience with the Anaconda distribution of Python, and Anaconda Enterprise, PyPi, Rstudio, Jenkins, use of Cookie cutter templates, Terraform, MongoDB, cloud services and offering in AWS/C2S, cloud architecting, machine learning, statistical modeling, time-series forecasting, and/or geospatial analytics
Experience with Hadoop, Spark, or other parallel storage/computing processes a plus
Demonstrated experience productionizing data science research capabilities, analytics and applications, with a focus on transforming these into enterprise-ready applications, including but not limited to AI/ML, and deep learning models with GPU.
Familiarity with a range of approaches to automate deployments of software applications in the customer's commercial cloud environment.
Security Clearance: TS/SCI with Full Scope Polygraph (FSP).

This position requires a U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.
158161

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Herndon, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
89,Software Engineer - Saalfeld Lab,$101k-$113k (Glassdoor Est.),"Primary Work Address: 19700 Helix Drive, Ashburn, VA, 20147
Current HHMI Employees, click here to apply via your Workday account.
Janelia Research Campus is a pioneering research center in Ashburn, Virginia, where scientists pursue fundamental questions in neuroscience and imaging. The Howard Hughes Medical Institute (HHMI) launched Janelia in 2006, establishing an intellectually distinctive environment for scientists to do creative, collaborative, hands-on work. Our integrated teams of biologists, computational scientists, and tool-builders pursue a small number of scientific questions with potential for transformative impact. We share our methods, results, and tools with the scientific community. It is a uniquely innovative and collaborative atmosphere that reflects HHMI’s reputation for excellence.

Summary:

We are looking for a software engineer to work with the lab on novel machine learning based analysis methods and tools for large biological images and videos at the interface of cell biology and neuroscience. We are open source and open science enthusiasts, you will help us to develop new and maintain existing open source libraries and tools developed in the lab (Paintera, N5, BigWarp, ...), and contribute to popular open source packages in the field. You will collaborate with excellent scientists and software engineers and have access to the latest and most exciting data and computational resources.

Education:
M.S. or B.A in Computer Science or related field
Experience:
Experience with writing efficient code with Java or other JVM based languages
Familiarity with Python, other programming languages
Ideally, you have a record of contributing to open source projects, so we can discuss code
If you do not meet all of the above criteria but you believe that you can compensate this with enthusiasm, creativity, and practical experience, reach out to us and let's talk.

For more information on the Saalfeld lab, visit here or email Stephan at saalfelds@janelia.hhmi.org

Physical Requirements

Remaining in a normal seated or standing position for extended periods of time; reaching and grasping by extending hand(s) or arm(s); dexterity to manipulate objects with fingers, for example using a keyboard; communication skills using the spoken word; ability to see and hear within normal parameters; ability to move about workspace. The position requires mobility, including the ability to move materials weighing up to several pounds (such as a laptop computer or tablet).

Persons with disabilities may be able to perform the essential duties of this position with reasonable accommodation. Requests for reasonable accommodation will be evaluated on an individual basis.

Please Note:

This job description sets forth the job’s principal duties, responsibilities, and requirements; it should not be construed as an exhaustive statement, however. Unless they begin with the word “may,” the Essential Duties and Responsibilities described above are “essential functions” of the job, as defined by the Americans with Disabilities Act.

HHMI is an Equal Opportunity Employer",4.6,"Howard Hughes Medical Institute
4.6","Ashburn, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1953,Nonprofit Organization,Grantmaking Foundations,Non-Profit,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
90,Software Engineer,$90k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Software Engineer

OSBU | Denver, CO, United States

Why Join Rincon Research Corporation (RRC)?

At Rincon Research Corporation, our primary business is innovating, developing, and fielding digital signal processing (DSP) products and services for the United States Defense and Intelligence Communities in support of national security.

Rincon Research Corporation seeks a Software Engineer to create cutting edge signal processing, geolocation, and communication systems solutions to challenging national security and defense problems. You will work in a multi-disciplinary R&D environment with similarly skilled and motivated electrical engineers, mathematicians, and computer scientists/engineers in a highly rewarding personal and professional environment.

Come join the team that is creating cutting edge signal processing, geolocation, and communication systems for the future!

What are the primary responsibilities in the Software Engineer position?

Core responsibilities include designing real-time processing solutions, implementing advanced signal processing and geolocation algorithms in efficient software, testing with real data, and deploying to front-line customer facilities. You also create effective user interfaces and data visualization tools. A key responsibility is mastering and evolving framework capabilities as applications migrate to a cloud-based computing environment. RRC personnel can expect to work across all functional areas: systems engineering, development, integration and test, deployment and O&M, and experience the direct mission feedback from the customer and seeing your project provide real-world contributions that make a significant difference.

What required background will make you successful?
Degree (Bachelor’s, Master's, or PhD) in Computer Engineering or Computer Science
Competent in using C/C++/Python for engineering or scientific applications in the Linux environment
Facility with agile software development practices at all stages of the software life cycle
Good speaking skills with the ability to interact with customers and senior engineers
Able to assist in creation of cutting-edge solutions for customer issues
Ability to obtain and maintain a TS/SCI security clearance
(US CITIZENSHIP REQUIRED)
Technical Interest Areas:
High Performance Computing including parallel and distributed computation
Numerical algorithms
GPU acceleration using CUDA
Machine learning
Virtualization and Cloud computing
Visualization of large engineering data
HTML5 for real-time GUI engineering applications
Where is the position located?

This position is located at our Denver, CO office.

What benefits does RRC offer?
100% employer-paid premiums for family medical and dental insurance, employee life insurance, short-term and long-term disability (STD & LTD)
Flexible reimbursement spending accounts for medical expense and dependent care
Immediate participation and vesting in the company’s Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP) and 401(k) Plan
Employer contributions to RRC’s ESOP
Employer matching contributions to the company’s 401( k) Plan
Employer discretionary contributions to the company’s 401(k) Plan
Rincon Research Corporation is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, veteran status, or any other protected factor.",4.1,"Rincon Research Corporation
4.1","Centennial, CO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
91,Operating System/Gaming Support - Senior Software Engineer,-1,"Would you like to use your software development skills on an agile team, developing training software that combines virtual and physical simulations?

Do you like being involved in the entire software development environment starting from the operating system?

If so, we have an opportunity for you in our Patriot Fielded Systems and Validation Department in Tewksbury, Massachusetts on the Patriot Multi-Echelon Training (PMET) & Patriot Maintenance Training (PMT) software development team. Patriot is the world's pre-eminent air defense system, and we are currently developing Patriot training software in support of new system capabilities. Successful candidates will work with a team of software and systems engineers to develop and test these new capabilities. We strive for technical excellence by drawing upon a diverse workforce whose knowledge base covers the complete spectrum of modern computer languages and platforms.

As a Senior Software Engineer II, you will be an integral part of the Patriot PMET & PMT software team, and will be involved in:
Development, integration, test, and user support of a Windows-based, first person military computer simulation used to train maintenance procedures for the Patriot Fielded System. The deliverable PMET & PMT products provide a mix of virtual and physical simulators to be used in a classroom setting. You will learn how to configure the operating system to maximize the performance and integrity of the Patriot Training software. You shall be able to contribute to the entire software life cycle of Requirements, Design, Code, Unit Test, Integration and System Test.

The team works in a scrum development facility located in Tewksbury, MA. The job requires a well-disciplined engineer who is able to thrive in a dynamic environment and is able to work well in a team.

U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as within one year of employment.

Job Responsibilities:
Maintain, debug and fix problems with Patriot PMET & PMT applicationsSupport generation of documentation to include: software design artifacts, requirements documentation and problem reportsSupport integration efforts, for which travel may be requiredSome off-hours activities associated with software development and test will be necessaryWill work on all phases of software development lifecycle, tools, and methodologies Convert software requirements and specifications into logical design artifacts, development of software code, unit testing of code, and analysis of software defectsDetermine failure root cause, develop, design and implement solutionsAnalyze system performance vs. technical requirements, research and make Software/Systems improvement recommendations

Basic Qualifications:
C++ and/or C# programming language skills
6 + years of software programming experience
Bachelors Degree or better in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Mathematics, or Software Engineering
US Citizenship is required.
Desired Qualifications:
Proven experience with software development techniques and tools (e.g., Clearcase, Visual Studio, Perforce, Unreal)
Knowledge of gaming programming
Experience with software testing and automation tools
Experience with Machine Learning or Artificial Intelligence
Proven experience with C++ and C# software languages
Proven experience with software development on Windows
Demonstrated ability to implement requirements from design through integration
Ability to recommend improvements of processes, systems, and/or products
Knowledge of Operating Systems and secure development environments
Ability to operate complex test equipment
Demonstrated experience with hardware and related software/hardware interfaces
Demonstrated ability to investigate, resolve and track complex hardware/software interactions and problems and follow through to resolution
Leadership Skills
Ability to provide guidance, coaching, and training to other employees within the job area
165871

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tewksbury, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
92,Data Engineer,$65k-$124k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Engineer

Alignment Healthcare was founded with a mission to revolutionize health care with a serving heart culture. Through its unique integrated care delivery models, deep physician partnerships and use of proprietary technologies, Alignment is committed to transforming health care one person at a time.

By becoming a part of the Alignment Healthcare team, you will provide members with the quality of care they truly need and deserve. We believe that great work comes from people who are inspired to be their best. We have built a team of talented and experienced people who are passionate about transforming the lives of the seniors we serve. In this fast-growing company, you will find ample room for growth and innovation alongside the Alignment community.

Position Summary:
Alignment Healthcare is a data and technology driven healthcare company focused partnering with health systems, health plans and provider groups to provide care delivery that is preventive, convenient, coordinated, and that results in improved clinical outcomes for seniors.

We are experiencing rapid growth (backed by top private equity firms), our Data Services and BI team is looking for the best and brightest leaders. Data drives the way we make decisions. We love our customers and understanding them better makes it possible to provide the best clinical outcome and care experience.

This position will play a key role in building and operating a cloud-based data platform and its pipelines using big data technologies.

As a Data Engineer, you will develop a new data engineering platform that leverage a new cloud architecture, and will extend or migrate our existing data pipelines to this architecture as needed. You will also be assisting with integrating the SQL data warehouse platform as our primary processing platform to create the curated enterprise data model for the company to leverage. You will be part of a team building the next generation data platform and to drive the adoption of new technologies and new practices in existing implementations. You will be responsible for designing and implementing the complex ETL pipelines in cloud data platform and other solutions to support the rapidly growing and dynamic business demand for data, and use it to deliver the data as service which will have an immediate influence on day-to-day decision making.

General Duties/Responsibilities:

(May include but are not limited to)
Interfacing with business customers, gathering requirements and developing new datasets in data platform
Building and migrating the complex ETL/EDI pipelines from on premise system to cloud and Hadoop/Spark to make the system grow elastically
Identifying the data quality issues to address them immediately to provide great user experience
Extracting and combining data from various heterogeneous data sources
Designing, implementing and supporting a platform that can provide ad-hoc access to large datasets
Modelling data and metadata to support machine learning and AI
Minimum Requirements:

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Minimum Experience:
3+ years relevant experience in cloud based data engineering.
Demonstrated ability in data modeling, ETL development, EDI Development and data warehousing.
Data Warehousing Experience with SQL Server, Oracle, Redshift, Teradata, etc.
Experience with Big Data Technologies (NoSQL databases, Hadoop, Hive, Hbase, Pig, Spark, Elasticsearch etc.)
Experience in using Python, .net, Java and/or other data engineering languages
Knowledge and experience of SQL Server and SSIS.
Experience with X12(837,834,278) and HL7 transactions
Education/Licensure:
Bachelors or Masters in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, or related field
Other:
Excellent communication, analytical and collaborative problem-solving skills
Requires Spark and Scala
Building and migrating the complex ETL/EDI pipelines from on premise system to cloud and Hadoop/Spark to make the system grow elastically
Preferred
Healthcare domain and data experience
Healthcare EDI experience is a plus
API development experience is a plus
Industry experience as a Data Engineer or related specialty (e.g., Software Engineer, Business Intelligence Engineer, Data Scientist) with a track record of manipulating, processing, and extracting value from large datasets.
Experience building/operating highly available, distributed systems of data extraction, ingestion, and processing of large data sets
Experience building data products incrementally and integrating and managing datasets from multiple sources
Experience leading large-scale data warehousing and analytics projects, including using Azure or AWS technologies – SQL Server, Redshift, S3, EC2, Data-pipeline, Data Lake, Data Factory and other big data technologies
Experience providing technical leadership and mentor other engineers for the best practices on the data engineering space
Linux/UNIX including to process large data sets.
Experience with Azure, AWS or GCP is a plus
Microsoft Azure Certification is a plus
Demonstrable track record dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in an agile, dynamic startup environment
Problem solving skills and Ability to meet deadlines are a must
Microsoft Azure Certification is a plus
Python and Java are a plus,
Experience with X12(837,834,278) and HL7 transactions preferred
Work Environment
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Essential Physical Functions:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear. The employee regularly is required to stand, walk, sit, use hand to finger, handle or feel objects, tools, or controls; and reach with hands and arms.
The employee frequently lifts and/or moves up to 10 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision and the ability to adjust focus.
Alignment Healthcare, LLC is proud to practice Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action. We are looking for diversity in qualified candidates for employment: Minority/Female/Disable/Protected Veteran.
If you require any reasonable accommodation under the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) in completing the online application, interviewing, completing any pre-employment testing or otherwise participating in the employee selection process, please contact careers@ahcusa.com.
(function() { var ac = document.createElement('script'); ac.type = 'text/javascript'; ac.src = ('https:' == document.location.protocol ? 'https://' : 'http://') + 'click.appcast.io/pixels/grpeople1-1573.js?ent=8&t=' + new Date().getTime(); var s = document.getElementsByTagName('script')[0]; s.parentNode.insertBefore(ac, s); })();",3.5,"Alignment Healthcare
3.5","Orange, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
93,Artificial Intelligence Engineer,$60k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position: Artificial Intelligence Engineer / AI Engineer

Location: Winston-Salem or Charlotte, NC

Remote: Once pandemic has cleared can work a hybrid schedule between Winston-Salem, NC and home location.

Note: Must have prior programming in Python and using TensorFlow

Primary Purpose:

Seasoned research analyst with experience in artificial intelligence (AI), machine learning, and mathematical-statistics modeling. This professional will apply his or her analytical, programming and business knowledge and skills, collaborating with other analysts and business leaders to complete complex projects and solve challenging problems integral to research and development of insurance products and management of those products.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:

Following is a summary of the essential functions for this job. Other duties may be performed, both major and minor, which are not mentioned below. Specific activities may change from time to time.
Execute complex projects designing, creating, and innovating to meet Analytics goals
Implement artificial intelligence and machine learning methods in combination with explanatory econometrics and statistics
Build, maintain, and adjust predictive models
Support development and implementation of models for insurance loss, conversion, retention, expense, etc.
Employ programming techniques efficiently and soundly
Develop and use large datasets across multiple platforms
Communicate with fellow team members across functions
Minimum Skills and Competencies:

The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Bachelor Degree or in-lieu of degree equivalent education, training and work-related experience
Demonstrated artificial intelligence, machine learning, statistical modeling knowledge and skill
Experience using 4 or more modeling techniques such as the following: OLS, logistic regression, GLM, credit scoring, tree-based methods, time-series and forecasting, survival analysis, neural networks, nonlinear support vector machines, association rule learning, principle components analysis, K-means clustering, k-nearest neighbor classifiers
Well-developed programming skills specifically in SAS or SQL and other packages with statistical and machine learning application, e.g. R, SPSS, Python
Detail orientation with discipline and commitment to excellent results
Research / R&D project management and coordination skills
Inter-personal and leadership skills
Must possess effective verbal and written communication skills
Intellectual curiosity with ambition and will to learn, develop, and grow professionally within a complex and interesting business.
Comfortable in Windows and Unix-type environments.
Proficient in Microsoft Office
Desired Skills:
Graduate degree or equivalent in mathematics, statistics, actuarial science, economics, operations research, computer science or other quantitative field
5+ years overall relevant experience
P&C insurance industry background with working knowledge of auto insurance and homeowners insurance
Understanding of insurance product design and mathematical underpinnings of rating algorithms
CAS exams or credentials
National General Holdings Corp. is an Equal Opportunity (EO) employer Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment regardless of any characteristic protected by law. Candidates must possess authorization to work in the United States, as it is not our practice to sponsor individuals for work visas.

In the event you need assistance or accommodation in completing your online application, please contact NGIC main office by phone at (336) 435-2000.",3.2,"National General Insurance
3.2","Winston-Salem, NC",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1939,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
94,Manufacturing Engineer - CM,$40k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are a global leader in the irrigation, outdoor lighting, dispensing technology, and custom manufacturing industries. Driving our continued success is the combined energy and talents of the nearly 3,000 people on our team. Together, we create a diverse array of products that can be seen all over the world, from residential landscapes to national landmarks, stadiums, parks, hotels, and municipal buildings. Although we’re global, we’re family owned, and our casual, fun, and caring company culture is what makes this a special place to work. As we grow, we are dedicated to preserving our unique culture that makes our employees proud to work here. Whether you’re pursuing a career at our headquarters in Southern California, or an opportunity at one of our state-of-the-art manufacturing facilities, or something somewhere in between, we look forward to welcoming you to Hunter Industries and our Family of Companies.
About This Role:
The Contract Manufacturing Engineer identifies and implements manufacturing processes, procedures, and projects focused on minimizing product cost, improving product quality, and maintaining product availability for assigned product lines. S/he works on projects across multiple departments that are aligned with the organization’s strategic objectives.
Demonstrates behavior that is consistent with the company’s values of Customer Satisfaction, Innovation, Family, and Social Responsibility.
Essential Job Functions/Tasks:
1. Responsible for the resolution of manufacturing issues of assigned product lines that affect product quality and/or availability. Develops and coordinates the necessary processes and sustaining engineering protocols to ensure manufacturing operational efficiencies. Maintains manufacturing-related documentation and production reports that define key metrics and outline current activities.
2. Uses lean manufacturing practices and Six Sigma methodology to evaluate and improve assembly line performance per established key performance indicators. Implements improvement processes to ensure that projects are justifiable, on schedule and within budget.
3. Manages progress of new and modified molds and assembly equipment for assigned product lines throughout qualification process. Ensures that the mold/assembly equipment meets established manufacturing capacity and utilization requirements.
4. Provides manufacturing engineering support for complete integration of new products into full production per the organization’s New Product Development and Introduction (NPDI) process. Provides focus on delivering a repeatable process with high quality yield. Supports the concurrent engineering effort on behalf of manufacturing as a member of the product development team.
5. Maintains updated capacity models for both injection molds and assembly equipment for assigned product lines. Submits capital requests as required to insure timely completion of equipment to meet forecasted production. Provides capital requirements for annual budgeting process.
6. Leads or supports cost reduction projects including qualification of new vendors for materials or parts. Participates in test plan development and execution.
Other Job Functions:
Performs other related tasks as assigned, some of which may become essential to the position.
Hunter Industries’ approach to the health and safety of each employee is based on adherence to our Injury and Illness Prevention Program (IIPP). Every employee is responsible for their safety and must work safely at all times. Employees are to immediately report all unsafe or hazardous conditions, including injuries and near misses to their Supervisor, Environmental Health& Safety Department, or Workers’ Compensation Manager. Those employees who do not comply with safe work practices may be subject to disciplinary action, up to and including termination.
Education/Training Required:
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering or related field.
Experience Required:
Minimum of one year of engineering experience within a manufacturing organization.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities (KSA's):
KSA #1: Knowledge of the practical application of engineering science and technology. Knowledge of LEAN Manufacturing& Six-Sigma methodology techniques and how to apply them in the manufacturing environment.
KSA #2: Ability to speak and write effectively as appropriate for the needs of the audience. Excellent written and verbal communication skills in the English language, with strong report-writing and presentation skills.
KSA #3: Excellent computer knowledge, including strong proficiency in Microsoft Office programs.
KSA #4: Strong logic and reasoning skills to identify the strengths and weaknesses within processes.
KSA #5: Excellent organizational and time management skills, and the ability to work within time lines.
KSA #6: Excellent judgment and decision-making skills, with the ability to consider the relative costs and benefits of potential actions to choose the most appropriate one.
KSA #7: Must be able to travel domestically and internationally, and work flexible hours to visit supplier facilities worldwide. Ability to obtain a valid passport if necessary.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities (KSA's) Preferred:
KSA #8: Knowledge of assembly of electronics and injection molded plastic components.
KSA #9: Knowledge of SPC, FMEA, DOE and process capability studies.
KSA #10: Experience with irrigation products and/or industry.
Physical Demands:
Ability to sit to use a computer, attend meetings, evaluate work stations and assembly ergonomics issues.
Ability to work in a variety of positions (bending, kneeling and crouching) to gain access to the lower areas of machines in the facility.
Ability to climb stairs to gain access to upper levels of the facility.
Ability to carry material, fixtures, tools, equipment weighing up to 60 pounds.
Finger dexterity sufficient to use standard measuring equipment and a computer.
Visual acuity sufficient to use standard measuring equipment and a computer, and to read written material.
Work Environment:
Office with carpeted floor and temperature controls. Production area with tile floor and temperature controls.
Various inside locations with varying temperatures and floor surfaces.
Follow us on LinkedIn, check out our rave reviews on Glassdoor, and learn more about our company culture on our career site:http://corporate.hunterindustries.com/careers",4.2,"Hunter Industries
4.2","San Marcos, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
95,Sr. Controls Software Engineer,$77k-$157k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title: Sr. Controls Software Engineer
Location: Wilsonville, OR
Department: Engineering
Job Type: Full-Time
DWFritz
DWFritz Automation has been engineering and building precision automation solutions for over 45 years. In the last 10 years, we have grown our global footprint with employees and clients in the U.S., Asia, and Europe, while diversifying the industries we serve.
What’s our secret to success?
We're the company that can solve the challenges that nobody else can. We do so by hiring incredibly talented employees who innovate through team-work.
Why would you want to work here?
We are a progressive company that continually strives towards being world-class in our practices, cutting-edge with our technology, and empowering with our leadership. We believe in big things, because we believe in our employees who impress us every day with their ideas and their execution.
Our World Headquarters operates from a modern, state-of-the-art facility located in Wilsonville, Oregon. Our employees enjoy standing desks, a recreation room, a fitness room, and a hearty oatmeal breakfast to start each day. Our spacious lunch room is the venue for weekly All Staff meetings and our frequent “Lunch and Learns.”
We also know how to have fun at DWFritz. From ping-pong tournaments and monthly socials to working with our community through our RISE program and paid volunteer day, we know well how to work and play together. We hope you get the chance to visit our building and experience a culture that is unlike any other.

Your Challenge

The Senior Controls Software Engineer is a challenging, high visibility position that will utilize your experience and software skills and allow you to work with high-level automation technologies within a project team to develop cutting edge automation equipment. These systems include features such as:
Real time PC control architecture.
Sophisticated machine vision software.
Sub-micron PID Servo motion control.
4 to 6-axis robot integration.
High Level Custom GUI.
2D and 3D Laser Metrology.
Your Responsibilities
Architects, designs, codes, tests, and maintains complex software applications.
Develops detailed software design specifications for assigned projects.
Maintains state-of-the-art knowledge in software design, testing techniques, and software development tools.
Provides design guidelines, and general and detailed software design specifications to other software engineers.
Assists in project schedule development.
Suggests new and innovative approaches to solving problems.
Interfaces with customers during quoting, specification, design-review, buy-off, and installation phases.
Participates to develop company processes, procedures, and standards.
Drives personal or company vehicle to customers’ facilities for project meetings, design reviews, start-up training, and follow-up review.
Your Qualifications
Excellent organizational, problem solving, and time management skills.
Excellent software development skills.
Excellent C#.NET/C++ programming skills (min 8 years of experience).
Excellent C#.NET GUI development skills.
Ability to actively participate in team development and team-oriented processes and motivate others to do the same.
Excellent usage of Version Control Software (GIT, VSS, Subversion, etc.).
Excellent Machine Vision applications skills (Cognex Vision Pro/Insight, Keyence CV/XG, Halcon, OpenCV).
Ability to startup and debug complex systems.
Ability to read electrical schematics.
Familiarity with SQL database schemas, design and software interfacing.
Ability to derive solutions to complex problems.
Proficient with Statistical Analysis.
Able to integrate into an existing software engineering team environment.
Able to use existing standards, procedures, and practices.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Attention to detail and accuracy.
Ability to work under pressure to meet project deadlines in a multi-tasking environment.
Sense of urgency to meet project schedules.
Ability to maintain confidentiality.
PC-based machine controls.
Servo based motion control.
Use Microsoft software – Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint, Visio, etc.
Must possess a valid driver’s license, acceptable driving record, and proof of current vehicle insurance.
Requires domestic/international travel for installation and support. Typically 3, 3-week trips/year.
Must be eligible for or have a valid passport.
Your Education and Experience
BSEE or BSME (MS a plus).
Minimum 10 years recent manufacturing programming experience.
Experience with machine control, C#.NET, vision and motion control programming skills highly desired.
Experience integrating software with Scara and 6-Axis robots.
Experience with software project management.
PLC programming skills a plus.
Equal Opportunity Statement
DWFritz is an equal opportunity employer. In accordance with applicable law, the company prohibits discrimination based on race, color, religion, creed, gender, pregnancy or related medical conditions, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, sexual orientation, genetic information, uniformed service or any other consideration protected by federal state and local laws. Our commitment to equal opportunity employment applies to all persons involved in our operations and prohibits unlawful discrimination by any employee.
DWFritz is not currently sponsoring work visas for this role. Authorization to work in the U.S. is required to be considered.",3.4,"DWFritz
3.4","Wilsonville, OR",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1973,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
96,"Principal Software Engineer, DevOps (Remote)",-1,"Digital Diagnostics is looking for a Principal DevOps Engineer to help shape how applications are deployed, managed, and connected on our new platform.

Our flagship product is the artificial intelligence algorithm where it is the computer, not the physician, diagnosing patients. Built on a series of patented machine learning algorithms, our FDA cleared software platform detects early signs of diabetic retinopathy, a debilitating eye disease that impacts the 30+ million people with diabetes in the US. We are using everything we’ve learned from IDx-DR to expand our artificial intelligence platform to help patients by detecting diseases like skin cancer. This expansion is critically enabled by our efforts in the healthcare IT space, through EHR integrations, platform connections, and analytics. Now we need to expand our team of highly skilled and motivated team members to help us change healthcare for the better.

Working for Digital Diagnostics offers you the opportunity to:
Work with world-renowned computer scientists and clinicians who are pushing the limits of artificial intelligence, computer vision, and machine learning in medicine.
Tackle complex challenges and projects with the highest levels of quality and execution for audiences that include top technologists, the FDA, and world-leading healthcare providers.
Push the accessibility and quality of healthcare to new heights to improve the lives of millions of people.
Help define the architecture of a secure multi-regional cloud
Are you someone who:
Has your team’s back and is willing to jump into any problem
Enjoys delighting the customer
Goes all in, learns from their mistakes, and has fun doing it
Has 8 years of DevOps experience
Then apply to be our next Principal DevOps Engineer!

Qualifications (aka this is what we will ask about in your interview):
Very strong technical communication skills: you should be comfortable interacting with and explaining designs to everyone from customers, to the CEO, to the developers working with you
Expertise in taking lead on designing and building complex software solutions, from conception to deployment
Best practices should be second nature to you, as you will need to implement, design to and teach them
Extensive expertise with both the theory and practice of testing: unit, integration and otherwise
Mastery of Amazon Web Services and Infrastructure as Code (should hold professional level AWS certification(s) or demonstrate comparable expertise)
Extensive expertise and comfort with Serverless technologies
Interest in SaMD (software as a medical device – if you know, you know) and working in regulated software environments such as ISO or FDA (don’t let this scare you – we have a lot of automation).
This is a permanently remote position. We have engineers across the United States in many different time zones. We are committed to hiring the best engineers no matter where they reside, so location is not factored into compensation. But if you ever long for the comradery of a shared workspace, we have offices in Chicago, Boston and Iowa and would be happy to have you there!

Salary Range: $140k-$200K

Feeling over or under qualified but still think we’re cool? Have a specialty that doesn’t quite line up with this posting? We are recruiting at a number of levels for all sorts of specialties: Check out our career page at https://dxs.ai/about/careers/current-openings/

Unfortunately, we are not able to sponsor an immigration case for employment at this time (for example, H-1B or other employment-based immigration cases).

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $140,000.00 - $200,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location:
Fully Remote
Work Remotely:
Yes",-1,"Digital Diagnostics, Inc.","Chicago, IL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
97,Data Engineer,$76k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking multiple Data Engineers to support a new requirement in/around Springfield, VA. The selected candidates may be required to deploy forward up to 10% of the time into operational areas or other remote sites.

Responsibilities include:
Responsible for extracting, loading, and transforming a variety of data types, formats, and sources in order to cultivate accessible relational, document store, and graph databases
Develops logical and physical data models, database creation, data optimization, and implementation
Work side-by-side data scientist to make use of the collected data
Deploy sophisticated analytics programs, machine learning, and statistical models
Document all work in a code base, and other Install, Operations, and Maintenance artifacts per government direction
Basic Qualifications:
Requires in-depth knowledge of distributed systems, computer science, programming, and mathematics. Works with warehouses across multiple databases; responsible for developing table schemas
Ability to manage and organize data while identifying trends and inconsistencies that will impact government missions
Experience preparing data for predictive and prescriptive modeling; uses data to discover tasks that can be automated; delivers updates to stakeholders based on analytics
Experience/certifications in Mongo DB, Python, Cypher Query Language, R, Apache Spark / Hadoop, Linux, ETL, data warehouse, data modeling, and MS Azure, and Amazon Web Services
Experience adhering to Information Technology processes, polices, and procedures for entering changes and new products into the production environment
Experience in cloud, containerization, indexing, scaling databases, and graph analysis to build in automation, efficiency, and implementation of security controls
Desired Skills:
Prior experience supporting US Special Forces
Prior deployment to OCONUS locations
AWS and/or Azure certifications
Security Clearance Requirements:
Active TS/SCI security clearance required
Willing to undergo polygraph examination
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.

For more details, or to submit a referral: bit.ly/NovettaReferrals

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"Novetta
4.5","Springfield, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
98,Data Scientist,$59k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist, St. Louis, MO

***No c2c or sponsorship, must be our W2 employee***

Required Skills / Experience:

• MS in computer science, machine learning, statistics, genetics, animal/plant breeding, or closely-related field with at least 1 year of industry experience

• Strong code development experience with R and Python for 3+ year

• Strong object-oriented programming (OOP) and design experience

• Strong in SQL and experience with big data ecosystem

• Experience with coding best practices, version control and documentation

• Problem solver and analytical thinking

• Commitment to ensuring data quality and accuracy and attention to detail

• Strong business aptitude, the ability to rapidly learn new problem domains, and become conversant in the domain with subject matter experts.

• Strong organizational, interpersonal skills with proven ability to communicate complex qualitative analysis in clear, concise, and precise manner.

Desired Skills / Experience:

• PhD in computer science, machine learning, statistics, genetics, animal/plant breeding, or closely-related field

• Experience with AWS, docker and other automation tools

• Experience with workflow orchestration

• Knowledge of plant breeding and genomic prediction

• Experience with web development",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
99,Compiler Engineer,-1,"SiFive is an idea-to-silicon company founded by the inventors of RISC-V to simplify the design and production of custom SoCs.
As the leading commercial provider of RISC-V processor IP & SoC IP, SiFive is on a mission to help engineers design custom chips for domain-specific solutions for many markets, including 5G, edge AI, enterprise networking, storage, and consumer devices.

Industry-leading innovators, including six of the top ten semiconductor companies, are working with SiFive thanks to our shown success, deep expertise, and rich partner ecosystem. With SiFive’s rich IP ecosystem and accessible design platform, every market has access to the development of domain-specific hardware needed to design next-generation products.

SiFive was founded and is actively run by the developers of RISC-V. If you are passionate about working with industry leaders and innovators, then send us your application today!

The SiFive Platform Engineering team is building an ambitious new infrastructure to support accelerated ASIC and FPGA design flows, IP delivery and SoC development - driving the next generation of SiFive's ""Silicon at the speed of Software"" mission. This infrastructure leverages state of the art compiler algorithms (built on open source MLIR and LLVM technologies), novel build system integration, and new Verilog RTL generation techniques.

Our team combines many different perspectives and experiences, and we love working with people who combine a passion for learning and growth with product focus, practical experience, and a desire to build world-changing technologies.

We encourage applicants from traditionally underrepresented groups in computer science to apply!

LEVEL: Please note that we are hiring for several positions on the Compiler Engineering team, and as such invite everybody with at least 2 years of Compiler Engineering experience to apply.
Responsibilities
Evolve, design and build new compiler intermediate representations for hardware design and tool flows.
Implement specific compiler optimization and lowering algorithms for chip design flows.
Implement state of the art mechanisms for hierarchical caching that crosscut compiler and build systems.
Participate in design discussions, planning, code review, documentation, open source processes, and other standard software practices.
Collaborate with hardware architects to develop the approach and design flows.
Manage your individual project priorities, deadlines and deliverables.
Requirements
We are hiring for several positions with different levels of seniority, but require a minimum of 2 years of compiler engineering experience.
Strong oral and written communication skills, excellent team collaboration.
Experience with C++ programming and git-based development workflows.
Experience with Verilog and other chip design technologies is NOT required.

SiFive is proud to be an equal employment opportunity workplace. We offer a competitive compensation package that includes flexible paid time off; health, vision and dental benefits; 401(k) plan; employee stock option program, and much more.

We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation.

If you yearn to be challenged and wish to work in an environment where the boundaries of your creativity and skills will be tested, then SiFive is the place for you.

Notice to Staffing Agencies / External Recruiters:
Thank you for your interest in SiFive Inc. Please note that SiFive does not accept unsolicited resumes from external agencies unless contracted to fill a specific position. Agencies are hereby specifically directed NOT to contact SiFive employees directly in an attempt to present candidates – all applications must go through SiFive's internal recruiting team. Any third-party resume forwarded by agencies/external recruiters to a SiFive mailing address, fax machine or email address, directly to SiFive employees, or to SiFive's resume database will be considered property of SiFive Inc and treated as a direct application. This exchange does not constitute an agreement between SiFive and the agency/external recruiter. SiFive reserves the right to contact the candidate directly. Employment agencies/external recruiters will receive no compensation from SiFive or its companies.
#LI-DNI",4.4,"SiFive
4.4","San Mateo, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
100,Principal Software Engineer - JAVA,-1,"U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.

Who we are
Raytheon BBN is one of Raytheons premier research and development centers. Our diverse research portfolio combines the best technologies to deliver innovative, custom solutions with real-world benefit. Located in Arlington, VA, our Information Exploitation group is seeking a Staff Scientist with software research interests. Our world-class team works with a broad range of Government agencies to solve problems that are both technically challenging and have a real operational impact.

What will you do
The ideal candidate will have strong experience in Java development with some experience or interest in machine reasoning, semantic web technologies, data analytics, or artificial intelligence technologies. Our research work applies the above technologies to build both prototype and real operational systems. You will be working on challenging problems including:
• Producing sophisticated software in a fast-paced agile environment;
• Developing mission-critical applications for deployment into global enterprise operations;
• Optimizing software for knowledge representation, storage, and query systems for high performance.
• Designing novel machine reasoning and learning algorithms and solutions to complex, open-ended intelligence problems.

What will you need
BS in Computer Science or equivalent discipline and 8 years of experience; or MS in Computer Science or equivalent discipline and 6 years of experience.
Proficiency in Java and the Java-based development ecosystem.
Current DoD or IC Top Secret security clearance with SSBI. US citizenship is required
Desired Skills:
2-3 years of related research experience in one of the technical areas mentioned above.
Experience with Web application development.
Familiarity with modern software configuration management tools such as Docker, Gradle, Ivy, etc.
TS/SCI highly desired
Why us
We offer outstanding benefits that include flexible work schedules, a competitive 401k company match, a Retirement Contribution plan, performance based incentive, paid parental leave, paid time off, and many other employee discounts. 166098

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Arlington, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
101,Wireless Communications Research Engineer,$80k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you have experience researching engineering wireless communications?Are you passionate about using innovation and technology to solve technical challenges involving the defense of the US?If so, this is the perfect opportunity for you.As a Wireless Communications Research Engineer, you will...Conduct wireless communication systems engineering research activities in support of Cyber Operations, Special Operations, and Homeland Protection Mission Areas. You will be responsible for researching and developing innovative solutions for military and Government sponsors. Problem solving and analysis in areas related to telecommunications, remote sensing, anomaly detection, etc.Lead the research and development of innovative solutions to solve complex problems in the field of wireless communications. Identify appropriate algorithms and approaches for solving critical communications problems using advanced signal and data processing techniques. Develop software prototypes of signal processing algorithms.Document work in formal technical reports and informal memoranda. Present work to sponsors and the technical community.Support testing of prototype and operational systems working closely with sponsors to ensure mission success.You meet the minimum qualifications for this position if you have:Ph.D. in electrical engineering, computer engineering, computer science, physical sciences, mathematics, or related technical discipline.1 years of experience in wireless communications engineering.Demonstrated strong teamwork and interpersonal skills.Ability to work independently.Excellent oral and written communications skills.Ability to travel within the continental United States. Also, travel to sponsor sites local to APL may be required.The ability to obtain a Secret clearance. If selected, you will be subject to a government security clearance investigation and must meet the requirements for access to classified information. Eligibility requirements include U.S. citizenship.You’ll go above and beyond our minimum requirements if you have:Ph.D. in electrical engineering, computer engineering, or computer science.5 years of experience in commercial and/or government wireless communications engineering.Hands-on experience in some combination of the following implementation languages: MATLAB, Python, Java, C /C.Recent knowledge of DoD and/or intelligence community, sponsors, and programs.Active Secret clearance.Why work at APL?The Johns Hopkins University Applied Physics Laboratory (APL) brings world-class expertise to our nation’s most critical defense, security, space and science challenges. While we are dedicated to solving complex challenges and pioneering new technologies, what makes us truly outstanding is our culture. We offer a vibrant, welcoming atmosphere where you can bring your authentic self to work, continue to grow, and build strong connections with inspiring teammates.At APL, we celebrate our differences and encourage creativity and bold, new ideas. Our employees enjoy generous benefits, including a robust education assistance program, unparalleled retirement contributions, and a healthy work/life balance. APL’s campus is located in the Baltimore-Washington metro area. Learn more about our career opportunities atwww.jhuapl.edu/careers.",4.6,"Johns Hopkins Applied Physics Laboratory (APL)
4.6","Laurel, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1942,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
102,Sr. Full Stack Engineer,$75k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Alteryx

Alteryx develops software for data preparation and analysis, including a number of server solutions for model deployment, collaborative work on data, and scheduling of automatic data processing. We're revolutionizing data analytics by providing a complete end to end, self-service platform that allows users to get from business questions to business answers at incredible speeds. Why work for just any analytics company?

At Alteryx, we are explorers, dreamers and innovators. We're on a journey to build the best analytics platform in the world, but we can't do it without people like you leading the way. We want Alteryx to be recognized as much for our dynamic work culture as for our products.

About Alteryx Innovation Labs

The Innovation Labs office, Alteryx's first office presence in Boston, was started earlier this year by the acquisition of MIT-spinout Feature Labs. This rapidly growing team combines the excitement of being part of a fast-paced, innovative startup with the resources, market penetration, and wisdom of a data analytics market leader. Our goal is to turbo-charge machine learning and data science efforts on the Alteryx platform, and to enable anyone to solve dynamic problems. We are working on high-impact, high-visibility projects, and we’re looking for collaborative and knowledge-hungry teammates who want to join us as we work to democratize machine learning.

Overview

As a Senior Full stack Engineer, you will work within the Innovation Labs engineering teams to build features and components end-to-end in order to help us build and deliver a new web-based data science product. In this role, you will have the opportunity to problem solve, drive projects to success, communicate with stakeholders, and learn from both success and failures as part of a dynamic, friendly and ambitious team with technical influence throughout Alteryx and beyond.

Responsibilities
Be a senior member on the engineering team to build a large and complex (in a fun way!) application using React/Redux with Scala/Python backend
Work closely with UI/UX team to provide feedback on designs and transform them into functioning user-facing products
Work closely with Product and Engineering leadership on the technical and product roadmap
Consume and inform the design of machine learning and data science APIs that powers the application
Incorporate user feedback to improve the product
Author new features, from conception and design to implementation and testing
Requirements
5+ years of experience in front-end web development, ideally with several years of React
3+ years of experience in a modern backend language (Python, NodeJS, Go, Scala, etc.)
Experience building and deploying applications in a dockerized-based environment, ideally on AWS.
Experience writing clear and effective documentation
Experience with automated testing and tools like Jest, Cypress, CircleCI, Github Actions, Selenium, etc.
Drive to build quality features and components end-to-end
Bonus
Demonstrated (in your portfolio) eye for design and solving real-world user problems end-to-end, if you have examples to show that’s awesome
Experience with data visualization
Experience with API design
Contributions to open-source frameworks and/or libraries.
Benefits & Perks
100% company-paid medical, dental, and vision for associates
Health plans that cover your family and pets
Company matched 401(k)
Associate stock purchase plan
Paid time off: 3 weeks’ vacation, 5 sick days, 9 holidays, 3 floating holidays, and 20 hours volunteer time
100% paid parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Wellness programs with up to $300 fitness reimbursement annually
Collaborative offices stocked with healthy snacks and drinks
Office events, catered lunches, and happy hours
#LI-JE1",3.6,"Alteryx
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
103,Data Scientist – Protein Sciences,$86k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"13-Oct-2020

Job ID
304587BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""127! That’s the number of drug discovery projects impacted this year by protein science data at Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research.

Are you a curious and inspired Data Scientist passionate about bringing protein science data to the next level of informing and impacting drug discovery projects? Do you like working in cross-functional and multidisciplinary teams? Do you enjoy transforming scientific challenges into computational solutions to catalyze efficiency in data-driven drug discovery? As a team member of a global Data Science group with expertise in protein data science, data engineering, computational biology, bioinformatics, screening analytics and predictive modelling this is a unique opportunity waiting for you to leverage protein science data at scale.

Your responsibilities include, but are not limited to:
Engage in an interdisciplinary environment with structural biologists, biophysicists, protein chemists, proteomic scientists and molecular modelers to advance structure-based drug discovery using innovative computational approaches.
Champion data stewardship in protein crystallography, biomolecular NMR, cryo-EM and biophysics to enable predictive science.
Design and implement robust applications, methods and end-to-end analysis workflows for automated data processing, quality control and publishing.
Exploit and integrate internal and external protein data sources to generate drug discovery impact.
Ideate and proto-type tailored visualizations and webservices for data dissemination across the organization.
Mentor scientists who are developing their computational skills.
Posting Title
Data Scientist – Protein Sciences",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
104,AWS Data Engineer,-1,"AWS Data Engineer Northern, VA

AWS Data Engineer


Minimum Requirements
Active SECRET clearance preferred; Clearable US Citizen with NAIC (National background check) may also apply
5 years Data Engineering experience AND a BA Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Math, Sciences, or equivalent; 4 years of additional relevant experience may be substituted for education.
Working knowledge of agile software development, DevSecOps, and AWS native solutions including API Gateway, S3, and Lambda is required.
Preferred Experience
Knowledge of several of the following areas is desirable: DevSecOps, Active Server Pages, JavaScript, Python, HTML, and AWS native applications including S3, WAF, API Gateway, Lambda, CloudFront, DynamoDB, Transcribe, Athena, Simple Queue Service, QuikSight, CloudWatch, CloudTrail, KMS, and Cognito.
Job Duties
Provide development support to the Scrum Master in an agile software development environment in AWS.
Works as a key member of an AWS native solution software development team and works to identify risks and bottlenecks associated with big data environments.
About NuWave Solutions

NuWave Solutions is a recognized leader in providing anticipatory intelligence and advanced data analytics to the defense, intelligence, and private sectors for over 20 years. Leveraging artificial intelligence and machine learning methodologies, NuWave Solutions streamlines the Data-to-Decision lifecycle faster than traditional practices allowing clients to take action with confidence.

For more information on how NuWave Solutions supports its clients and builds upon success, please visit https://www.nuwavesolutions.com

Position Details
Location – Arlington, Virginia
Travel Required – N/A
If travel is required, how much? 0%
Work Schedule (Shift etc.): Day Shift
Authorization to work in US required
8570 Requirements: N/A
NuWave Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled
Tagged as: AWS Data Engineer",4.5,"NuWave Solutions
4.5",Virginia,-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
105,Design Engineer II,$47k-$74k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:

As a Design Engineer II for Milwaukee you will be located at our Brookfield, WI office. Our corporate office is only 15 minutes from downtown Milwaukee and located near Miller Park, Milwaukee Zoo, Mitchell Park Domes, as well as many more attractions and restaurants.

You will work in a fast-paced environment to innovate new products as a member of a cross-functional team. One of the most rewarding aspects of the job is seeing a product you designed on the shelves of a Home Depot.

If you are interested in travel, domestic and international travel opportunities are available and sometimes required. In the US, Milwaukee Tool has three locations in Mississippi (two manufacturing and one distribution). Overseas, you will have the opportunity to work with Chinese engineering counterparts as well as meet with suppliers in both Taiwan and China.

Milwaukee offers benefits on your first day of work including health, dental, vision, life insurance and 401k. Milwaukee also provides an excellent working environment that includes an on-site cafeteria, state of the art fitness facility, recreational sports leagues and company outings.

Duties and Responsibilities

Take a concept idea and make it come to life.
Design and test products from concept to production.
Develop design solutions to meet consumer requirements.
Participate in field research.
Facilitate project flow involving regular contact with manufacturing and other cross-functional team members.
Interact with suppliers to develop part/product specifications that meet performance requirements while falling within process capabilities.
Evaluate product design relative to material selection, cost and reliability.
Perform a wide variety of calculations and software aided analyses in the following areas:
Mechanical stress analysis, material and heat treatment selection, tolerance and fit analyses, lubrication, spur and helical gear design, statics and dynamics, noise and vibration and a variety of machine element design.
Independently develop, write and analyze test requests with the Milwaukee Tool Test Laboratory.
Work as a technical resource to troubleshoot problems with manufacturing teams and suppliers.

Education and Experience Requirements

Bachelor of Science Degree in Mechanical Engineering; or similar field.
2+ years of experience in related design field.
GD & T and CAD proficiency
Excellent problem-solving skills and a hands-on attitude.
High proficiency in Microsoft Office programs, especially Excel and Power Point.
Willingness to learn skill sets outside primary discipline.
Ability to travel 10% of the time is required (travel includes Domestic and International).
High interest in tools of the trade.",4.6,"Milwaukee Electric Tool Corporation
4.6","Brookfield, WI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1924,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
106,Software Engineer II - JAVA / Information Exploitation,-1,"U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.

Who we are
BBN Technologies is a premier research and development centers. Our diverse research portfolio combines the best technologies to deliver innovative, custom solutions with real-world benefit.

Located in Arlington, VA, our Information Exploitation group is seeking a Staff Scientist with software research interests. Our world-class team works with a broad range of Government agencies to solve problems that are both technically challenging and have a real operational impact. The ideal candidate will have strong experience in Java development with some experience or interest in machine reasoning, semantic web technologies, data analytics, or artificial intelligence technologies.

What you will do
Our research work applies the above technologies to build both prototype and real operational systems. You will be working on challenging problems including:

• Producing sophisticated software in a fast-paced agile environment;
• Developing mission-critical applications for deployment into global enterprise operations;
• Optimizing software for knowledge representation, storage, and query systems for high performance.
• Designing novel machine reasoning and learning algorithms and solutions to complex, open-ended intelligence problems.

What you will need
• BS in Computer Science or equivalent discipline and 2 years of experience; or MS in Computer Science or equivalent discipline and 0 years of experience.
• Proficiency in Java and the Java-based development ecosystem.
• Current DoD or IC Top Secret security clearance with SSBI. US citizenship is required

Other skills that would be awesome!
• 2-3 years of related research experience in one of the technical areas mentioned above.
• Experience with Web application development.
• Familiarity with modern software configuration management tools such as Docker, Gradle, Ivy, etc.
• TS/SCI is highly desired

Why us?
We offer outstanding benefits that include flexible work schedules, a competitive 401k company match, a Retirement Contribution plan, performance based incentive, paid parental leave, paid time off, and many other employee discounts.

This requisition is for future work. If you meet the requirements, you will be contacted by the recruiter.
167428

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Arlington, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
107,Associate Data Scientist,$81k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

As an Associate Data Scientist, you will apply modern data storage, movement, and transformation architectures and techniques to extract and engineer features from any scale structured or unstructured data in health, IT system, business processes, or external data. You will also access, cleanse, compile, and transform disparate data sets to conduct exploratory and pre-defined analyses using scientifically valid techniques and generate meaningful insights as well as assist with feasibility studies to identify data availability, quality and modeling requirements, and dependencies.

Qualifications

Basic Qualifications
Master’s Degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Analytics, Biostatistics, Applied Mathematics, Software Engineering, Data Science, or related field, or equivalent relevant work experience
At least 1 year of statistical programming and applied programming work experience
At least 1 year Data mining, quantitative analysis, and/or statistical modeling including predictive performance and algorithm optimization work experience
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with relational databases and SQL; NoSQL databases (hBase, Cassandra, MongoDB, Couch DB, Riak) and unstructured data; Spark; Pig and Avro
Experience with agile software development methodologies
Expectations
Willing to travel up to 20% of the time as needed
Must be currently residing in or willing to relocate to the Kansas City metro area",4.0,"Cerner
4.0","North Kansas City, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,1979,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
108,Senior Powertrain Engineer,$68k-$166k (Glassdoor Est.),"Embedded in a worldwide network Mercedes-Benz Research & Development North America continuously strives to remain at the forefront of successful automotive research and development. MBRDNA is headquartered in Silicon Valley, California, with key areas of Autonomous Driving, Advanced Interaction Design, Digital User Experience, Machine Learning, Customer Research, and Open Innovation. In Redford, Michigan, the focus is on Powertrain and eDrive technology as well as in Long Beach, where the teams test durability of the latest driver assistant and telematic systems. The Digital Hub in Seattle focusses on developing a cloud architecture and building out the cloud platform for the next generation of connected car services. The Testing and Regulatory Affairs Division in Ann Arbor and the Advanced Vehicle Design in Carlsbad complete the competence center.
Position Overview

Lead engineering support of light-duty conventional and electrified powertrain calibration, development and durability testing, and powertrain field issues.

Responsibilities –
•Lead testing to support calibration of powertrains in the areas of combustion, emissions control/OBD, fuel economy, driveability, and electrification
•Lead root cause analysis of issues; develop and confirm countermeasures
•Lead emissions testing and resolution of powertrain issues
•Lead investigations of powertrain field issues of US market vehicles
•Continuous improvement of development processes
•Train, coach, and mentor other engineers
•Author technical reports for a wide, global audience
Skills and Requirements -

•Experience with light-duty powertrain development in the areas of combustion, emissions control/OBD, fuel economy, driveability, and electrification
•Experience with light-duty conventional and electrified powertrain control units, especially Bosch control units
•Understanding of light-duty conventional and hybrid emissions and OBD regulations
•Proficiency with powertrain development tools such as INCA and Matlab/Simulink
•Ability to author clear and concise technical reports for a wide, global audience

Why should you apply?

Here at MBRDNA, you create digital ecosystems around cars, you design a language between humans and machines, you make a car even more intelligent - you make the new reality for cars. Our benefits include medical, dental and vision insurance, 401k savings plan, tuition and fitness reimbursement programs and much more. We have an open and flexible environment to allow you to push boundaries, join MBRDNA and design your future.
Check out our open jobs here. Learn more about MBRDNA and connect with us on LinkedIn, Twitter, Instagram and Facebook.

MBRDNA is an equal opportunity employer (EOE) and strongly supports diversity in the workforce.

MBRDNA only accepts resumes from approved agencies who have a valid Agency Agreement on file. Please do not forward resumes to our applicant tracking system, MBRDNA employees, or send to any MBRDNA location. MBRDNA is not responsible for any fees or claims related to receipt of unsolicited resumes.",3.3,"Mercedes-Benz Research & Development North America, Inc.
3.3","Long Beach, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1994,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
109,Senior Data Scientist,-1,"Overview:

Providence, RI

Minneapolis, MN

Remote

Who is Virgin Pulse?

Virgin Pulse, founded as part of Sir Richard Branson’s famed Virgin Group, helps organizations build employee health and wellbeing into the DNA of their corporate cultures. As the only company to deliver a powerful, mobile-first digital platform infused with live services, including coaching and biometric screenings, Virgin Pulse’s takes a high-tech-meets-high-touch-approach to engage employees in improving across all aspects of their health and wellbeing, every day – from prevention and building a healthy lifestyle to condition and disease management to condition reversal, all while engaging users daily in building and sustaining healthy habits and behaviors. A global leader in health and wellbeing, Virgin Pulse is committed to helping change lives and businesses around the world for good so that people and organizations can thrive, together. Today, more than 3100 organizations across the globe are using Virgin Pulse’s solutions to improve health, employee wellbeing and engagement, reduce costs and create strong workplace cultures.

Who are our employees?

At Virgin Pulse we’re passionate about changing lives for good. We want to make a difference in the world by helping people be healthy so they can perform at their best, every day, at work and home. Our award-winning solutions support leading employers in improving and simplifying the employee health and wellbeing journey and engaging people in all aspects of their health. But our world-class products and programs are nothing without our people – the employees who design, build, promote, sell, test and perfect the latest innovations in workplace health and wellbeing. Our people are our top priority and we invest in their health and happiness. At Virgin Pulse, we have so much more than a strong, supportive company culture – have a shared vision for a healthier, happier world.

Responsibilities:

Who you are.

You are an experienced, scalable Senior Data Scientist who will hit the ground running to support the organization’s efforts to maintain leadership in the employee health engagement SaaS industry. You have a strong statistical and modeling skill set, as well as the technical tools to complete projects end to end. This role will be responsible for accessing and building datasets, designing and conducting analysis, and creating and delivering data visualizations and reports. The incumbent will be able to interpret findings, clearly communicate results, and make recommendations to internal and external stakeholders. We are looking for someone who is self-directed and thrives working in a fast-paced, collaborative environment, in which expectations are high both for the quality and speed of work. A successful candidate will have a hunger for continuous learning, a desire to grow and lead, and strong interpersonal relationship skills.

In the role of a Senior Data Scientist, you will wear many hats and the following skills and abilities are crucial:

Design, conduct and manage new analytical research projects and experiments, starting with project planning, hypothesis development and data gathering, then to analysis and modeling, and through to communications and recommendations
Leverage existing studies, literature, and analyses into current research and analysis projects
Write Python, R and SQL programs to access, clean, and transform required data prior to analysis and reporting
Troubleshoot and perform data audits to ensure and improve data integrity; investigate and resolve data discrepancies
Develop and deliver analysis results using various visualization and presentation software/tools, such as R/Toolkit, Tableau, MS Powerpoint, MS Word, etc.
Consult to and collaborate with Product, Reporting, Analytics and Client Success team members to ensure appropriate data is analyzed and that results are provided in a format consistent with standard and customized client reporting services
Conduct ad-hoc analysis using varied analytical tools and techniques, including advanced statistics
Support Sales, Marketing, and Client Success staff with Virgin Pulse clients and prospects by directly communicating on data and analytics processes and projects, as well as the results of analyses
Work with Insights departmental processes, projects and programs using Smartsheet, MS and Atlassian toolsets to keep projects and milestones on schedule, our collaborative and internal work organized as well as externally facing documentation comprehensive, updated, and accessible
Achieve annual Key Performance Indicator objectives, which can include report volumes and scope, internal and external client satisfaction, introducing new areas of data and analysis, and influencing company product and process decisions
Qualifications:

What you bring to the team

To represent the best of what we have to offer, you come to us with a multitude of positive attributes, including:

A Master’s degree in statistics, computer science, economics, or related field; further Advanced degree is a plus
A minimum of seven years of work experience in a similar path, history of increasing responsibilities a plus;
Employee health management/health engagement industry preferred
Advanced knowledge and recent hands-on experiences in SQL databases, Redshift preferred
Extensive experience coding in at least one scripting language, such as R or Python
Knowledge of data visualization tools preferred (i.e. Tableau, R: Shiny, ggplot2)
Experience with producing and delivering results using varied media (i.e. multiple MS office formats, dashboards/visualization tools)
Experience in managing medium and large-scale analytics projects from end to end
Experience with clinical/medical data and work in employee health management/health engagement industry preferred
Comfort working in a global environment with remote teams

In addition, you possess the following additional competencies and characteristics:

Strong collaboration, process and project management skills
Strong analytical ability, with an emphasis on quantitative analysis, descriptive and inferential statistics
Experience working with large-scale datasets and multiple projects simultaneously
Aptitude to learn new technologies and troubleshoot complex problems independently
Creative energy, self-starter, works equally well independently and collaboratively
Flexibility and ability to adapt to changes in priority quickly and seamlessly
Strong organizing and coordination of work products, documents, and content for publication and distribution
Excellent communication and organization skills with the ability to manage competing priorities, meet deadlines, and process ad-hoc requests
Experience in providing consultative guidance and contributing to the growth and development of others

Why work here?

We believe a career should provide competitive pay and benefits, a collaborative and supportive work environment, strong employee culture and cutting-edge technology and services — so many reasons to love it here.
We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to any protected class status.",-1,VirginPulse,"Providence, RI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
110,Sr Software Engineer,-1,"Requisition ID 169550BR
Date updated 10/02/2020
CE39/CE40: Sr Software Engineer I / Sr Software Engineer II; G08/G09

Note: This is a position for experienced professionals. If you have completed your degree within the last 18 months please apply to RTX College jobs: https://jobs.raytheonmissilesanddefense.com/college-jobs

Check us out on YouTube: https://youtu.be/kfHlc8GCzoU
At Raytheon Technologies (RTX), we are defining the future of aerospace and defense with ambitious technologies that push the limits of known science. Our technologies help our customers take on the world's biggest challenges.

Job Summary:
We are currently seeking a Sr Software Engineer to join the Missile Defense & Surveillance Software Department in Huntsville, Alabama.

Our software teams employ disciplined software processes (CMMI Level 5) across the Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC). We use a variety of development methodologies and tools to produce high quality products for our customers. We strive for technical excellence by drawing upon a diverse workforce whose knowledge base covers the complete spectrum of modern computing languages and platforms. The successful Sr Software Engineer will be integrated into a small to medium-sized team performing software development, integration, and testing of real-time systems. As the Sr Software Engineer, you will be responsible for hands-on technical work including designing, implementing, debugging, and resolving problems with real-time software applications, as well as supporting software verification efforts.

Our software applications are developed using C++, Java, and Ada programming languages executing on a variety of computing platforms running Linux/Unix operation systems.

This position will require an Interim secret clearance or above to start. Except in rare circumstances, only US Citizens are eligible for a security clearance.

Required Skills/Experience:

•4+ years of prior object-oriented software development experience using C++, Java, and/or Ada as well as Linux/Unix operating systems.
•Established verbal and written communication skills. Works within a team construct to achieve program success.
•Experience in the code and test phases of Software Engineering. Familiarity with the Software Development Life Cycle.

This position will require an Interim secret clearance or above to start. Except in rare circumstances, only US Citizens are eligible for a security clearance.

Required Education (including Major):
•BS or MS degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Mathematics, Software Engineering, or relevant engineering discipline

Desired Skills/Experience:

•6+ yrs of prior object-oriented software development experience using C++, Java, and/or Ada as well as Linux/Unix operating systems.
•Real-time OS, preferably WindRiver Linux or LynxOS
•Scrum Master / Product Owner experience
•SBCs and BIOS update experience
•UML and preferably Model Driven Development using Rhapsody
•Agile software development
•Automated testing, continuous integration
•Standard MS-Office tools for word processing, spreadsheets, and presentations
•SEI CMMI model
•Machine Learning, Cyber, and/or Artificial Intelligence techniques
•Active Security clearance at the Secret level

KEYWORDS: software, engineer, object-oriented, java, ada, linux, unix, c++, real-time, uml, code, test, agile

At Raytheon Technologies, we innovate to create solutions and solve complex challenges across all domains: from land and sea to air, space, and cyberspace. In doing so, we embrace the talent, expertise and perspectives of our diverse workforce, each bringing their skills, ideas and dedication to the work we do. We pride ourselves on our commitment to our customers, industry partners and our teammates, making a positive impact not only to our business, but also in our communities where we live and work. Our constant innovation is made possible by a strong culture, investing in our people, and an unwavering vision that is shared by Raytheon Technologies employees across the globe a vision of one global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place.

What We Offer: Whether you are just starting out on your career journey or are an experienced professional, Raytheon Technologies offers a robust total rewards package that goes beyond with compensation; healthcare, wellness, retirement and work/life benefits; career development and recognition programs. Some of the superior benefits Raytheon Technologies offers include parental (including paternal) leave, flexible work schedules, achievement awards, educational assistance and child/adult backup care.

All these job responsibilities are to be executed in harmony with Raytheon Technologies' Code of Business Ethics and Conduct policy which sets the standard by which we operate and how we treat others.
Raytheon Technologies is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, or Vietnam era, or other eligible veteran status, or any other protected factor.
This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.

169550

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Huntsville, AL",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
111,Data Scientist,-1,"MUST BE A U.S. CITIZEN WITH AN ACTIVE TS/SCI-SSBI SECURITY CLEARANCE *
Ability to develop analytics for multiple cyber weapon systems with many different infrastructure and end-point devices. Ability to incorporate predictive, descriptive, and presumptive modeling; machine learning; artificial intelligence into analytics. Must be able to code proficiently in one or more of the following languages: Python, R, Scala, Spark, and Maven. Develop algorithms in one or more of the following Machine Learning areas: anomaly detection, one/few-shot learning, deep learning, unsupervised feature learning, ensemble methods, probabilistic graphical models, reinforcement learning. Ability to develop analytics based upon the Mitre ATT&CK Matrix or other applicable CS&D framework to discover, identify, characterize, and/or create signatures for cyberspace threat activity. Ability to assist in the development and implementation of a data analytics program. Develop robust documentation and comprehensive user manuals for all developed projects

Original Hire Document for data scientist below:

Job Responsibilities:

· Perform big data analysis on information technology infrastructure and end-point devices

· Customer outreach and engagement

· Problem solving

· Time management

· Collaborate with others

· Mission focused

· Deliver findings

· Accept and assess customer data, dashboard, requirements

· Identify new ways to visualize and analyze data

· Develop analytics to identify anomalous activity based on customer requirements

· Perform hunt operations identifying anomalous activity

· Produce reports based on misconfigurations and/or anomalous activity discovered through analysis

Knowledge/Skills Ability:

Required:

· Ability to analyze and assess software development or data acquisition requirements and determine optimum, cost-effective solutions.

· Proficiency in one or more big data programming languages, such as R, Python, Scala, or Spark and Maven.

· Experience working with a hybrid team of analysts, visualization experts, engineers, and developers to conduct research, and build and deploy complex, but easy-to-use analytical platforms.

· Previous experience performing research in Data Analytics or big data.

· Be Director of Central Intelligence Directives 6/4 eligible (Top Secret) with a current Single Scope Background Investigation (SSBI)

Minimum Experience/Education:

· At least one (1) of the following:

· Four (4) years experience in cyberspace operations

· IAT Level 1 per DoD 8140 (Net+, Sec+, etc.)

· Experience on National/Service cyber weapon system/platform within last five years

Highly Desired:

· Education/ Certifications:

· 4+ years of experience in data analytics or quantitative intelligence analysis

· Four (4) years of experience in an intelligence field at a tactical or operational level

· DoD 8570 IAT related BA/BS degree

\*BEAT LLC IS AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER - DISABILITY AND VETERANS\*

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
10 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Data Analytics: 4 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
License:
CompTIA Security+ (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Required)
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.9,"B E A T LLC
4.9","San Antonio, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Telecommunications Services,Telecommunications,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
112,X-Ray Tubes Senior Processing Engineer,$69k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary: Sr. Process Engineer to work with Tubes Engineering team, comprised of Process Engineers, Design and Development Engineers, Scientists, and Engineering Technicians to support the development and sustainment of X-Ray tubes. The Sr. Process Engineer will work directly with engineering, logistics and production to incorporate new product into manufacturing and support manufacturing and production control in the continuous improvement to existing product. The Sr. Process Engineer will also be responsible for the mentoring and development of junior engineers and technicians.

Essential Functions:
Drives the gathering and analysis of data relating to engineering design, manufacturing & product support requirements.
Utilizes an advanced understanding of product design and build processes and applies standard methods and basic principles of Lean Product Development, Theory of Constraints and Project Management.
Coordinates the gathering of raw data and processes data and communicates in meaningful forms (e.g. Flow Charts, Pareto Charts, Control Charts) to capture current manufacturing yields as well as drive yield improvements.
Oversee the performance of processes and tests. Document the results of processes and tests.
Evaluate current processes and designs. Identify potential improvements and be able to evaluate the return on investment and risk associated with identified improvements.
Use problem solving and decision making tools to analyze a situation and determine the best course of action.
Support Materials Team with First Article reviews and communicate with vendors for non-conformity issues and to coordinate material and specification changes.
Detailed knowledge of UHV design and requirements, clean room operations, and machining technology.
Detailed knowledge of metal to ceramic brazing processes.
Strong understanding of electron optics and high voltage electric field interaction.
Education and Experience:
B.S. or M.S. in engineering field or science related discipline (ABET preferred)
10+ years of experience in micro-manufacturing environment (X-Ray tube manufacturing preferred)
Six Sigma and/or lean manufacturing training preferred.
DOE matrix creation and interpretation
Proficient in MS Office. Specifically: Excel, Word, Visio and Project.

Competencies:
To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies to perform the essential functions of this position.
Adaptability - understands changes in work-group tasks, situations, and the department as well as the logic or basis for change; actively seeks information about changes affecting their individual job. Treats changes and new situations as opportunities for learning or growth.
Engineering Processes - Advanced knowledge of responsibilities and tasks performed by various Engineering departments/disciplines (e.g., design, test, software, technology). Advanced knowledge of the interaction between departments/ disciplines and how their products/processes affect one another and impact non-engineering processes (e.g., Operations, Logistics, Business).
Motivation self-starter able to function with minimal supervision. Actively coordinates with others to proactively identify and resolve potential conflicts in order to meet defined project timelines.
Communication strong communication skills, both written and verbal.
Statistical Background strong understanding of various statistical tools and programs

design and development, x-ray tubes, ABET, x-ray manufacturing
Job Posted by ApplicantPro",3.2,"Moxtek
3.2","Orem, UT",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
113,Software Engineer,$48k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"The safety and security of CSC’s current and prospective employees, customers, and the communities we serve are our first priority.

Due to coronavirus (COVID-19) concerns, we have transitioned to virtual interviews for the foreseeable future. We look forward to all upcoming video and phone interview conversations with our prospective candidates.

We are always in search of top talent to join the CSC family. If you are looking for a career change, don’t hesitate to apply or reach out to us. We’ll have virtual interactions until we are able to move forward again with in-person interactions.

If you value rewarding software development projects, access to training and career advancement, and working with great people in a positive culture—we do too! Come help us create automation software for over 50% of the Fortune 500 companies. You will receive an industry-best total compensation package and work with tools like Visual Studio 2017, Azure, Cloud Services, TypeScript, Angular 6, .NET/C#, and SQL 2017

Qualified engineers should have a strong working knowledge of the latest Microsoft tools and technologies used to develop .NET Web applications. In this role you will play an active role in the design and development of features for our cloud-based commercial Tax Software product. This role can be REMOTE.

TECHNICAL QUALIFICATIONS
At least 3 years of software design and development experience
C#, .NET 4.6+, ASP.NET MVC, LINQ, JavaScript/Typescript, Angular, CSS, AJAX
Visual Studio, Team Foundation Server
Windows Server, IIS
MS SQL Server
CANDIDATE QUALITIES
Penchant and passion for software product development
Demonstrable skills in object oriented design, patterns and programming
Proficiency with unit and integration testing of code
Proven ability, willingness and motivation to learn and grow in an organization
Willingness to learn from mistakes, adapt and improve
Track record of delivering high quality work in a fast-paced environment
Ability to communicate clearly, concisely and accurately
A history of contributing ideas and opinions in a dynamic, diverse and talented team
What can we offer you?
Competitive compensation and benefit programs including 401k, medical, dental, vision and vacation plans are just a few of the many ways this company rewards its employees for their excellent performance
Continuous on-the-job training, mentoring, MSDN and Pluralsight subscriptions and the opportunity to learn from experienced and talented software professionals
Opportunity to work with customers directly and have an immediate and direct impact on their work
Sit or stand work stations, dual monitors available, SSD hard drives, i7 CPU, 64gb machines
A casual work environment with flexible schedules and work from home options
CSC Corptax is an Equal Opportunity Employer
#corptax",3.3,"Corptax
3.3","Buffalo Grove, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
114,Principal DevOps Engineer,$135k-$163k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Tamr we believe that clean, up to date data is the linchpin of making informed decisions. We assert that the best way to have accurate data is via human guided machine learning system, that improves over time. We believe that human intelligence can not be replaced by machines. We are building the core set of tools, to enable companies to leverage their existing domain expertise and data, to produce clean, up to date data to be used as fuel to make better decisions and deliver transformational business outcomes.

We are currently looking for a Principal DevOps Engineer to join our DevOps team as we continue to evolve the Tamr Platform. With our growing customer base and increasing demand for additional services, we are growing our Devops team to focus on supporting the development of new products, deploying to new cloud environments, incorporating third party integrations and tools to enable product engineering.
As a member of the DevOps team some of the project you will be working on are:
Develop highly scalable, cloud native architectures for large data pipelines
Build out Tamr Platform as a Service (PaaS) to deploy and monitor scaled out Tamr deployments in the cloud
Enhance observability of our platform in the cloud via distributed tracing and other technologies
Enable the engineering team to build scalable, performant, reliable, & secure software
Support in establishing DevSecOps and Chaos Engineering as core disciplines of Product Engineering
Overhauling our build and deployment pipeline (CI/CD) to utilize open source platforms and tools to support a core platform and the many applications built on the platform
You might be a good fit if you have 2 or more of the below:
7+ years of experience in DevOps/Systems Administration with 5+ years of experience with Linux/Unix systems administration
3+ years of experience with cloud-based provisioning, monitoring, and troubleshooting (preferably AWS or Azure)
3+ years of hadoop experience1+ year(s) of k8s experience
Experience with configuration management tools (we use ansible + puppet)
Experience with infrastructure automation tools like CloudFormation or Terraform
Experience with one or more scripting languages such as Python
Minimum Bachelor degree in Computer Science or equivalent
Technologies we use:
Multi-cloud (GCP/AWS/Azure)
Terraform/Ansible/Puppet
Kubernetes
Big Data Technologies (BigTable/Hbase, Dataproc/Databricks/Spark)
Postgres
Java, Python, Scala
Additional Information

This position is available in Cambridge MA. Tamr does sponsor employees requiring a visa.

Tamr provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, marital status, amnesty, or status as a covered veteran in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.",4.3,"Tamr
4.3","Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
115,Engineer,-1,"Who Are We?

QinetiQ Inc. is a leading innovator with over 25 years of experience rapidly developing advanced C5ISR sensor solutions and is a renowned world leader in robotics and autonomy.

The combined QinetiQ U.S. business unit brings capabilities across the full lifecycle of technology development from applied research and development to rapid prototyping, testing, fielding, and sustainment. Our expertise with unmanned platforms, broad sensing modalities, and cross-domain interoperability ensures that we deliver integrated solutions for Warfighter dominance in all phases of combat.

We are a world-class team of professionals who deliver next generation technology and products in robotic and autonomous platforms and systems, ground systems, soldier systems, maritime systems, airborne sensors and payloads, processing and exploitation capabilities, and integrated C2 solutions. Much of our work contributes to innovative research in ﬁelds such as sensor science, signal processing, data fusion, artiﬁcial intelligence (AI), machine learning (ML), and augmented reality (AR).

Our customers are always our number one priority and we consistently deliver Mission-Led Innovation to empower and protect our Defense and Security forces in the U.S. and abroad.

Your Contribution to Our Mission:
This position provides Engineer support services to the Naval Surface Warfare Center, Dahlgren Division (NSWCDD), Platform Integration (H40) Division. The Unmanned & Expeditionary Weapon Systems division designs, develops, and integrates safe, innovative, and effective weapon control systems, detection systems, sensory, and weapon systems onto manned, unmanned, land, air, and sea platforms for the warfighter to include lethal and non-lethal weapons, guidance and control, unmanned and autonomous systems, advanced sensory, and weapons effectiveness for surface warfare, maritime operations, expeditionary warfare and special operations.
The position supports all technical and engineering stages of development, test, integration, and fielding of safe and innovative weapon control systems, detection systems support, advanced weapon systems support, autonomous system support, mechanical and electrical technician support towards assembly and integration. Other duties indirectly supporting these efforts include providing business operational and financial reporting support, writing technical documentation, maintaining technical databases, and editorial support of technical publications.
Duties and Responsibilities:
conduct system, subsystem, component performance, and effectiveness improvement studies.
perform obsolescence analyses with recommendations for replacement components, parts, and systems.
provide subject matter expertise to investigate system, subsystem, and component level failures during design, integration, test, manufacture, and end-use to provide recommendations for corrective actions.
analyze deficiencies discovered during testing, outlined in production reports, maintenance reports, and user feedback trouble reports, to provide recommendations on corrective actions.
perform producibility trade studies and analyze production processes to: determine the most cost-effective fabrication/manufacturing process; resolve a failure observed during testing attributed to manufacture; and reduce manufacture process technology risk.
develop and generate assembly procedures and analyze approaches and generate plans to validate fabrication/manufacturing processes.
develop and generate user operator manuals, preventive maintenance schedule manuals, and installation and removal procedures.
develop and generate demilitarization plans.
provide subject matter expertise to develop new and modify existing Production Automated Test Equipment (ATE) hardware and software that can successfully run Factory Acceptance Tests (FAT) for USN tactical electronics hardware.
To Land This Job, You Need:
A Bachelor of Science (BS) degree from an accredited college or university in an engineering, scientific, or technical discipline.
Three (3) years professional technical experience which includes at least one (1) year specialized experience performing mechanical, electrical, or computer engineering.
Clearance Level Must Currently Possess:

DOD Secret

Why QinetiQ Inc.?
Your work will contribute to the protection of American Warfighters and Security Forces.
Opportunity to work with cutting edge technology.
Extensive opportunities for continuous learning, professional growth and advancement.
We only hire the best! No matter if you are entry or senior level, you will have the opportunity learn from some of the best in the industry.
We have fun! We regularly have company events, from luncheons and costume contests to golf tournaments.
We care about YOU and YOUR FAMILY. We offer competitive benefits and health insurance options.
No One Has Time for Long Job Applications!

We completely understand. That is why we have made the application process easy. We promise. This will be simple.

Accessibility/Accommodation:

If because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to staffing@us.qinetiq.com or call (540) 658-2720 Opt 4 and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.

QinetiQ Inc. is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",2.9,"QinetiQ North America
2.9","Dahlgren, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1956,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
116,Software Engineer,$45k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Overview:

This position is ideal for a data-focused engineer with a strong SQL, Spark, Python and ETL experience who is looking to work with massive amounts of data in a cutting-edge, cloud-based environment. You will be responsible for building new and innovative data solutions using technologies and tools from Apache and AWS, including Redshift, Spark, S3, and Airflow. These solutions allow the business to use data in impactful and meaningful ways to drive strategy and decision making.

Responsibilities:
Create data integration pipelines to extract, cleanse, and integrate data, from a variety of sources and formats, to support data analytics, data science, machine learning, and BI reporting
Design and develop scalable and re-usable solutions that support both real-time and/or batch-based data processing
Own the data expertise and data quality for the integration pipelines
Fulfill ad-hoc requests from business partners for data residing in AWS Redshift, and/or S3
Interact with business partners to lead technical solution discussions
Experience with Agile/Scrum methodology framework for product development
Required Skills:
2+ years of programming experience with Python or C#
Experience building Spark-based data pipelines using near/real-time data
2+ years of working experience with Amazon Web Services, specifically Redshift, S3, and EC2
Strong ANSI SQL, NoSQL and SparkSQL query language skills
Comfortable working in an entrepreneurial, start-up like environment
Strong problem-solving skills; collaborator and data advocate
Excellent written and oral communication skills & customer service skills
Bachelor's or Master's Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Math, or other related discipline; or equivalent work experience
Desired Skills:
Minimum 2 years demonstrated, hands-on experience with the AWS ecosystem of tools and technologies
Experience with SSIS or equivalent ETL tool
Ability to build ETL pipelines from scratch, using streaming, near real-time, and micro-batch data
Experience with complex multi-server environments & high availability environments
Experience with system monitoring, log management, and error notification
Experience in Ad-Tech industry a plus
Applicants and employees for this position will not be sponsored for work authorization.
Apply now

Name

Email

Job Title

Resume

Cover Letter

Submit",3.7,"AdTheorent
3.7","Jacksonville, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
117,Controls Engineer,-1,"DSI Innovations LLC (DSI), a quality Industrial Automation Systems Integrator headquartered in Thomasville, NC, is looking for a *Controls Engineer* to join our Thomasville office team.

The ideal candidate has a proven record of accomplishment working as a Systems Integrator. Automation team members can execute projects in a way that results in profitable, repeat business. Employee work habits including being consultative in nature, being curious, communicating effectively, planning work and understanding company strategy to support individual decision making.

Technical responsibilities include designing, specifying, programming and commissioning automation systems in an industrial manufacturing environment.

_### *FactoryTalk Batch* experience is a MUST ###_
Job Location*
42 high tech blvd Thomasville, NC 27063
Starting Salary*
Depends on experience
Relocation Assistance*
Yes
Roles and Responsibilities*
Design, upgrade and troubleshoot new and existing control systems based on company guidelines and/or customer needs.
Design, upgrade new and existing HMI applications based on company guidelines and/or customer needs.
Create/Follow design specifications.
Create, update, and interpret electrical schematics.
Manage project goals, schedule, and budget.
Perform field commissioning based on customer goals and project requirements.
Requirements*
_MUST _have a history of multiple projects developing and supporting *FactoryTalk Batch*. PlantPAx is a big plus.
Minimum of 5 years’ experience in industrial automation and controls experience. We prefer candidates with a Systems Integrator background.
Must be authorized to work in the U.S.
Must agree to up to 25% travel.
Must work out of the Thomasville, NC office location when not in the field.
Helpful Experience*
PlantPAx, Allen-Bradley, Programmable Logic Controller (PLC), PLC Programming, PLC Allen Bradley, PLC Ladder Logic, PLC Siemens, Step 5 PLC, Omron, FactoryTalk, FactoryTalk View, RSLogix, RSLinx, RSView, Control Logic, HMI Programming, HMIs, HMI Design, HMI Configuration, Human Machine Interface, Siemens PLC, TIA Portal, S7, Step 5 PLC, Step 7 PLC, PanelView, Ladder Logic, Industrial Engineering, Industrial Automation, Industrial Control.
Company Benefits*
Health Insurance Options (Medical, Dental, and Vision), with varying levels of coverage and premiums, including one plan that covers 100% of the employee’s medical premium.
Health Savings Account (only if enrolled in HSA Medical Plan option)
Healthcare Flexible Spending Account
Dependent Care Flexible Spending Account
401k (Traditional and Roth 401k options), with company match
Basic Life Insurance ($25,000)
Long-term Disability (50% up to $1,000/month after 180 days of disability)
Competitive Salary
Flexible Scheduling
Profit-Sharing
Holidays and Vacation Time
Covered Travel Expenses and Mileage Reimbursement
Weekend Pay on Qualified Projects
Qualities We Are Looking For*
Strong work ethic
Strong attention to detail
Great problem-solving skills
Highly self-managed
A strong desire to learn and grow
Work well with others
Creative thinker
Willingness to dig in and get it done
Company Culture*
""There's a way to do it better - find it!"" - Thomas Edison
Casual dress.
Work hard. Play hard.
When you’re at work, be at work. When at home, forget work, be with family.
“No” isn’t in our vocabulary.
A bunch of friends that go the extra mile for each other.
Football, Baseball, and geeky stuff too like World of Warcraft, Raspberry Pi, and yes, even Magic the Gathering.
Nobody left behind.
Apply now!*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: Up to $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
control systems: 5 years (Preferred)
Willingness To Travel:
25% (Preferred)
Work Location:
Multiple locations
Work Remotely:
No",-1,DSI Innovations LLC,"Thomasville, NC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
118,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Job Title: Machine Learning Engineer

Location: Atlanta

WHY YOU'LL LOVE SALESLOFT:

Put Customers First. Team Over Self. Focus on Results. Bias Towards Action. Glass Half Full.

These are the values that define who we are, that have empowered our staggering growth, and could be instrumental to your career development

Headquartered in Atlanta, Georgia, with offices in San Francisco, New York, London, Indianapolis, and Guadalajara, SalesLoft is growing rapidly and is looking for future Lofters to join our team. As a testament to our Organizational Health, SalesLoft has been named by Forbes as one of America's Best Startup Employers in 2020, twice by Deloitte as a 'Fastest-Growing Technology Company in North America,' featured by The New York Times as a start-up on a path to a $1B valuation, and has been recognized as a '#1 Best Place to Work in Atlanta' three separate years. SalesLoft is ranked #1 in the emerging category of Sales Engagement software and is on a mission to equip companies to maximize revenue by creating a fantastic buying experience.

We're redefining an age old industry! This is challenging work – but our team of brilliant creatives makes the journey thrilling. We're fast-paced, innovative, and collaborative. We pursue excellence in everything and have a lot of fun along the way. Come join us!

THE OPPORTUNITY:

Although we're proud of our history, we're just as excited about the future. We want to create a world-class culture and company that attracts, develops, engages and retains elite talent.

At SalesLoft, our Machine Learning Engineers are pivotal to our company's success. You will be a key member of our fast-growing and high-performing engineering team working on new technologies in an environment that supports your technical and professional growth.

On a day-to-day basis, you will be responsible for serving as a liaison between the Data Science and Product Delivery teams to architect and deliver end-to-end data pipelines. Specifically, you will:
Operationalize machine learning research at SalesLoft.
Collaborate with Data Scientists on building and delivering models to production environments.
Manage complete data lifecycles, including feature engineering, ETL workflows, iterating on deployed models, and monitor for model drift.
Formalize the software development of machine learning in the platform by establishing standard frameworks and workflows.
Build solutions at scale.
Mentor peer Software Engineers who collaborate on development and seek to learn.
In addition to working with amazing colleagues who exemplify our 'team over self' core value, you will also have the opportunity to create impactful and revolutionary software that is changing the way sellers sell. You will have an opportunity to make a difference.

WHAT WE'RE LOOKING FOR:

We are seeking a bias-towards-action candidate who will help make machine learning a pervasive presence in the SalesLoft culture and platform. We are looking for someone who can establish the foundations for delivering novel research based on practical experience, at scale. Ideal candidates will be familiar with both structured and unstructured (natural language processing) data pipelines. They will advise the data research team on how to best architect, deploy, and maintain models in production environments, while also serving as a mentor to other engineers who are collaborating on software or express a passion for learning more about machine learning. We are looking for someone who can clearly communicate to less-technical audiences and participate in roadmap planning based on customer feedback.

If you're looking for an opportunity to learn more, do more, and become more than previously possible… if you're passionate about innovation, growth and serving customers and thrive in a fast-paced, developmental environment, then becoming a Machine Learning Engineer is the career path for you

THE TEAM:

Our SalesLoft's Engineering team is comprised of seasoned and up-and-coming Data Scientists and Software Engineers who are all aligned on one vision and mission:
Vision: Every seller is loved by the buyers they serve (#saleslove)
Mission: Equip companies to maximize revenue by creating a fantastic buying experience
The Engineering team consists of seasoned and up-and-coming Software Engineers who are all aligned on one mission: to redefine the Sales Engagement space and activate the authentic seller in all of us. They are also the epitome of our core values - Customers First. Team Over Self. Focus on Results. Bias Towards Action. Glass Half Full.

THE SKILL SET:
2+ years of proven experience in building machine learning applications at scale
Python software development
Deep learning tools; TensorFlow, Keras
Word embeddings; Word2vec, GloVe
Strong SQL skills across many data stores
Diverse extract-transform-load (ETL) experience
Strong communication and collaboration skills
Desire to learn and continuously improve
Cloud-based environments; AWS, GCP
Containerized workflows and deployment; Docker, Kubernetes
Bachelor's degree preferred
WITHIN ONE MONTH, YOU'LL:
Attend SalesLoft's New Hire Orientation, where you will learn our SalesLoft story and understand what makes our ""Lofters"" unique
Learn how the SalesLoft platform works and helps customers win
Begin 1:1's with your manager, understand your 30-60-90 plan, meet & shadow current members of the SalesLoft team
Set your OKRs (Objectives and Key Results) with your manager and develop an action plan to achieve them
Meet key partners in Data Science and Product Delivery
Become familiar with existing machine learning features and workflows in the product
Be an active participant in team meetings and learn about ongoing research and development projects
WITHIN THREE MONTHS, YOU'LL:
Be familiar with the platform and data science code in production
Actively implementing data pipelines
Planning incremental improvements towards better positioning the platform for data science applications
Collaborating with internal and external stakeholders to establish clear objectives, acceptance criteria and timelines.
Immerse yourself in the technical and sales contexts of the SalesLoft platform.
Interact regularly with data infrastructure, engineering and technical operations teams and start to establish monitoring metrics and processes.
Implement the first of several large scale NLP models into production.
Gain experience learning about and joint problem solving high level business problems
Provide Internal expertise in data science and machine learning skill areas.
WITHIN SIX MONTHS, YOU'LL:
Implement model monitoring capabilities and processes
Be responsible for custom ETL design, implementation and maintenance
Advise team members on improving model performance.
Owning data science engineering projects and managing the data science software development lifecycle.
Sharing knowledge, debating techniques, and conducting research to advance the collective knowledge and skills of our organization.
Providing mentorship, guidance and support to junior team members with a focus on developing scalable talent while amplifying individual expertise and contributions.
WITHIN TWELVE MONTHS, YOU'LL:
Pioneer initiatives around handling unstructured data, data quality and performance.
Interpreting data science challenges and opportunities into actionable engineering strategies
Proactively identify forward-looking data engineering strategies, utilizing appropriate technologies, and implementing at scale.
Recognized as a leader on the SalesLoft data team.
IS THIS ROLE NOT AN EXACT FIT? Keep an eye on our Careers Page for other positions!

WHY SHOULD YOU WORK AT SALESLOFT:
You will become part of an amazing culture with a supportive CEO and smart teammates who actually care
You will work with an amazing team you can learn from and teach.
You will experience joining a high-growth/high-traction organization.
You will hear ""Yes, let's do that!"" and then have the opportunity to successfully execute on your ideas
We have a vibrant, open office that utilizes modern technology.
You will grow more here than you would anywhere else, that is a promise.
SalesLoft is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, disability, veteran status, pregnancy, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"SalesLoft
4.5",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
119,Backend Engineer,$69k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Overview:
Age of Learning is a leading education technology innovator based in Glendale, California, with a talented team of more than 600 individuals comprised of nationally-renowned educators, curriculum experts, developers, artists, writers, designers, engineers, producers, product managers, analysts and marketing experts! Together we develop engaging, effective digital learning technology and content to help children build a strong academic foundation for lifelong success.
Our flagship product ABCmouse.com Early Learning Academy® is a comprehensive online curriculum and the #1 digital learning product for young children. To-date, more than 30 million children worldwide have completed over 7 billion Learning Activities on ABCmouse. We recently launched Adventure Academy, the first massively multiplayer online (MMO) game designed specifically to help elementary- and middle-school-aged children learn. It features thousands of engaging Learning Activities—including minigames, books, original animated and live action series, and more—in a fun and safe virtual world. Other Age of Learning programs include immersive English language learning products for children in China and Japan; ReadingIQ, a digital library and literacy platform; and a groundbreaking personalized, adaptive digital learning system that individualizes math instruction for every child through AI-driven technology.

We are committed to helping all children succeed. We provide our educational programs at no cost to teachers, Head Start programs, public libraries, and other community organizations, and have served millions of children through these initiatives. We recently established the Age of Learning Foundation to expand this work globally.
As we expand our global reach and increase the educational impact of our programs, we’re looking for passionate, ambitious, and collaborative leaders to become a part of our growing team.


Summary:
Document and implement API services that support Marketing business requirements across all Age of Learning products; write integration tests for Marketing use cases; develop and exercise department coding and documentation standards and best practices; assist Quality Assurance with feature testing; collaborate with other departments in the event of project co-ownership.
Responsibilities:
Write efficient, scalable, and easily testable APIs
Document existing and new code using PSR documentation standards
Write and maintain Postman integration tests
Fix API bugs when needed
Complete projects by target deadlines
Communicate effectively to technical and non-technical members of the company
Qualifications:
Some experience / knowledge in building RESTful APIs in PHP
Some experience working experience with SQL and NoSQL data store
Some experience in Postman or other integration testing platform
Some experience with OOP (Object-Oriented Programming)
Some experience with Git
Basic knowledge of container services, such as Docker, is a plus
Excellent problem-solving skills
Strong interpersonal skills and a self-starter
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Comfortable working in a fast-paced and collaborative environment
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field or equivalent combination of education and experience
Strong work ethic required, sense of humor a plus
We Provide:
Medical, Dental, Vision + 401k
Highly competitive PTO policy
Casual Dress Code
Snacks + Drinks (Coca Cola Freestyle Machine)
Gaming room including an Arcade (2,000+ games)
Frequent team and company outings
Limitless opportunities for professional growth!",3.1,"Age of Learning
3.1","Glendale, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,K-12 Education,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
120,Senior Systems Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE),$66k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Systems Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE)

Job Description:
Title: Senior Systems Software Engineer at Vertica (US - REMOTE)

Location: Remote Eligible

Vertica believes that each of us knows the work environment that makes us the most productive. Thats why we provide our employees with the ability to work how and where they will be the most successful. We enable a flexible approach to work location, meaning for roles where it makes sense, you can work from the office or from home, or a combination of both, but you make that choice including where you choose to live. Vertica invests in the best technologies and provides flexible benefits and collaborative work environments to empower employees to work productively in the setting that meets their personal needs. Thats why were so proud to have a highly productive and engaged team in every function of the company.

About your role
Youll be part of the team that enables the database to scale larger without compromising on consistency. The ability to scale-out the database can lead to higher query throughput and faster single query performance.
You will help design and implement innovative features to efficiently maintain consistency even in the face of frequent updates made to a database that is comprised of very many nodes. To accomplish this, youll leverage your knowledge of distributed systems, networking, and systems level programming.
Its an exciting time to join the team. The amount of data stored and analyzed is growing fast, as is the number of transactions and queries processed per second. In response our engineers are constantly thinking of new ways to scale larger.
Required skills
C/C++ or Java
Proficient with multi-threaded applications
Customer focused with the ability to work in a cross-functional team with QA, documentation and others
Advanced knowledge of algorithms and data structures
Excellent communication
Desired skills
Distributed systems
Database internals
Willingness and ability to mentor interns and junior team members
SQL

About our team
The best ideas often come from fresh perspectives. At Vertica, our open-minded, diverse and inclusive team is always learning from each other. We approach intellectually challenging work with a ""get it done"" attitude. Vertica Engineers are given significant latitude and support to pursue what they are passionate about to make Vertica an even better place. If you are excited about building great technology with a proactive team, you will find yourself in good company at Vertica. Welcome to the family.
About our product
Vertica is a recognized leader in analytics powering some of the worlds most data driven organizations like Uber, Wayfair, Intuit, Cerner, and more. Our columnar, MPP, distributed database delivers unprecedented speed, petabyte scale, with analytics and machine learning functions built into the core.
We believe the future belongs to the fast. Join us for the ride!

#LI-GC2

#DiceGC

Job:

Engineering

Micro Focus is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Prospective employees will receive consideration without discrimination because of race, colour, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, marital or veteran status, sexual orientation, genetic information, citizenship or any other legally protected status",3.3,"Micro Focus
3.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
121,Senior Data Scientist 4 Artificial Intelligence,$74k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311095

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing & Analytics

Group: Data Sciences & Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and artificial intelligence research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to AI assurance, remote sensing and geo-spatial analytics, human language technologies, computer vision, and other related fields.

+ The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as natural language processing, remote-sensing and geo-spatial intelligence, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery (e.g., publication in conferences such as NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred)

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 7 years of experience, Masters with 5 years of experience or PHD with 3 years of experience
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-23_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-11-21_",4.0,"Pacific Northwest National Laboratory
4.0","Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1965,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
122,"Translational Data Scientist, Oncology Data Science",$86k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"18-Sep-2020

Job ID
303124BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""1 purpose...to reimagine medicine!

The Oncology Data Science (OncDS) group in NIBR brings together projects spanning the entire clinical development pipeline, across a wide and unique range of novel therapeutics (e.g.: targeted and immunotherapies, radioligands, cell and gene therapies). OncDS:
•Oversees NGS data generation and performs analysis for thousands of oncology clinical samples, informing drug discovery and development
•Integrates internal and external data across distinct clinical trials to produce recognized translational impact
•Applies cutting-edge technologies and analytic approaches to discover and characterize the molecular mechanisms of therapeutic response in individual cancer patients

Description:
We are seeking a data scientist who will advance the translation of multi-dimensional molecular data (e.g. NGS) to biomarker discovery in clinical trials. The successful candidate will nurture close collaborations with oncology clinical trial teams, interpret candidate biomarkers and contribute to large-scale meta-analyses across trials and indications. Specific job responsibilities include:
•Collaboration on the design and execution of molecular biomarker profiling studies in oncology clinical trials
•Exploration of molecular data in the context of clinical variables to discover biomarkers of response/resistance to therapy
•Communication of key findings to trial teams and diverse group of scientists
•Application of biostatistics and machine learning methods across datasets from multiple clinical trials to gain actionable biological insights
•Application and development of computational methods for analyses of longitudinal biomarker and clinical data to characterize patients’ response to treatment
•Development of innovative analytic approaches to integrate and visualize complex clinical datasets
•Interaction with clinicians, project managers, data engineers, and other scientists to facilitate progression of projects across milestones

Posting Title
Translational Data Scientist, Oncology Data Science",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
123,Senior Marketing Data Scientist,$100k-$164k (Glassdoor Est.),"National Funding is continuing to grow its Analytics Department and has an exciting opportunity as a Senior Data Scientist. This high-profile role is at the center of activity for the company and is a major driver and contributor to National Funding's core strategy and growth. We are looking for a data-driven individual with excellent analytical skills and experience to work alongside business stakeholders primarily on our Direct Marketing team to deliver insights and make recommendations.

Senior Data Scientist Major Responsibilities

Provides analytic support and strategic thought partnership to Direct Marketing team
The ideal candidate will have the ability to tell stories with the data, communicate effectively and instill confidence in recommendations to motivate stakeholders to take action
Builds recommendations by synthesizing data from multiple sources, developing assumptions where needed, to drive business insights and strategy development
Delivers key insights with interpretation and recommendation, contributes to the development of hypotheses and actions, and presents them to management team
Partners with Marketing leaders to identify key customer segments and contributes to the execution of various campaigns and initiatives
Develop statistical models to aide in selection of prospects for direct mail campaigns
Develops new and better analytics approaches to solve questions in a creative way

The Ideal Candidate

3-5 years of experience in data analysis, preferably in Direct Marketing
Hands-on expertise with data mining and statistical modeling techniques such as clustering, classification, regression, tree-based methods, neural nets, support vector machines, anomaly detection, and natural language processing
Proven leadership within a data-driven organization with the ability to influence decisions
Strong knowledge of SQL and/or SAS
Experience with SAS, R, Python and other data modeling tools
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Experience with Tableau (preferred) or similar BI tools
Experience with A/B testing setup and evaluation preferred
Outstanding communication skills with both technical and non-technical colleagues

Prefer candidates with experience in Finance, Mortgage, Banking",3.4,"National Funding
3.4","San Diego, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
124,Sr Principal Data Scientist,$150k-$239k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

OBJECTIVE:

The purpose of this position is to provide data science expertise in the following areas:

Understanding and effectively working with a wide variety of data sources, such as wearable device data (for example accelerometry and ECG), voice recordings, imaging data, electronic health records or social media postings. Gleaning insights from these datasets and accurately assessing their usefulness and limitations.
Applying a breadth of data science methodogies as needed for various projects and data types. Projects will require advanced analytical and statistical methods, such as statistical inference and modern methods for machine learning and AI.
Identifying and applying state-of-the-art data manipulation and analysis tools, in various programming languages, to develop bespoke analysis pipelines.
Independently designing studies, ranging from simple to more complex, and supporting all aspects of projects from data wrangling through to machine learning and statistical analysis.
Understanding how data science projects fit within Takeda’s preclinical and clinical efforts, with the goal of using data science to better understand the patient journey and to help us tailor interventions that maximize patient benefit.

ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Independently represent data science function on global project teams in support of pre-clincial and clinical studies and compound level programs.
Play a leadership role in the development and review of the study synopsis, protocol, statistical analysis plan, clinical study report, ensuring accurate and statistically valid deliverables.
Perform end-to-end data analyses, from hypotheses formulation, experimental design, writing analysis plans, data cleaning, executing analysis, and preparing reports and documentation.
Develop and support best data handling and data provenance practices utilizing reproducible, interpretable research approahces
Strengthen Takeda’s advanced analytics toolkit by identifying and applying emerging techniques, as well as by advancing the state of the art and developing novel analysis tools as needed.
Collaborate effectively within a matrix environment, with scientists in various therapeutic areas to understand disease biology and to identify or develop appropriate goals for data science work (for example identifying sensitive and specific endpoints for segmenting patient population, tracking disease progression, quantifying quality of life, etc.) as well as with with colleagues from pharmacology, chemistry, imaging, translational sciences, computational biology, experimental medicine
Work closely with Takeda statisticians to ensure statistical issues in data analysis are addressed as needed.
Anticipate and communicate internal and external resource and quality issues that may impact deliverables or timelines of the program. Propose and implement solutions. Escalate issues to management as appropriate in a timely manner.
Increase the internal impact of Takeda’s data science work by identifying opportunities across therapeutic areas.
Increase the external recognition of Takeda’s data science work by participating in conferences, publishing work and developing external collaborations.

EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE AND SKILLS:

Education in a relevant field, for example a) PhD in a field such as Biostatistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Biomedical Engineering, Computer Science, Applied Mathematics with at least 6 years of experience and a clear interest in data science methods, or b) Master’s degree with at least 9 years of relevant experience
Expert-level knowledge of data science programming languages (Python and R, or similar) and experience with recommended practices for software development.
Signficant depth of expertise in at least one field relevant to the job (for example, machine learning, signal processing, etc.) and strong background in both supervised and unsupervised machine learning.
Ability to work independently on complicated datasets, including all aspects of data analysis (data cleaning, algorithm development, statistical analysis, and documentation).
Strongly prefer a working knowledge of UNIX operating systems, ideally with experience in high-performance computing environments.
Excellent oral and written communications skills.
Strong project management skills.
Willingness and ability to self-educate in new areas.
Strong collaborative skills and ability to work with a cross-functional team.

PHYSICAL DEMANDS:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Ability to sit and stand for long periods of time.
Carrying, handling and reaching for objects.
Ability to lift and carry over 25 pounds.
Manual dexterity to operate office equipment i.e. computers, phones, etc.

TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS:

Access to transportation to attend various meetings held in proximity to the Takeda offices.
Able to fly to various meetings at investigator, vendor or regulatory agency sites.
Some international travel may be required.

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
125,Senior Data Scientist,$112k-$182k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking a Senior Data Scientist to develop innovative solutions for customers and internal product teams. We look to rapidly prototype solutions and deploy the most promising of them. We identify and leverage the latest techniques (fast.ai is a team favorite) so that our customers can stay one step ahead. On every project you'll learn something new (and likely teach us something as well).

Responsibilities include:
Develop solutions spanning multiple subject areas, from NLP to image and video.
Maintain awareness of state-of-the-art machine learning and techniques, methods and platforms, including commercial and open source.
Implement, configure and test machine learning and deep learning libraries and platforms (e.g. fast.ai, TensorFlow, Keras, XGBoost, LightGBM).
Test solutions on AWS using services such as SageMaker, EC2, and Snowball Edge.
Write blog posts and presentations that clearly communicate complex machine learning concepts to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Contribute to visually-appealing, web-enabled prototype applications that illustrate relevant machine learning capabilities.
Basic Qualifications:
Experience with Python (2+ years).
Experience with machine learning or statistics (2+ years).
Ability to work both independently and collaboratively.
High levels of curiosity, creativity, and problem-solving capabilities.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Comfortable navigating the command line.
Desired Skills:
Research experience in machine learning specific to natural language processing, computer vision, or deep learning.
Experience with managing data and creating algorithms using AWS.
Experience with R, Java, or other programming languages.
Security Clearance:
Active TS/SCI with polygraph required.
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.


Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"Novetta
4.5","Herndon, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
126,Senior Principal Engineer,-1,"We are seeking a Senior Principal Engineer to join our product development team. In this role, you will be a technical leader on our Lexio team. Lexio is an innovative product that combines data analysis, natural language generation, and an intuitive user experience to reimagine Business Intelligence. As a Senior Principal Engineer, you will have technical ownership over significant parts of the Lexio codebase. You will be challenged with a diverse set of projects including greenfield product development and system-level platform improvements.

While technical work will be your primary focus, you are a problem solver at your core. You are a collaborator who is energized by working with the entire spectrum of the Lexio team; engineering, product, design, customer success, and go-to-market. You are driven to build something great and resilient to the fact that customer and user needs often change. You take delight in:
Using creativity and innovation to make products better for the end-user every day
Working on unique technical problems in the emerging field of data storytelling
Working in small teams to efficiently design and build solutions to novel problems
Expressing your perspective even when it may not be a popular one
Mentoring people and believing that a great product comes from great team collaboration
Qualifications
7+ years of professional software development experience
Proven expertise of Python or equivalent
Experience with Unix / Linux systems (e.g. Ubuntu, CentOS, RedHat, etc.)
Familiarity with cloud computing, particularly AWS
Demonstrated ability to write clean, helpfully-commented and readable code
Proven ability to collaborate and influence cross-functionally
A drive to learn constantly with an analytical and problem-solving mindset
A passion for growing as an engineer and helping others grow
Experience with owning a technical roadmap, defining developer standards, and promoting best practices across the engineering organization
A knack for debugging unfamiliar problems
Proven experience dealing with ambiguity
Bonus
Experience with statistics and/or machine learning
Experience building modern front-apps (e.g. React/Redux, Angular, Vue)
About the Engineering Team @ Narrative Science

The Engineering team at Narrative Science specializes in delivering high-value cloud-based solutions to customers. Specifically, we are responsible for building and innovating on an insightful and personalized data storytelling platform. We work a lot with data pipelines, analytics, natural language generation (NLG), continuous deployment tooling, and cloud architecture.

Culture @ Narrative Science

Narrative Science believes that data storytelling can empower everyone to understand and take action from their data. Our mission is to build software that leverages artificial intelligence to automatically turn data into easy-to-understand reports, transforms statistics into stories, and converts numbers into knowledge.

Our core virtues (mission-driven, impactful, team first, innovative) are ingrained in everything we do, from how we develop our technology to how we interact with customers to how we hire people. Since 2020, we have embraced a remote approach and are on a journey to ingrain that in our culture. All while being immersed in our culture of learning, collaboration, innovation, and customer impact.

At Narrative Science, we embrace the diverse backgrounds, experiences, and perspectives of our future employees, colleagues, customers, partners, and other stakeholders. We provide equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, marital status, citizenship, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.1,"Narrative Science
4.1",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
127,Principal Process Engineer / Environmental Compliance Manager,-1,"Alliance Finishing & Manufacturing (www.alliance-finishing.com) is Ventura County's leader in providing anodizing, electroplating and engineering services that help military, aerospace, healthcare and commercial manufacturers all over the world measurably improve equipment strength, reduce corrosion, and improve metal and plastic product aesthetics. We are Nadcap certified for chemical processing and our company has been in business for over 25 years. Our robust plating technology called “GreenPOP” resets the standard for what yields, adhesion and quality can be expected from plating on plastics and structural composites (www.alliance-finishing.com/plating-on-plastics).

THE ROLE:
*
The Principal Process Engineer / Environmental Compliance Manager at Alliance designs, optimizes, and troubleshoots our overall process activities to scale our proprietary chemical POP processes and ensures that the processes consistently produces the highest quality plating yields in a production environment. This position is ultimately responsible for process development engineering, maintaining and overseeing our company wide quality programs (e.g. Nadcap certification, audits), overseeing our process control laboratory and staff, and maintaining all aspects of environmental compliance, including maintaining both the documentation and management of properly controlling the generation, storage, and disposal of hazardous materials. You will also partner with company leadership to manage Nadcap compliance and Audits, and maintain all aspects of our Quality Program including maintenance of all quality documentation, industry/customer specifications and outside third party verification of quality control test panels. Successful candidates will enjoy making sure we’re staying up to date with all QA processes and procedures across the company. This will involve creating new shop travelers, being responsible for coordinating and obtaining monthly periodic test panels for outside lab verification, and maintaining all QA requirements for our Nadcap chemical processing certifications. In addition, when the General / Production Manager is unavailable, you will act as the Production Manager to ensure the overall successful operations of the plant.
*
RESPONSIBILITIES:

\* Maintaining the existing POP line for Ultem while facilitating the design of our new PEEK processing line to support customer expansion.

\* Environmental wastewater treatment and compliance (e.g. help implement, coordinate installation, train operator(s) to maintain and operate the zero discharge system).

\* Learn all aspects of our POP process in order to perform duties such as the design of new racks for incoming PEEK or other composite parts, manage all electrochemical plating issues related to current density (e.g. build current density robbers), fluid movement through anode baskets, basket design and placement for optimum throwing and even plating thickness across parts, and direct our chemist to support POP tank maintenance.

\* Be the main internal and external point of contact for Ultem and PEEK POP customers/ engineers/ operators and help design new processing capabilities in order to scale up new PEEK plating services. \* Partner with Lead POP Supervisor/Plater to lead weekly status update phone calls with customers and manage all weekly PO acceptances, ship dates, and be the primary customer support liaison for POP.

\* Take yield data generated from our Lead POP Plater and our Chemist related to our POP process and build custom excel reports for internal analysis as well as sharing this analysis with our customers for external consumption.

\* Lead and design engineering experiments to troubleshoot new composite plating techniques and or solve plating complications and drive process performance improvements including: optimization, cost reduction, training and coaching of plating personnel.

\* Manage the activities of about 10 chemical platers and inspectors working on the

production line.

\* Establish process controls to maintain robust process capabilities.

\* Manage all POP customers reporting to track our metrics related to quality, on time delivery, receipt of payment, and process chemistry.

\* Verify that the shop travelers reflect what the actual operators do based on materials that they are processing. If the shop travelers are not correct, amend them and if the operators are not performing the process correctly, train them to perform the process correctly.

\* Make sure that travelers (with input from Production Manager) are specific based upon the metal substrates they’re running (ferrous vs non-ferrous, copper, stainless steel, or other alloys such as Invar, etc.).

\* Ensure that all paperwork whether Nadcap or commercial is checked off and stamped correctly.

\* Verify with all inspectors that the inspection criteria as documented on the travelers and any quality control testing is being done correctly.

\* Organize operators and inspectors to ensure they are trained to use the necessary tools to perform their duties (e.g. calipers, copper sulfate testing for passivation, thickness testers, x-ray fluorescence machines, etc.)

\* Maintain or delegate all aspects of Company wide environmental compliance such as training wastewater operators and personnel handling hazardous waste, managing hazardous materials storage and disposal, and maintaining all record keeping documentation associated with waste storage and disposal (e.g. CUPA

inspections, manifest management, etc).

\* Perform monthly safety training to meet all local, state, and Federal requirements. This can be done via on the job training, or through MFASC management courses.

\* Maintain a safe work environment for personnel, plant equipment, and coordinate with maintenance staff to ensure the plant’s environmental integrity in terms of plant piping, and process equipment, and preventative maintenance of equipment or new equipment installations.
*
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:

\* Must have a Bachelor’s degree or higher in Electrochemical, Chemical Engineering, or Materials Science or have sufficient work experience in lieu of degree.

\* Minimum 9 years of Leadership experience in a metal finishing environment. Familiar with ISO/AS9100 Quality systems, NADCAP shop travellers, MIL-spec plating and various aerospace and commercial aircraft quality/process control systems.

\* Familiarity with plating on military and high-end commercial parts, Ultem, PEEK and or ABS-PC plastics.

\* Ability to autonomously drive and prioritize multiple projects with limited direction.

\* Proven track-record of developing and deploying creative and practical process solutions for high-volume manufacturing.

\* Willingness to take responsibility and ownership to aggressively focus on problems either individually or part of a larger team.

\* Proven ability to analyze and make meaningful inferences from sometimes incomplete data.

\* Comfort working with a wide variety of different functions including R&D, Process Integration, and Operations to effectively accomplish tasks in a timely manner.

\* Excellent verbal and written communication skills.

\* Capability to adapt to the company's changing needs and priorities and be a self-motivated team player.

\* Demonstrated project management skills, including the ability to deliver projects on schedule, within budget, and meeting the predefined quality requirements. A big plus would be familiarity with third party registered accreditation like ISO 9000 or NADCAP.
*
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:

\* Bilingual in Spanish and English preferred
*
BENEFITS:

\* Competitive Salary (Salaried position)

\* Vacation Pay

\* Sick Pay (3 days)

\* Holiday Pay

\* Medical/Dental Benefits

\* 401k Plan
*
EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER -- Alliance Finishing & Manufacturing does not discriminate on the basis of age, sex, sexual orientation, religion, national origin, marital status or disability status in its employment actions, decisions, policies and practices.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $75,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Experience:
chemical plating, anodizing or electroplating: 9 years (Required)
optimally utilizing manufacturing labor and plating line: 9 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Oxnard, CA (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)",-1,Alliance Finishing & Manufacturing – 1721 Ives Avenue,"Oxnard, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
128,Senior Machine Learning Engineer,$169k-$281k (Glassdoor Est.),"With the continued impact of COVID-19 and social distancing measures, Kensho is conducting all interviews and on-boarding activities remotely. At the present time, all employees are working remotely, until further notice. When the time comes to open our offices, Kensho will fully support those employees who would like to continue working remotely and not ask anyone to return to the office until they are comfortable.

At Kensho, we hire talented people and give them the freedom, support, and resources needed to build cutting edge technology and products for our parent company, S&P Global. As a result, we produce technology that is scalable, robust, and solves the challenges of one of the world’s largest, most successful financial institutions.
As a Machine Learning Engineer, you will be responsible for tackling a wide range of problems from natural language processing to timeseries prediction. You will move beyond the theoretical confines of academia and apply your tradecraft to build machine learning systems on real world data. In this role, you will constantly collaborate and work with groups of engineers. Our Machine Learning team is responsible for delivering ML-based solutions from problem framing, to prototyping, and production application.
Are you looking to make impactful, scalable contributions that transform the way we think about data? If so, we would love to help you excel here at Kensho. We take pride in our tightly-knit, team-based community that provides our Kenshins with a collaborative, supportive environment to bring transparency to the biggest challenges in data.
What You’ll Do
You will conduct original research on large proprietary and open source data sets
Identify, research, prototype, and build predictive products
You will build cutting-edge models for understanding vast amounts of textual data
Write production code
You will write tests to ensure the robustness and reliability of your productionized models
You will work closely with software engineers to build incredible systems
Technologies You’ll Use
Python and specifically NumPy, SciPy, Pandas, SciKit-learn
Neural network packages like TensorFlow/Keras and pytorch
ML packages like LightGBM and XGBoost
OpenFST
Elasticsearch
Required Skills, Knowledge & Experience
You have 5+ years of experience being a major machine learning contributor at a top company, hedge fund, or university
You have at least one core programming expertise, such as Python (NumPy, SciPy, Pandas), MATLAB, or R
You have experience with advanced machine learning methods
You possess strong statistical knowledge, intuition, and experience modeling real data
You demonstrate effective coding, documentation, and communication habits
You have a strong research acumen and experiment design skills
You have the ability and credibility to lead a team
You have a stellar ability to communicate even the most complicated methods and results to a broad, often non-technical audience
Several of the following terms should hold deep meaning for you: LSTM, lookahead bias, bagging, boosting, stacking, information retrieval, batch norm, entity recognition, bootstrapping, Glorot initialization, Kullback-Leibler divergence, GLOVE, SMAPE, HMM, MAP, exponential family, VC dimension, EM, L1, TD(Lambda)
How to Really Get Our Attention
Your GitHub/Kaggle profile shows a project or problems you’ve tackled
You have relevant research or publications
You are a specialist in deep learning in an academic setting or production-grade machine learning


At Kensho, we pride ourselves on providing top-of-market benefits, including:
- Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance
- 100% company paid premiums
- Unlimited Paid Time Off
- 20 weeks of 100% paid Parental Leave (paternity and maternity)
- 401(k) plan with 6% employer matching
- Generous company matching on donations to non-profit charities
- Up to $20,000 tuition assistance toward degree programs, plus up to $4,000/year for ongoing professional education such as industry conferences
- Plentiful snacks, drinks, and regularly catered lunches
- Dog-friendly office (CAM office)
- In-office gyms and showers (CAM, DC) or Equinox membership (LA, NYC)
- Stipend towards commuter or gym reimbursement
- Bike sharing program memberships
- Compassion leave and elder care leave
- Mentoring and additional learning opportunities
- Opportunity to expand professional network and participate in conferences and events
About Kensho
Kensho uses machine learning, artificial intelligence, natural language processing and data visualization techniques to solve some of the hardest analytical problems and create breakthrough financial intelligence solutions for our parent company, S&P Global.
Kensho was founded in 2013 by Harvard & MIT alums and was acquired by S&P Global in 2018. Kensho continues to operate as a startup in order to maintain our distinct, independent brand and to promote our breakthrough, innovative culture. Our team of Kenshins enjoy a dynamic and collaborative work environment that runs autonomously from S&P, while leveraging the unparalleled breadth and depth of data and resources available as part of S&P Global. As Kenshins, we pride ourselves on maintaining an innovative culture that depends on diversity and inclusion.
We are an equal opportunity employer that welcomes future Kenshins with all experiences and perspectives. Kensho is headquartered in Cambridge, MA, with offices in New York City, Washington D.C. and Los Angeles. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.",4.1,"Kensho
4.1","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
129,Data Engineer - Azure,$93k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 400 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.

If you have proven enterprise experience working with Microsoft Azure in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you.

•Design and development of relational and non-relational databases, data warehouses and data lakes
oAzure SQL DB, Azure DB for MySQL, Azure DB for PostgresSQL
oAzure Cosmos DB
oAzure Data Lake Storage, Azure Synapse Analytics
oAzure DB Migration Service
•Development, monitoring and maintenance of data integration and processing tools and pipelines
oAzure Data Factory
•Design and testing of machine learning and data science tools, including the building and deployment of data models
oAzure Databricks, Azure HDInsight
•Implementation of high-capacity, real-time data streaming technologies
oAzure Stream Analytics, Azure Data Lake Analytics
•Data analysis and visualization tools
oAzure PowerBI
oAzure Data Lake Analytics
•Leveraging non-database data storage alternatives to maximize performance, costs and data quality
oAzure Blob Storage
oAzure Cache for Redis
oAzure Search
•Familiarity with security and security policies within Azure

bonus experience

Bachelor's Degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes

what's in it for you?

Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success as sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology and social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,"Solution Design Group
4.9","Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
130,AI Ops Data Scientist,$116k-$141k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company

AstraZeneca is a global, innovation-driven biopharmaceutical business that focuses on the discovery, development and commercialization of prescription medicines for some of the world's most serious diseases. But we're more than one of the world's leading pharmaceutical companies. At AstraZeneca, we're proud to have a unique workplace culture that inspires innovation and collaboration. Here, employees are empowered to express diverse perspectives and are made to feel valued, energized and rewarded for their ideas and creativity.

Role

We are looking for a data scientist to join our new AI Ops platform team in Science IT. The ideal candidate will have industry experience working in a range of different cloud environments where they devised and deployed large-scale production infrastructure and platforms for data science. The position will involve taking these skills and applying them to some of the most exciting data & prediction problems in drug discovery.

The successful candidate will be part of a new, close-knit team of deeply technical experts and together have the chance to create tools that will advance the standard of healthcare, improving the lives of millions of patients across the globe. Our data science environments will support major AI initiatives such as clinical trial data analysis, knowledge graphs, imaging & omics for our therapy areas. You will also have responsibility to help provide the frameworks for data scientists to develop scalable machine learning and predictive models with our growing data science community, in a safe and robust manner.

As a strong software leader and an expert in building complex systems, you will be responsible for inventing how we use technology, machine learning, and data to enable the productivity of AstraZeneca. You will help envision, build, deploy and develop our next generation of data engines and tools at scale. You will be bridging the gap between science and engineering and functioning with deep expertise in both worlds.

Key Accountabilities
Liaise with R&D data scientists to understand their challenges and work with them to help productionise models and algorithms.
Be part of the development roadmap to build and operationalise our data science environment, platforms and tooling.
Support any external opportunities, through close partnership and engagement such as Benevolent.AI collaboration.
Deployment of systems, applications and tooling for data science on cloud environments.
Understanding of the necessary guardrails required for different use cases and data sensitivities.
Adapt standard machine learning methods to best exploit modern parallel environments (e.g. distributed clusters, multicore SMP, and GPU).
Provide the necessary infrastructure and platform to support the deployment and monitoring of ML solutions in production Optimizing solutions for performance and scalability.
Liaise with the Data Engineering team to ensure that the platform and the solutions deployment therein benefit from an optimised and scalable data flow between source systems and analytical models
Implementing custom machine learning code and developing benchmarking capabilities to monitor drift of any analyses over time.
Understanding of the latest AI webservices and data science tools, from DataBricks to citizen data science tools like Dataiku, C3.AI and Domino. Experience working on regulatory data would be helpful but not essential.
Liaise with other teams to enhance our technological stack, to enable the adoption of the latest advances in Data Processing and AI
Being an active member of the Data Science team, you will benefit from, and contribute to, our expanding bank of Data Science algorithms and work efficiently with our data science infrastructure.
Testing and assessing the quality of new tools.
Team recruitment, training provision and coaching
Candidate Knowledge, Skills and Experience
BSc in Computer Science or related quantitative field or MSc/Ph.D degree in Computer Science or related quantitative field.
More than 2 years of experience and demonstrable deep technical skills in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, recommendation systems, pattern recognition, natural language processing or computer vision.
Experience managing an enterprise platform and service, handling new customer demand and feature requests.
Strong software coding skills, with proficiency in Python and Scala preferred.
Significant experience with AWS cloud environments, working knowledge of Google and Azure platforms. Knowledge of Kubernetes, S3, EC2, Sagemaker, Athena, RDS and Glue is essential. Certification in appropriate areas will be viewed favourably.
Experience with best practice of data transport and storage within cloud system.
Experience building large scale data processing pipelines. e. g. Hadoop/Spark and SQL.
Experience provisioning computational resources in a variety of environments.
Experience with containers and microservice architectures e.g. Kubernetes, Docker and serverless approaches.
Experience with automation strategies e.g. CI/CD, gitops.
Use of Data Science modelling tools e.g. R, Python, SAS and Data Science notebooks (e.g. Jupyter).
Creative, collaborative, & product focused.
Ability to just get things done.",4.1,"AstraZeneca
4.1","Gaithersburg, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1913,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
131,Data Scientist 3 (844),$128k-$201k (Glassdoor Est.),"Amyris has developed a high-throughput genetic engineering platform for designing and building custom microbes to serve as living factories. Using an industrial scale fermentation process, our microbes convert cheap sugars into a wide variety of high-value target molecules. Our end products directly impact millions of lives. We are pragmatic idealists seeking a profitable way to make the world a better place. We are convinced synthetic biology is here to stay and will have a major positive impact on our planet and everyday life.
Within Amyris R&D, we are searching for a highly energetic, curious, and self-motivated data scientist with a strong background in statistics, computing and biology to join our Data Science and Computing team. Research at Amyris is a highly multidisciplinary effort that needs brilliant contributions from life sciences and engineering disciplines in order to take projects from concept to market. From hacking directly on DNA in the lab to full scale factory production, every aspect of our work is facilitated and accelerated by quantitative science and software & hardware automation. The Data Science and Computing team works hand-in-hand with bench scientists and builds tools that enable genome engineering, protein engineering, metabolic modeling, omics experiment analysis, statistical design of experiments and machine learning models in pursuit of making better microbial strains or fermentation processes. In short, we help accelerate the design-build-test-analyze cycle in synthetic biology.
Key Responsibilities:
Iteratively develop computational algorithms, analyses, visualization tools and machine learning models to meet evolving scientific needs and to aid rapid data-driven decision making while working with a variety of data types including: genotype (NGS), phenotype (metabolomics, proteomics, GC/MS, spectroscopy, fermentation), material flow
Build version-controlled, computational workflows to analyze and model rich, high-throughput phenotype data
Interact closely with a cross-disciplinary teams of biology, analytical chemistry, and fermentation scientists to build data science products

Required Qualifications:
Degree in quantitative discipline such as computer science, mathematics, computational biology, electrical engineering, bioengineering or equivalent.
Ph.D. plus 1-3 years experience, or M.S. plus 3-6 years experience.
Experience in analyzing & visualizing large scientific datasets representing biological & chemical phenotypes
Intermediate (undergraduate level) understanding of biology topics including: genetics, cell physiology, biochemistry, evolution
Experience with programming best practices (unit testing, CI/CD, etc) and version control while contributing to or maintaining large codebases
Expertise with scripting programming languages (Python is preferred)
Hands-on experience with machine learning frameworks and concepts
Outstanding communication and interpersonal skills
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced and intellectually rigorous environment
Creativity, independent thinking, and passion
Preferred Qualifications:
Background in mass spectrometry informatics, high throughput sequencing, spectrophotometry, or industrial fermentation
Experience in a microbiology or synthetic biology setting
#LI-DJ1

Amyris, a leader in industrial synthetic biology, uses its innovative bioscience solutions to achieve renewable products by converting plant sugars into hydrocarbon molecules. Amyris’ molecules are used in wide range of specialty & performance chemicals, flavors & fragrances and in applications ranging from cosmetics to biofuels. Learn more at www.amyris.com.

Under the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”), Amyris is required to inform California residents who are our job applicants (“Applicants”) about the personal information we collect about you when you apply to a job on this site.

As an Applicant, you have the right to know and understand the categories of personal information we collect about you, and the purposes for which the categories of personal information shall be used, pursuant to the CCPA.

By clicking the “APPLY FOR THIS JOB” button below and submitting your job application, you agree you have reviewed the complete Privacy Notice for Employees, Independent Contractors and Job Applicants.

If you have any questions regarding this information, please contact Amyris at privacy@amyris.com

As a VEVRAA Federal Contractor, Amyris is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Amyris complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment.

If you are a recruiter or placement agency, please do not submit resumes to any person or email address at Amyris, Inc. prior to having a signed agreement. Amyris is not liable for and will not pay placement fees for candidates submitted by any agency other than its approved recruitment partners. Furthermore, any resumes sent to us without an agreement in place will be considered your company’s gift to Amyris and may be forwarded to our recruiters for their attention.",3.8,"Amyris
3.8","Emeryville, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2003,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
132,Controls Engineer,-1,"DSI Innovations LLC (DSI), a quality Industrial Automation Systems Integrator headquartered in Thomasville, NC, is looking for a *Controls Engineer* to join our Thomasville office team.

The ideal candidate has a proven record of accomplishment working as a Systems Integrator. Automation team members can execute projects in a way that results in profitable, repeat business. Employee work habits including being consultative in nature, being curious, communicating effectively, planning work and understanding company strategy to support individual decision making.

Technical responsibilities include designing, specifying, programming and commissioning automation systems in an industrial manufacturing environment.

_### *FactoryTalk Batch* experience is a MUST ###_
Job Location*
42 high tech blvd Thomasville, NC 27063
Starting Salary*
Depends on experience
Relocation Assistance*
Yes
Roles and Responsibilities*
Design, upgrade and troubleshoot new and existing control systems based on company guidelines and/or customer needs.
Design, upgrade new and existing HMI applications based on company guidelines and/or customer needs.
Create/Follow design specifications.
Create, update, and interpret electrical schematics.
Manage project goals, schedule, and budget.
Perform field commissioning based on customer goals and project requirements.
Requirements*
_MUST _have a history of multiple projects developing and supporting *FactoryTalk Batch*. PlantPAx is a big plus.
Minimum of 5 years’ experience in industrial automation and controls experience. We prefer candidates with a Systems Integrator background.
Must be authorized to work in the U.S.
Must agree to up to 25% travel.
Must work out of the Thomasville, NC office location when not in the field.
Helpful Experience*
PlantPAx, Allen-Bradley, Programmable Logic Controller (PLC), PLC Programming, PLC Allen Bradley, PLC Ladder Logic, PLC Siemens, Step 5 PLC, Omron, FactoryTalk, FactoryTalk View, RSLogix, RSLinx, RSView, Control Logic, HMI Programming, HMIs, HMI Design, HMI Configuration, Human Machine Interface, Siemens PLC, TIA Portal, S7, Step 5 PLC, Step 7 PLC, PanelView, Ladder Logic, Industrial Engineering, Industrial Automation, Industrial Control.
Company Benefits*
Health Insurance Options (Medical, Dental, and Vision), with varying levels of coverage and premiums, including one plan that covers 100% of the employee’s medical premium.
Health Savings Account (only if enrolled in HSA Medical Plan option)
Healthcare Flexible Spending Account
Dependent Care Flexible Spending Account
401k (Traditional and Roth 401k options), with company match
Basic Life Insurance ($25,000)
Long-term Disability (50% up to $1,000/month after 180 days of disability)
Competitive Salary
Flexible Scheduling
Profit-Sharing
Holidays and Vacation Time
Covered Travel Expenses and Mileage Reimbursement
Weekend Pay on Qualified Projects
Qualities We Are Looking For*
Strong work ethic
Strong attention to detail
Great problem-solving skills
Highly self-managed
A strong desire to learn and grow
Work well with others
Creative thinker
Willingness to dig in and get it done
Company Culture*
""There's a way to do it better - find it!"" - Thomas Edison
Casual dress.
Work hard. Play hard.
When you’re at work, be at work. When at home, forget work, be with family.
“No” isn’t in our vocabulary.
A bunch of friends that go the extra mile for each other.
Football, Baseball, and geeky stuff too like World of Warcraft, Raspberry Pi, and yes, even Magic the Gathering.
Nobody left behind.
Apply now!*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: Up to $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
control systems: 5 years (Preferred)
Willingness To Travel:
25% (Preferred)
Work Location:
Multiple locations
Work Remotely:
No",-1,DSI Innovations LLC,"Thomasville, NC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
133,"Lead Software Engineer, AutoML",$92k-$176k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Alteryx


Alteryx develops software for data preparation and analysis, including a number of server solutions for model deployment, collaborative work on data, and scheduling of automatic data processing. We're revolutionizing data analytics by providing a complete end to end, self-service platform that allows users to get from business questions to business answers at incredible speeds. Why work for just any analytics company? At Alteryx, we are explorers, dreamers, and innovators. We're on a journey to build the best analytics platform in the world, but we can't do it without people like you leading the way.

About the Boston Office


The Boston Office was started earlier this year by the acquisition of MIT-spinout Feature Labs. This rapidly growing team combines the excitement of being part of a fast-paced, innovative startup with the resources, market penetration, and wisdom of the data analytics market leader. Forget the stereotypical tech companies of the past. Embrace the unconventional, exercise your imagination and help alter the future with Alteryx!

Overview


As a Lead Software Engineer on the AutoML team, you’ll be directly responsible for building a core machine learning library which powers Alteryx’s current and future products. You should be comfortable with the challenges of engineering systems for machine learning technologies, adept at software design and implementation, and readily able to solve complex challenges with mathematical dependencies.

Responsibilities
Maintain and improve the quality and performance of the AutoML package
Design, build and validate new machine learning pipelines
Author new features, from conception and design to implementation and testing
Integrate AutoML with other products and services
Promote a culture of rigorous software development practice and high quality standards
Mentor other engineers and promote technical leadership throughout the organization
Be part of a dynamic, friendly and ambitious team with technical influence throughout Alteryx and beyond
***The company will not provide sponsorship for work visas or other employment authorization for this position***


Requirements
Minimum 5 years experience as a software engineer
Experience writing production-quality code in Python
Experience with a broad variety of machine learning algorithms
Experience and interest in leading teams and managing projects
Experience with API design
Understanding of the math which powers machine learning and data analysis in general
Experience with data-related Python tools like NumPy, SciPy, Pandas, Scikit-learn, and Dask
Experience with debugging complex software issues and mathematical systems
Bonus
Experience with AutoML algorithms and products
Experience with performance testing machine learning systems
Experience building systems for distributed computation
Perks
100% company-paid medical, dental, and vision for associates
Health plans that cover your family and pets
Company matched 401(k)
Associate stock purchase plan
Paid time off: 3 weeks’ vacation, 5 sick days, 9 holidays, 3 floating holidays, and 20 hours volunteer time
100% paid parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Wellness programs with up to $300 fitness reimbursement annually
Collaborative offices stocked with healthy snacks and drinks
Office events, catered lunches, and happy hours
#LI-JE1",3.6,"Alteryx
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
134,"Senior Engineering Manager, Machine Learning",-1,"Headspace has one mission: to improve the health and happiness of the world. Headspace is a global leader in mindfulness through its app and online content offerings. At Headspace, our employees embody our three core values: selfless drive, courageous heart, and a curious mind.
Being on the engineering team, you’ll be working on a product that impacts more than 65M users. You will help us bring new features to life to meet our mission, while also helping push our platform to newer technologies as we embrace the cutting edge. A big goal needs talented people, so come join us and give your day job a sense of purpose!

About the Senior Engineering Manager, Machine Learning at Headspace:

The platform team’s mission is to provide the tools necessary to unlock the full potential of all teams at Headspace. The Machine Learning team in particular works hand in hand with the Data Science team to test, deploy, and optimize models. They participate in the inception and creation of the user value questions the models seek to answer. They work with the engineering and product team to integrate the models into the user experience, meeting the SLA requirements.

Location: This role is open to remote employees in select US states: California, New York, Florida, Georgia, Texas, Maryland + Washington DC, North Carolina and Washington.
How your skills and passion will come to life at Headspace:
Execution and delivery - do not let projects get stuck, remove roadblocks from the team before they are reached, getting your hands dirty in the code by doing the pieces in the gaps that would cause too great a context switch for your team
Proactive communication - engaging with the team’s stakeholders to anticipate their needs, delivering on them, or transparently adjusting expectations
People management - coaching, mentoring, and performance management are all critical traits of a people manager. The team needs to understand what is expected of them and more importantly, they need to want to put in the extra effort to ensure you and they are successful
Productionalized machine learning knowledge - delivery of machine learning models into a high scale production environment. Worked with Analytics teams and Product teams and understands the differences.
What you’ve accomplished:
8+ years of relevant engineering work experience
4+ hands-on technical management experience
Exceptional system design abilities which include experience with architectural patterns of large, high-scale applications
Excels at software delivery. You are a pro at architecture, testing, monitoring, alerting, and are excited to apply these principles to your team.
Ability to thrive in a startup (fast-paced, agile) environment
Strong communication skills and the ability to be self-directed when necessary
Actively coached and mentored team members in their careers
Been actively involved in setting a machine learning strategy
Consistently made culture choices that positively impact all of engineering
BA/BS degree in computer science, engineering or equivalent experience


How to get started:

If you’re excited by the idea of seeing yourself in this role at Headspace, please apply with your CV and a cover letter that best expresses your interest and unique qualifications.",3.4,"Headspace
3.4",United States,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
135,Radar System Analysis Engineer,$52k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Radar System Analysis Engineer

SEG is seeking a Radar System Analysis Engineer to be part of a team providing support for U.S. Surface Navy (e.g. Aegis Baseline) programs and Missile Defense Agency (MDA) Ballistic Missile Defense System (BMDS) projects

Responsibilities
Characterize sensor performance against threat ballistic and cruise missiles through modeling, simulation and analysis using digital simulations.
Develop, integrate and use analytical models and tools to test new threat data and software products, assess system capability, and drive system requirements and design.
Define technical approach and plan studies based on understanding of engineering community and appreciation of customer need. Define study measures of performance and effectiveness, design experiments, and demonstrate analytical skills. Conduct individual analyses, and contribute to team technical studies.
Communicate with external customer and internal technical staff, via correspondence and briefings.
Support technical leadership for internal project and contribute in external customer forums.
Author technical details of statements of work
A majority of the work is based out of our Columbia, MD office. Travel is occasionally required to participate in technical forums and reviews.
Local travel anticipated at 10 percent and occasional overnight trips at 5 percent time.
Required Skills

Required Qualifications
Ability to obtain and maintain a US DoD SECRET clearance
Bachelor’s Degree: Systems Engineering, Electrical, Physics, Applied Math or related technical degree.
5+ 7 years work experience
Systems engineering experience
Experience with sensors, seekers, or remote sensing in RF and IR bands.
Strong analytical skills
Programming and scripting experience in a Linux environment
Communication, documentation and briefing via Microsoft office products (Outlook, Powerpoint, Excel, Word)
Desired Qualifications
Active US DoD SECRET or TOP SECRET Security Clearance
Masters or PhD degree preferred with relevant research project experience
MATLAB for the visual display of quantitative information, and prototyping M&S codes
Python for modeling and simulation development, data analysis, etc.
Facility working with C++ API and creating test drivers
Self-starter – Demonstrate independent ownership of tasking. Position affords opportunity to define path and lead tasks based on technical understanding of engineering community and appreciation of customer needs
Modeling and analysis experience and capability in one or more of the following areas:
RF Sensors / EO-IR Imaging / Remote Sensing Systems – Signal Processing, Detection and Track Filtering
Multi-Sensor Data Fusion, Target Classification and Discrimination (Machine Learning / AI applications)
Missile Systems (Aerodynamic, Ballistic, Space)
Defense Weapon System Performance (e.g. Navy Surface systems, Ballistic Missile Defense systems)
Ground Test and Field Test Events (missile flight and sensor track pre-event prediction and post-mission assessment)
Familiarity with version-control (Git), issue tracking (JIRA), collaboration software (Confluence), and cross-language software integration tools (SWIG).
Familiarity with high-performance computing environments
Systems Group Overview
Candidate will be part of a team responsible for weapon system simulation and performance analysis. The team develops and integrates individual system models for analysis (threats, weapons, sensors) to include multiple interacting systems. This team contributes to defining, leading and performing analyses for requirements feasibility, sensitivity studies for threat variability and fidelity, asset planning and what-if scenarios, flight-test mission (requirements, planning, and analysis) support and certification efforts.
The group provides independent verification and validation support for internal system-level products. This offers opportunities to work with SEG sensors, vehicles, phenomenology products and engineers integrated within our simulation software development environment to view the battle environment scenes through the eyes of combat systems.
The group includes subject matter experts and technical leads providing direct technical support to various defense programs as a contributing member of broad cross-functional and technical subject-specific integrated product teams.
We bring threat and weapons knowledge together to support concept definition, threat driver assessments, system requirements, design reviews, test planning, and defining road maps for future development
Company Overview

Systems Engineering Group, Inc. (SEG) is a highly regarded and leading provider of missile systems engineering and analysis. Principal customers include the U.S. Navy, Missile Defense Agency, AEGIS Ballistic Missile Defense Program, and Program Executive Offices for Integrated Warfare Systems and Ships. SEG is headquartered in Columbia, MD and is convenient to routes 32, 29, and 95. SEG is a wholly owned subsidiary of Telephonics Corporation. SEG provides excellent benefits, work environment and outstanding growth opportunities.

We are an Affirmative Action / Equal Employment Opportunity Employer (M/F/D/V). All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, gender, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status or any other protected characteristic. Reasonable accommodations may include but are not limited to that which may enable individuals with disabilities and special disabled veterans to perform the essential functions of this position.

Required Experience

Job Location
Columbia, US-MD",2.5,"Telephonics
2.5","Columbia, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1933,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
136,"Software Engineer - Reston, VA (Multiple Positions)",$60k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"At the core of T-Mobile's successful Un-carrier disruption of the wireless industry is a nationwide network, award-winning customer service, and a multifaceted group of software developers. T-Mobile's Product & Technology (P&T) organization is looking for team members who are passionate about mobile development and are interested in full stack development!

T-Mobile is consistently rated one of the top places to work in the United States with solid company performance year over year. Our dev practices are founded on open collaboration between customers and teams, with an emphasis on community. Our newest software products are built using modern dev languages, runtimes, and frameworks such as TypeScript, Angular, React, NodeJS, Golang, and Python. We're modernizing our architectures to replace Java monoliths with resilient microservices, elegant APIs, and beautiful front ends. Some opportunities include the latest technology shaping our world, including IoT, machine learning, and augmented reality. Most importantly, P&T empowers software teams with the tools, resources, and autonomy they need to deliver amazing experiences for our customers and other employees.

Responsibilities
As a software engineer in the P&T organization, you'll have the opportunity to:
Craft reliable and performant software products and features in a variety of popular software languages
Build data persistence solutions for software products, with the chance to work with and learn multiple data stores (including Postgres, Mongo, Redis, Cassandra) as well as event streaming platforms (including RabbitMQ, Kafka, SQS)
Lead the end-to-end solution with the team, from unit tests to CI/CD pipelines to deployments to monitoring and security.
Go broad AND deep: work on front-ends and back-ends, automate tests and infrastructure, build CI/CD pipelines
Not just write code, but learn how to deliver your code to production and explore extending your skills into site and system reliability areas of focus!
Learn and help others learn modern practices such as test-driven development, pair programming, automation, async communication, and more
Contribute to and learn patterns to build reliable n-tier architectures
Sharpen your skills by getting hands on with your team at all levels of the stack - and all parts of the process
Grow your skills as an engineer by collaborating with peers in an organization that defaults to InnerSource development principles.

Qualifications

3+ Years Technical engineering experience
Experience with one or more of the following (and the willingness and ability to learn the others given the option): Golang, Python, JavaScript / TypeScript, Java
Ability to learn or existing familiarity with Git-based source code management systems (UI and/or CLI); Runtimes and UI frameworks including NodeJS, React, and/or Angular; Containerization (Docker); Microservices architecture, RESTFUL APIs, and GraphQL; Cloud providers (AWS, Azure, GCP) and PaaS (PCF - Cloud Foundry)
Ability to complete a pair programming session with a senior developer as guide and mentor
Self-driven and able to work well with a team.
Willingness to become part of our team of experts supporting our customers with the technology that keeps them connected.
Education:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or a related field, or equivalent education and work experience required.
Travel:
May require up to 20% of domestic overnight travel within the region, and occasional trips to the Bellevue Headquarters.
LI-JS3
Minimum Qualifications
• At least 18 years of age
• Legally authorized to work in the United States
• High School Diploma or GED
• Pre-employment background screen

Company Profile
As America's Un-carrier, T-Mobile USA, Inc. (NASDAQ: ""TMUS"") is redefining the way consumers and businesses buy wireless services through leading product and service innovation. The company's advanced nationwide 4G and 4G LTE network delivers outstanding wireless experiences for customers who are unwilling to compromise on quality and value. Based in Bellevue, Washington, T-Mobile USA. Inc. provides services through its subsidiaries and operates its flagship brands, T-Mobile and Metro by T-Mobile. For more information, please visit http://www.t-mobile.com

Applicant Privacy Policy

We are committed to maintaining your trust by respecting and protecting your privacy. For more information about how T-Mobile processes the personal data of job applicants, please visit Applicant Privacy Policy.

EOE Statement
Equal Employment Opportunity

We take equal opportunity seriously-by choice.

T-Mobile USA, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All decisions concerning the employment relationship will be made without regard to age, race, ethnicity, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, religious affiliation, marital status, citizenship status, veteran status, the presence of any physical or mental disability, or any other status or characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. Discrimination, retaliation or harassment based upon any of these factors is wholly inconsistent with how we do business and will not be tolerated.",3.9,"T-Mobile
3.9","Reston, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2001,Company - Public,Telecommunications Services,Telecommunications,$10+ billion (USD),-1
137,Azure Automation Engineer,$56k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"Hospice Source*, a leading national provider of Durable Medical Equipment to hospice patients, is seeking an experienced *Azure Automation Engineer* to join our skilled team of experts.
As the *Azure Automation Engineer*, you will have a solid understanding of cloud computing and technology systems and current trends, and Azure cloud. Is passionate about working on the cutting edge, having experience with high profile projects, and are motivated by delivering pragmatic solutions. Must also enjoy learning new technologies and sharing them with the team and customers. Have a keen interest in using any and all appropriate tools, especially Cloud-based and Open Source, to solve problems that may occur. Should have strong verbal and written communication skills due to the dynamic nature of collaborations with customers, vendors, and other engineering teams to solve complex business problems together, while using your experience and leadership skills to motivate the team.
What You Will Do: *
Building and maintaining automation tooling and pipelines that enable secured systems to be deployed across a variety of environments, including public/private cloud, virtual machines, or bare metal servers primarily with Azure and some AWS or GCP if needed.
Developing automation to standardize and secure cloud services such as server operating system builds, including Windows and Linux, that are compliant with enterprise standards and security policy.
Developing, deploying, and maintaining Cloud infrastructure and applications as code for a ""healthcare focused"" logistics company.
Supporting through automation - Data quality, compliance, security monitoring and code quality.
Solving challenging problems involving system and environment internals, to provide solutions that are simple to use, but can be customized to meet our integration needs.
Collaborating with stakeholders to test build releases and ensure builds provide a consistent core foundation for hosting government and commercial applications.
Supporting technologies and products, including Microsoft Azure, Windows Server, RedHat Linux, CentOS, Terraform, Git, Bash/Python/PowerShell.
What You Will Bring: *
Terraform or ARM (Azure Resource Manager) template automation for Azure infrastructure, configuration.
PowerShell or Bash / Azure CLI experience.
Linux/Windows system administration, configuration, security hardening.
Create Docker containers, Golden images, Azure DevOps, Git,
Scripting.
Azure IaaS, PaaS, Azure Security
Knowhow of Database (SQL, Non-SQL, No SQL,) and Windows Clustering
Good communication, presentation, and teamwork skills
Required Qualifications*
Design and create infra automation using terraform
Know how of Database (SQL, Non-SQL, No SQL, Oracle) and Windows Clustering
Enterprise Security experience with processes, strategies (segmentation), and automation.
Azure or other cloud certifications.
Exposure to Server-less configuration, Service Fabric configuration, Container Orchestration configuration.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location",1.8,"Hospice Source LLC
1.8","Carrollton, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
138,Cloud Architecture Engineer,-1,"AbleVets, A Cerner Company, provides healthcare information technology services and resources to help the VA and DoD improve the lives of the people they serve. AbleVets has an opportunity for an experienced, motivated Cloud Architecture Engineer to support our customer. This position is on site at our customers facility in Charleston, SC.

The Cloud Architecture Engineer will support a large government program by serving as the SME in support of network, loT, IT, and security planning, cloud security, network design and hosting environment implementation. The ideal candidate will also Provide guidance, program plans, security engineering and framework support for Software Assurance, Mobile Device Security (Mobility), Remote Access Solutions, and Personal Identity Verification (PIV). Duties and responsibilities include, but are not limited to:
Provide expertise on computer engineering and computer systems analysis
Support the development of an Enterprise wide Security Architecture and the design of a security model
Assess network and systems optimizations and vulnerabilities for executive level decisions
Analysis of security services (Infrastructure, application, Identity) of existing and planned Cloud infrastructures (IaaS, PaaS)
Identify gaps in security services
Assist in the security engineering reviews of solutions, projects and programs for operational and developmental systems that are being researched, designed and reviewed
Provide recommendations and guidance on secure baseline configurations, such as the Defense Information Security FAA (DISA) Security Technical Implementation Guides (STIG), and support identification, development, and documentation of deviations from these baseline configurations for all assets, including network devices, desktops, and mobile devices

Bachelor's degree and eight (8) years of experience required. An additional six (6) years of relevant experience may be substituted for degree requirement.
Active Top Secret Government Clearance
Must obtain the following certifications within 90 days of hire:
8570 IAT Level II
OS certification (MCSE or CCDP equivalent is preferred).
DoD 8140 Category – CSSP Incident Responder
Experience with network design and migration
Experience with RedHat Enterprise administration to include detailed knowledge of application deployment and troubleshooting procedures as well as familiar with standard RHEL services
Experience supporting RMF accreditation and assessment of systems to continue maintaining and renewing ATOs
Experience reviewing technical requirements and translating concepts to business language.
Experience providing high-level design and architecture drawings, technically validating solutions and connecting business, data, security, systems, and other technical and non-technical architectures
Experience developing SW/IT solutions to complex technical problems regarding integration and deployment of large-scale systems
Experience with Windows Server administration to include detailed knowledge of Active Directory and other core Windows services
Experience implementing DISA STIG requirements for Microsoft and Linux operating systems, services and applications
Experience with Data at Rest, envelope security procedures and methodologies, HSDP 12, and pattern of life
Experience evaluating technical gaps or deficiencies and identifying as obstacles to achieving the organizations vision.
Experience evaluating business processes to document and recommending improvements to again efficiencies
Experience leading or supporting projects related to IT Architecture, Engineering and Security Operations
Experience leading teams
Experience with performing root cause analysis, risk identification, and risk mitigation
Experience presenting to clients using multiple platforms (MS PowerPoint, Word, Visio)
Ability to take a leadership role conducting evaluations and analysis of the current security architecture and coordinating meetings with key stakeholders across the enterprise to create consensus for the desired end-state architecture.
Ability to work in a dynamic environment and respond to change quickly
Ability to work in a team environment and produce work products independently
Ability to develop standard operating procedures and project documentation for systems, services and applications
Able to documents and implements change requests; evaluate change requests for potential impacts.
Able to maintain, update VMware infrastructure, guests and gold image templates
Able to perform light programming/scripting to support automation
Familiarity with open architecture principles and cyber security architecture principles that achieve cybersecurity framework goals
Must be able to travel as necessary, up to 10%
Preferred/Desired Skills:
Bachelor’s degree or higher from accredited university/technical college in Engineering, Cybersecurity, Computer Science, Information Systems, or other related scientific or technical discipline
Certifications Preferred:
CISSP
CISM
CIS
OSCP
AWS Solutions Architect
Master's Degree preferred but not required
Five (5) years of Network experience design and migration experience
Five (5) years of experience with RedHat Enterprise administration to include detailed knowledge of application deployment and troubleshooting procedures as well as familiar with standard RHEL services
Five (5) years' experience supporting RMF accreditation and assessment of systems to continue maintaining Understanding of key IT/Cybersecurity concepts (Network Security, Security Operations & Administration, Incident Response & Recovery, Identity and Access Management, Vulnerability Management etc.
Experience with MI Systems (NSA NET, JWICS, or Army Gold)
Expertise with networks such as NIPR, SIPR, JWICS and/or NSANet.
Experience supporting government customers in secure environments, familiarity of Federal Information Security Management Act (FISMA) operating standards and applicable guidelines
Cloud Security and loT experience
Experience with Cloud Services in the Federal sector (Google Apps, Amazon Web Services, etc.)
Familiarity with Artificial Intelligence (Al) and Machine Learning (ML) concepts.

AbleVets LLC appreciates your interest in our company as a place of employment. We are proud to be an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer and are committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, genetic information, disability, veteran status, or any other protected class. AbleVets is a VEVRAA Federal Contractor.",3.4,"AbleVets
3.4","Charleston, SC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
139,"Sr. Principal Engineer, Autonomous Underwater Vehicles",$101k-$211k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who Are We?

QinetiQ Inc. is a leading innovator with over 25 years of experience rapidly developing advanced C5ISR sensor solutions and is a renowned world leader in robotics and autonomy.

The combined QinetiQ U.S. business unit brings capabilities across the full lifecycle of technology development from applied research and development to rapid prototyping, testing, fielding, and sustainment. Our expertise with unmanned platforms, broad sensing modalities, and cross-domain interoperability ensures that we deliver integrated solutions for Warfighter dominance in all phases of combat.

We are a world-class team of professionals who deliver next generation technology and products in robotic and autonomous platforms and systems, ground systems, soldier systems, maritime systems, airborne sensors and payloads, processing and exploitation capabilities, and integrated C2 solutions. Much of our work contributes to innovative research in ﬁelds such as sensor science, signal processing, data fusion, artiﬁcial intelligence (AI), machine learning (ML), and augmented reality (AR).

Our customers are always our number one priority and we consistently deliver Mission-Led Innovation to empower and protect our Defense and Security forces in the U.S. and abroad.

Your Contribution to Our Mission:
In this position this person would lead design teams to develop solutions for the Navy and for commercial customers.
Typical types of projects would be to develop Unmanned Underwater Vehicles (UUV), submersible autonomous platforms with various payloads such as Radar, Sonar and a various sensors.
As lead engineer you would use your vast knowledge of maritime engineering solutions to interface with customers to help them develop requirements and propose solutions to meet their needs.
This person will drive the ideation effort by acting as a marine systems architect to outline major components and interfaces to best meet the project’s requirements.
He/She will direct various engineering disciplines including mechanical, electrical, and software to translate requirements into product.
This position will also support business development working with group management and business development to analyze the market to understand current needs and future trends.
This person will provide input and recommendations for Internal Research And Development (IRAD) projects to support QNA Maritime product growth. Support business development growth by researching and responding to customer solicitations such as government Broad Area Announcements (BAA), RFI and RFPs.
Provide systems level design for variety of maritime systems
System level modeling and analysis
Lead design teams
Trade studies
Write White Papers and Proposals
Interface with customers
To Land This Job, You Need:
Experience in developing, prototyping, testing and troubleshooting UUV/ROV.
Experience specifying and integrating payloads for vehicles.
Track record of developing innovative maritime solutions for complex problems
Define and decompose system requirements and functional system requirements, documents specifications, identifies requirements flow down, design and architecture development, and requirements traceability
Strong communications skills (written or oral) to lead design teams and interface with customers
Experience with underwater acoustics
Experience in a design role preferably of low volume high-value machinery and/or equipment
Good understanding of pressure vessel design, analysis, and testing
Previous experience in design of Unmanned Underwater Vehicle
Experience selecting materials for underwater applications
Experience developing electromechanical designs for surface and subsurface applications.
Experience operating UUV or ROVs in the environment
Industry-side DoD acquisition experience strongly desired
Industry maritime program manager experience strongly desired.
Experience with DARPA or Officer of Naval Research (from either industry or government side) is highly desired.
Analytical Software such as MATLAB & Simulink
7+ years design of ocean equipment and products
BS+ in Mechanical Engineering, Ocean Engineering or related Engineering discipline
Clearance Level Must Be Able to Obtain:

DOD Secret

Why QinetiQ Inc.?
Your work will contribute to the protection of American Warfighters and Security Forces.
Opportunity to work with cutting edge technology.
Extensive opportunities for continuous learning, professional growth and advancement.
We only hire the best! No matter if you are entry or senior level, you will have the opportunity learn from some of the best in the industry.
We have fun! We regularly have company events, from luncheons and costume contests to golf tournaments.
We care about YOU and YOUR FAMILY. We offer competitive benefits and health insurance options.
No One Has Time for Long Job Applications!

We completely understand. That is why we have made the application process easy. We promise. This will be simple.

Accessibility/Accommodation:

If because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to staffing@us.qinetiq.com or call (540) 658-2720 Opt 4 and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.

QinetiQ Inc. is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",2.9,"QinetiQ North America
2.9","Waltham, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1956,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
140,Senior Machine Learning Engineer,$163k-$269k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

Wish is a mobile e-commerce platform that flips traditional shopping on its head. We connect hundreds of millions of people with the widest selection of delightful, surprising, and—most importantly—affordable products delivered directly to their doors. Each day on Wish, millions of customers in more than 160 countries around the world discover new products. For our over 1 million merchant partners, anyone with a good idea and a mobile phone can instantly tap into a global market.

We're fueled by creating unique products and experiences that give people access to a new type of commerce, where all are welcome. If you’ve been searching for a supportive environment to chase your curiosity and use data to investigate the questions that matter most to you, this is the place.

Job Description

We're looking for engineers to work on our massive semi-structured datasets.

The role is ideal for someone who has solid mathematical background, industry experience working on a range of classification, information retrieval, and optimization problems, e.g. click-through rate prediction, search ranking, collaborative filtering/recommendation, or review/sentiment classification. It offers the unique opportunity to have direct impact on key product initiatives, including product feed relevance, ad targeting, information extraction, and recommendations.

What you'll be doing:
Improve match accuracy of Wish users and products to boost revenue of Wish
Use big data platform to analyze massive semi-structured dataset and get data insights
Develop data models based on new data insights
Write highly efficient code to serve and a/b testing new models
Monitor, analyze and iterate on data models
Share gained knowledge with teammates and brainstorm new ideas
Qualifications
BS in computer science or equivalent degrees
3+ years of experience
Excellent software design skill with experience in Python, Go, and/or Java.
Strong background in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, recommendation system, search ranking, or data mining.
Passionate about working with large amounts of data and the ability to translate insights into business recommendations.
Experience with different big data frameworks, including Hadoop, Presto, MapReduce, and/or distributed systems.
Additional Information

Wish values diversity and is committed to creating an inclusive work environment. We provide equal employment opportunity for all applicants and employees. We do not discriminate based on any legally-protected class or characteristic. Employment decisions are made based on qualifications, merit, and business needs. If you need assistance or accommodation due to a disability, please let your recruiter know. For job positions in San Francisco, CA, and other locations where required, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Individuals applying for positions at Wish, including California residents, can see our privacy policy here.",3.5,"Wish
3.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Other Retail Stores,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
141,Data Scientist,-1,"About Imperfect

Imperfect Foods was founded in 2015 with a mission to reduce food waste and build a better food system for everyone. We offer imperfect (yet delicious) produce, affordable pantry items, and quality meat and dairy. We deliver them conveniently to our customers’ doorsteps and pride ourselves on offering up to a 30% discount compared to grocery store prices. Our customers can get the healthy, seasonal produce they want alongside the grocery staples they rely on, without having to compromise their budget or values. We’re proving that doing the right thing for the planet doesn’t have to cost more, and that shopping for quality ingredients can support the people and resources that it takes to grow our favorite foods.

We're headquartered in San Francisco with operations all over the country. Check our website to see if there is an Imperfect near you!

We're looking for folks who are positive, motivated, and ready to change the world. If that sounds like you, drop us a line!

How we are protecting employees from COVID-19

At Imperfect Foods, employee health and safety is our top priority. We have implemented processes and precautions to prevent the spread of COVID-19 in our facilities. We provide gloves, masks, and hand sanitizer to all essential employees who must report to work. Before entering our warehouse, employees have their temperatures checked. In addition, we take great care to ensure frequently touched surfaces are sanitized throughout the day and all warehouses are fully sanitized weekly.

We have also implemented an Emergency Sick Leave policy providing full-time and part-time employees 2 additional weeks of paid time off and up to 26 weeks paid leave if they have a confirmed case of COVID-19.

About the Role:

We're looking for an experienced Data Scientist to join our Business Intelligence team. The ideal candidate will develop and automate algorithms that integrate with various parts of the business to better our customer understanding, improve our customer experience, and drive operational efficiency. Our Data Scientist will collaborate with departments across the company, including Marketing, Operations, and Engineering, for a wide and deep impact. Some example projects include demand forecasting to help with warehouse labor and inventory planning, optimizations to improve warehouse efficiency, personalization and recommendation algorithms to enable customers to discover relevant products, and product subscription cadence optimization. As an early member of the data science team, your role will influence the tech stack and frameworks we develop. This role requires analytical horsepower to efficiently analyze, and communication skills to tell a story with data.

If you like the idea of swimming in data, fighting food waste, and working with a cohesive and productive team, we want to hear from you!
Responsibilities:
Build production grade models on large-scale datasets by utilizing sophisticated statistical modeling, machine learning, or data mining techniques
Provide in-depth analyses and insights for strategic and business initiatives, while maintaining analytics roadmap to prioritize initiatives, communicate timelines, and ensure successful, timely completion of projects
Collaborate cross-functionally to identify impactful business problems and translate them into structured analyses, measurable insights, and reports and dashboards
Assist with the development and deployment of analytical tools and develop custom models to observe progress, uncover insights in the data, and automate analyses
Participate in code reviews and software development standard methodologies
Skills and Qualifications:
3+ years of professional experience as a data scientist, including deploying and maintaining code in a production environment
Confident with machine learning techniques and sophisticated analytics (e.g. regression, classification, clustering, time series, econometrics, mathematical optimization)
Highly skilled in SQL and Python. Experience running complex analytics in a scripting language
Bonus: experience using R and other languages
Has a solid grasp of statistical applications and methods (experimentation, probabilities)
Experience with preparing large data sets for analysis
About You:
You're able to clearly and dynamically translate data into a relevant story with initiative partners, including technical and non-technical audiences
You demonstrate intellectual curiosity, and a knack for translating information into impactful insights, with data big, small, structured, and imprecise
You have the insight to take ambiguous problems and tackle them in a structured, hypothesis-driven, data-supported way
You're a self-starter with the ability to prioritize multiple projects at once
You're passionate about our mission to eliminate food waste and create a better food system for all
Details of the Position:
Full-time exempt position reporting to the Director of Business Intelligence
Candidate can be remotely located within the US
Salary and employee stock options commensurate with experienceCompetitive benefits package including health care, paid vacation, 401K, paid parental leave, and recurring credit towards your Imperfect account!
Physical Requirements:
Sedentary work; involves sitting most of the time
Occasional movement around the office may be necessary
Regular work with computers, including keyboards, mouses, and screens
Regular use of mobile devices, including smartphones and tablets
Individuals seeking employment at Imperfect Foods are considered without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, gender, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, or sexual orientation.

U.S. E-Verify Notice: Imperfect Foods participates in E-Verify in the United States. Imperfect will provide the U.S. Social Security Administration (SSA) and, if necessary, the U.S. Department of Homeland Security (DHS), with information from each new employee's Form I-9 to confirm work authorization.",3.4,"Imperfect Foods
3.4",Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Stores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
142,Data Scientist,$100k-$161k (Glassdoor Est.),"Grammarly is continuing to grow our team during the COVID-19 pandemic, conducting fully remote hiring and onboarding processes. All Grammarly team members can work remotely until August 2021. Read more about how we're supporting our team and communities.

The opportunity


Grammarly empowers people to thrive and connect, whenever and wherever they communicate. 30 million people around the world use our AI-powered writing assistant every day. All of this begins with our team collaborating in a values-driven and learning-oriented environment.

We're looking for a Data Scientist to help us drive decision-making, find bigger opportunities, and improve our product. As a consumer internet company, we produce huge amounts of data, and in this role, you will have outsize opportunities to develop the insights to make it actionable. You will have broad impact and exposure across Grammarly, working with team members from our Product, Research, Marketing, Engineering, and Finance teams.

Grammarly's engineers and researchers have the freedom to innovate and uncover breakthroughs—and, in turn, influence our product roadmap. The complexity of our technical challenges is growing rapidly as we scale our interfaces, algorithms, and infrastructure. Read more about our stack or hear from our team on our technical blog.

Your impact


As a Data Scientist at Grammarly, you will help our team make better decisions by advocating for data-driven approaches across the organization. Your analysis will contribute to our strategy across the business in areas such as user acquisition, engagement, retention, and more.
Within your first month, you will start developing a good understanding of the overall data-processing pipeline, understand a subset of Grammarly's key metrics, and complete at least two small data reports to present to relevant business owners.
By month three, you will become an expert user of our analytical tools, start contributing to the Data Science team's projects, understand all of Grammarly's key metrics, and independently work on small-to-medium-complexity data projects (including A/B tests, channel analysis, and user engagement).
By month six, you will start working independently on complex data projects, such as user segmentation, short- and long-term user-engagement analysis, and lifetime value projections.
By year one, you will become the go-to person and subject-matter expert for a few of Grammarly's key metrics, own and drive projects independently with minimal supervision, and along with our other Data Scientists, ensure ""data science excellence"" at Grammarly (dashboards, high-quality reports, empowered teams, etc.).
We're looking for someone who
Embodies our EAGER values—is ethical, adaptable, gritty, empathetic, and remarkable.
Holds a PhD in a quantitative field or a masters in a quantitative field and has at least 3 years of experience working as a data scientist.
Has experience in data analysis, A/B testing, retention tracking, etc. (consumer product experience is preferred).
Is proficient in data mining and statistics.
Has experience with SQL as well as experience programming in Python, R, Scala, or an equivalent language.
Has strong analytical and critical thinking skills as well as a strong bias toward actionable insights; loves finding insights and getting others to act on them.
Is a self-starter with superior organizational and prioritization skills.
Support for you, professionally and personally
Professional growth: We hire people we trust, and we give team members autonomy to do their best work. We also support professional development with training, coaching, and regular feedback.
A connected team: Grammarly builds products that help people connect, and we apply this mindset to our own team. We have a highly collaborative culture supported by our EAGER values. We also take time to celebrate our colleagues and accomplishments with global, local, and team-specific events and programs.
Comprehensive benefits: Grammarly offers all team members competitive pay along with a benefits package that includes superior health care. We also offer ample and defined time off, catered lunches, gym and recreation stipends, admission discounts, and more.
We encourage you to apply


At Grammarly, we value our differences, and we encourage all—especially those whose identities are traditionally underrepresented in tech organizations—to apply. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, gender expression or identity, sexual orientation, national origin, citizenship, age, marital status, veteran status, disability status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Grammarly will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance. Grammarly is an equal opportunity employer and participant in the U.S. Federal E-Verify program.",5.0,"Grammarly
5.0","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
143,"Engineering Manager, Machine Learning",-1,"In this role your work will directly impact all areas of the business through the use of computer vision, machine learning and big data tools. You will work closely with multiple data science teams & outside engineering teams in prioritizing experiments as well as designing / implementing the backend tooling around the model. This is a people management role where machine learning engineers will rely on you for mentorship and growth. You will be responsible for managing the performance and career development of your team.

What You Get To Do Every Day

Lead team of 5-20 machine learning engineers to design models and services of the highest quality that meet business objects
Participate in research and experimentation of ML/computer vision and big data solutions
Review pull requests and model design to provide constructive feedback
Hire, Coach, provide technical guidance to, and mentor team members
Clearly communicate with product management and the larger business about our technical solves in simple, easy to understand language.
Influence business solutions using machine learning knowledge
Work with leadership to define the machine learning roadmap.

What You Bring To The Role

5+ years' experience in a data role
4+ years of experience managing a development, data engineering or data science teams
4+ years' experience building ML models and putting into production
Experience working with product management to align on objectives and risks
Fluency with Python
High degree of familiarity with: Sklearn, TensorFlow/Keras, Pytorch
Experiences with computer vision and deep learning approaches
Understanding of some big data tools (Kafka, Big Query, Beam, Spark, Lambdas)
Quantitative Degree
Experience designing solution in the cloud - AWS, Azure, GCP
Mastery of git and Github workflows

The RealReal is the world's largest online marketplace for authenticated, consigned luxury goods. With a rigorous authentication process overseen by experts, The RealReal provides a safe and reliable platform for consumers to buy and sell their luxury items. We have 150+ in-house gemologists, horologists and brand authenticators who inspect thousands of items each day. As a sustainable company, we give new life to pieces by hundreds of brands, from Gucci to Cartier, supporting the circular economy. We make consigning effortless with free in-home pickup, drop-off service and direct shipping for individual consignors and estates. At our stores in LA, NYC and San Francisco, customers can shop, consign, and meet with our experts. At our 10 Luxury Consignment Offices, four of which are in our retail stores, our expert staff provides free valuations. Founded in 2011 and listed publicly in 2019 (Nasdaq: REAL), we're growing fast and fundamentally changing the way people buy and sell luxury — a multi-billion dollar industry. Build your career with us and enjoy 401K matching, health, dental and vision insurance, commuter flex spending, healthcare flex spending, generous PTO, a mother's room, and flexible work hours!

The RealReal is committed to providing an equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or expression, or Veteran status. We will consider qualified applicants for a position regardless of arrest or conviction records, consistent with legal requirements.

#LI-DANGERS

IND010",2.8,"The RealReal
2.8","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2011,Company - Public,Other Retail Stores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
144,AI/ML Senior/Staff Software Engineer,$155k-$263k (Glassdoor Est.),"Title: AI/ML Senior/Staff Software Engineer

Company: Samsung Research America (SRA)

Lab: MPS

Location: Mountain View, CA

Summary:

We are looking for highly skilled individual in ML and Deep-Learning algorithms, frameworks and application development. This is a great opportunity to join Samsung Emoji team to build next generation AI based Avatars. The team is focused on building Samsung AR-Emoji platform with AI features. This is an exciting area for Samsung, especially the Mobile Graphics team that enables numerous applications in AI Avatar space. Come join the Mobile Communication Lab and help us build next generation avatars.

Responsibilities Include:
Design, implement and evolve data models for AI-based avatars with focus on face and body expressions for avatar while classifying audio segments
Extend AI-based avatars that interacts with virtual and real objects
Perform extensive research and analysis to make optimal architecture and design decisions that enhances the quality of Avatar SDK on PC/mobile
Collaborate with Android team for ML-model integration to mobile space.
Write large amounts of code and perform code reviews
Participate in new product concepts and create proof-of-concept prototypes
Actively participate and contribute in scrum meetings
Experience Requirements:
MS/PhD in Computer Science or equivalent experience
4+ years of industry experience with strong Computer Science fundamentals in Data Structures, Algorithm Design, and Complexity Analysis
Expert knowledge of Machine Learning / Deep Learning algorithms -- classification, clustering, regression, reinforcement learning, Bayesian modeling, algorithm design and theory of computation
Excellent working knowledge of at least one of the frameworks - Tensorflow/Keras/PyTorch
Proficiency in programming languages including but not limited to Python/C++
Experience with Machine Learning technologies for application to speech recognition is a plus
Hands-on experience with data analysis and building real-life data models using pandas, numpy, nltk, matplotlib etc.


Samsung is an EEO/Veterans/Disabled/LGBT employer. We welcome and encourage diversity as we strive to create an inclusive workplace.",3.8,"Samsung Research America
3.8","Mountain View, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1988,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
145,Senior Machine Learning Engineer,$145k-$236k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Title: Senior Machine Learning Engineer

Data Science is pretty much our business - we drive conversions. Given our massive scale, relatively modest improvements can have an outsized impact.

Responsibilities:
Experiment and improve machine learning models for the recommendation/ad optimization system.
Inform bidding strategy and data engineering architecture.
Understand various ad-optimization algorithms (CTR prediction, eCPM optimization, user targeting and segmentation, RTB optimization, Exploration/Exploitation Algos)
Competencies:
Solid object-oriented programming skill (Scala or Java) and at least one scripting language such as Python/R.
Packages: scikit-learn, TensorFlow.
Scaling GPU clusters to train deep neural networks.
Experimental Design and statistical inference.
Deep expertise in recommendation systems, classification models, class imbalance, and model calibration.
Experience with BigQuery or PySpark or another modern method to access data.
Experience with deploying and monitoring real-time model endpoint in AWS SageMaker is a plus.
Requirements:
B.S./M.S., in Computer Science or similar applied technical field.
Hands-on Machine Learning related industry projects.
Ability to work in a fast paced, test-driven collaborative and iterative programming environment.
Understand major supervised learning and unsupervised learning algorithms (Artificial/Deep Neural Networks, Boosting algorithms, Random Forest, SVM, Naive Bayes, PCA, K-means variants, etc).
Understand major recommendation systems approaches and corresponding algorithms.
Understand statistical hypothesis testing (ex. A/B testing)
Strong understanding of Algorithms, Data Structures and Machine Learning / Data Mining
Understanding of RDBMS, SQL and NoSQL alternatives
Tapjoy is a leading mobile advertising and app monetization company. Our platform empowers advertisers to connect with over 975 million monthly active users through value exchange advertising that drives awareness, engagement and the metrics that matter most to their overall growth. Meanwhile, companies such as Scopely, Crowdstar, Topps and many of the Top 200 grossing app publishers trust our platform to monetize their content, grow their audiences and reward their users. Founded in 2007 and headquartered in San Francisco, Tapjoy is a global organization with more than a dozen offices worldwide.

Tapjoy is an equal opportunity employer. We believe that diversity and inclusion lead to stronger, more innovative teams and better business results; we want to draw from the broadest talent pool possible and encourage qualified applicants. Tapjoy does not discriminate on the basis of sex, race, ethnicity, color, age, sexual orientation, gender (including identity and expression), disability (mental or physical), religion, national origin, citizenship, marital status, military or veteran status, or any other protected classification protected by applicable law; we will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities, and pursuant to applicable fair chance ordinances, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

For more information, please visit www.tapjoy.com.

]]>",3.6,"Tapjoy
3.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
146,Sr Systems Engineer II - Radar Simulation,-1,"One global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place..
Raytheon Technologies (RTX) offers an innovative and inclusive culture; welcoming diversity and collaboration and providing numerous opportunities for career growth.

The Algorithm & Simulation (A&S) Directorate is responsible for algorithm development including radio-frequency (RF) and electro-optical/infrared (EO-IR) Signal Processing; Guidance, Navigation, and Control; and missile-and-sensor-level Modeling and Simulation for RMD's broad portfolio of projects, programs and products. The MSA teams within the A&S Directorate provide, develop, and maintain high fidelity performance simulations (including multiple sensor channels, scene generation capability, control hardware, physical environment, and embedded software), execute system performance analysis (including pre-flight prediction, post flight matching, and verification and validation), support new business initiatives and develop & execute technology roadmaps. Our portfolio includes surface Navy, undersea Navy, missile defense sensors, interceptors, command and control, integrated air and missile defense systems and space surveillance systems.

Join this highly visible team and perform technically challenging assignments, which will directly contribute to protecting our nation and our war fighters.

Job Description:
The candidate will develop and analyze radar algorithms in the context of a high fidelity digital simulation supplemented by field measurements. The systems engineer will work collaboratively to extend and validate the digital simulation, assess radar performance in complex multi-mission scenarios by reviewing detailed data from individual runs and across broad sets of runs, and investigate and resolve issues identified during analysis. The systems engineer will support updating and developing new requirements for implementing and verifying refined and new radar algorithms in tactical radar software. The engineer will develop and present briefings and reports on performance assessments, new and modified radar algorithms, scene modeling approaches, and issue investigations. The engineer will support integration of the high fidelity radar simulation into federations managed by other US Government organizations.

Required Skills:
6+ years of radar modeling and/or analysis experience
Experience using Matlab for data analysis
Experience with a compiled programming language
Ability to work both independently and in a team environment
Commitment to work on-site in a classified environment
Active DoD SECRET clearance, or interim SECRET clearance required prior to start date.
Desired Skills:
Understanding of radar signal processing, radar tracking, and electronic protection
Understanding of environmental clutter and RF propagation phenomenology and modeling
Experience with classification and machine learning techniques
Experience with Java programming
Basic understanding of Linux (from a users point of view)
MS or PhD in Engineering, Science or Mathematics
Required Education (including Major):
Minimum Bachelors Degree in Engineering, Science, or Mathematics area
Keywords:
Radar Systems, RF, radar, simulation, M&S, federated simulation, algorithm development, systems engineering, research and development, Java, Matlab, radar tracking, signal processing, electronic protection, classification, classifier, machine learning, clutter, propagation, mathematics, software, engineer, algorithm, DoD, V&V 170032

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Marlborough, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
147,Solutions Engineer,$106k-$120k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description: Solutions Engineer
Location: San Jose, CA (preferred) or New York City, NY
Department: Engineering
Hours/Shift: Full Time
Reports To: VP, Program Management and Engineering
Job Description:
Affinity Solutions is looking for a self-motivated Solutions Engineer to play a critical role in designing and executing the custom product deliverables to customers. any deliverables. Bringing his/her expertise and understanding of consumer purchase level data, data analytics, and specific experience with leveraging data analytics solutions embodying purchase-level data into different market segments (financial services, advertising agencies and marketing service providers, retailers and publishers, etc.), the Solutions Engineer will help distinguish the areas where Affinity’s data analytics solutions can be leveraged to deliver maximum impact both within existing and potential customers.
The ideal candidate is a passionate and highly skilled individual, who has good communication skills and work with understanding the customer requirements and translate those into existing standard Affinity suite of products or design/propose a custom solution for customer usecases. Then work with internal engineering teams to deliver the custom solution. The candidate needs to be well versed with SQL/NoSQL, Python, AWK, scripting and Tableau to process large data sets to produce high quality customer facing data deliverables and insights. If you have experience designing and building business intelligence/analytics applications, especially around credit/debit card transactions, unified consumer behavioral and profile data, and excited about leveraging your experience to catapult a venture-backed company into hyper-growth, this job is for you.
Responsibilities:
· Work in partnership with sales and account management, to drive the process of understanding existing and potential clients’ issues and the articulation of Affinity’s core value proposition at both a data and business level that can impact and deliver solutions to solve these problems.
· Communicate this knowledge and understanding of where Affinity’s solutions could impact existing and potential customers to key Affinity product and technology personnel, along with distinguishing the specific business opportunities contained within each potential engagement, so that appropriate decisions can be driven on the customization of specific solutions and the prioritization of the product roadmap.
· Armed with this understanding of customer issues and Affinity’s solutions, partner with sales and account management personnel to effectively communicate these solutions to existing and potential customers, demoing them as necessary, and most importantly, quantifying the potential business impact of a successful implementation of the proposed solutions.
· Assist sales and account management in the closure of new and add-on business.
· Post deal closure, the Solutions Engineer will help coordinate the implementation and integration of solutions within a client, acting as a middleman between appropriate client-technical and Affinity personnel, to ensure successful implementation of the data analytics solution along with the highest levels of customer satisfaction.
Qualifications:
· BS in Computer Science or Information Management Systems
· 5+ years of experience in data integration / data engineering
· 5+ years of experience in data modeling and architecture
· 3+ years of experience with building data pipelines and analytics data marts on MPP databases such as RedShift
· 3+ years of experience working on cloud platforms such as AWS
· 3+ years of experience programming in Apache Spark, Hadoop, and python
· Experience working on scripting languages like AWK
· Experience working on UNIX / Linux development and production environments
· Experience working in Agile software development environments
· Knowledge of data science / machine learning is a plus
· Very strong written and verbal communication skills
· Ability to manage multiple conflicting priorities, take proactive ownership of problems and outcomes, think outside the box",3.2,"Affinity Solutions
3.2","San Jose, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
148,Senior Data Scientist,-1,"Formation provides personalization for the largest enterprise businesses in the world. We work with high-volume data streams and apply Data Science to bring individualized multi-step promotions to customers. Our Data Science Team is transforming the relationships between Fortune 500 companies and their customers.

You'll work in small teams with a common goal: create excellent data science solutions anchored in a culture of quality, customer focus, and growth.

As a Senior Data Scientist at Formation you will work in an agile environment to prioritize and test hypotheses using principles of rigorous experimental design. You understand that Data Science is an expansive area and no line of code is written until you have clearly defined the problem, methods, and definition of done. Your guidance on causal inference, machine learning techniques, and work prioritization will be sought by other team members. You will contribute to process documentation, and methodology design and review. You will create platform architecture specifications as you work with Engineering and Product Management to integrate Data Science processes into the product platform.

You understand that bugs, inadequate processes, and less than ideal code are part of building a startup. You welcome the challenge of solving these kind of problems while building a great product with the Data Science team.

You will report to the Manager of Data Science.

Key Responsibilities:
Work with Solution Architects and Customer Success to determine how to best apply Formation's product to client use cases
Explore and understand unfamiliar data-sets with tools such as Apache Spark and AWS Athena
Determine metrics and conduct power analysis to determine the feasibility and design of experiments
Implement processing pipelines to clean and process source data
Present experimental methodology and results to Fortune 500 clients
Work with Engineering and Product to standardize and integrate DS workflows into Formation's product
Provide mentorship and prioritization of DS work to junior Data Scientists
Skills and Experience:
Minimum 5 years experience as a Data Scientist, or 3 years experience as a Data Scientist at a startup
Proficient with the Python scientific ecosystem, Apache Spark, and SQL
Have foundational software engineering skills such as bash scripting, version control, and continuous integration
Have worked with job schedulers such as Apache Airflow
Knowledge of experimental design and analysis of results
Understand common concepts related to e-commerce, e.g. lifetime value, net incremental revenue, and churn
Machine learning proficiency with a focus on recommender systems and supervised learning techniques
Experience with optimization techniques such as constrained linear optimization and contextual bandits
Experience in customer onboarding and long-term customer engagement
Experience participating in talent screening and interviewing
About Formation:

Formation distills complex customer data into uniquely tailored experiences; we orchestrate physical and digital exchanges into one seamless journey. Our business is building lasting, trusted relationships between people and brands—and making it look easy.

We're already reaching millions of people a day, and we're just getting started. Our founding leadership is equal parts business, design, and engineering—because we believe differing perspectives + passionate discourse achieve the greatest outcomes. We give our whole selves. We love learning new things.

Formation is committed to inclusion and diversity and is an equal opportunity employer. You will receive consideration without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or veteran status.

If you're up for the challenge of a lifetime, we're looking for outstanding talent to join our team.

Benefits:

Among our many benefits:
100% medical, dental, and vision
Discretionary PTO policy in addition to 11 paid holidays per year
401K
Commuter Benefits",2.9,"Formation
2.9",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
149,Electrical Engineer,-1,"DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: *
Program and design test fixtures as needed
Ensure all machined parts are manufactured to dimensions and tolerances shown on part drawings with appropriate surface finish quality
Review prints and work with engineering to update as required
Modify Gerber files and layout circuit boards for production
Revise procedures by analyzing operating practices and implementing changes as required
Report results of process flow for shift production
Ensure proper operation of equipment by calling for repairs, maintenance, evaluating new equipment and programming
Source replacement or equivalent components for parts that are outdated or require optimization
Assess returned product to determine what component failed and reason for failure
Maintain workflow by monitoring steps of the process, monitoring personnel and resources, observing control points and equipment, facilitating corrections to malfunctions within process and machinery
Maintain contact with suppliers to ensure inventory arrives in a timely fashion and is correct
Maintain quality by establishing and enforcing a quality program
Maintain professional and technical knowledge required to perform all job functions
Complete production plan by scheduling and assigning personnel, establishing priorities, monitoring progress, revising production schedules as needed, resolving production problems
Meet or exceed department productivity goals as set by management
Learn and be able to perform all job functions in the department and assist in production during heavy workloads
Communicate with other departments and employees about work related processes
Ensure development of new employees through orientation and training
Use information from production performance records to improve production rates through training and coaching of employees
Communicate expectations for employee’s performance, provide them with tools needed to perform and monitor to ensure compliance
Maintain safe and clean work environment
Maintain compliance with established policies and procedures by educating and directing employees on the use of equipment and resources
Identify employee issues and work toward solutions with the assistance of HR and management
Interview and hire candidates based on values and skills the company requires
Update information in Global Shop as necessary
Perform additional related duties as required
JOB REQUIREMENTS/SKILLS: *
Ability to program and design test fixtures as needed
Assess returned product to determine what component failed and reason for failure
Manage processes and identify areas of process improvements
Plan production including prioritizing jobs and manpower to complete jobs on schedule
Proficient on Microsoft Word, Excel, Outlook and Adobe Reader
Ability to communicate job expectations, monitor and appraise results
Ability to effectively coach and counsel employees on performance and behavioral issues
Ability to interview electronics assembly technician candidates and hire based on the values and skills the company requires.
EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE: *
Bachelor's degree- EET or MET, required
Knowledge of circuits, circuit board layouts and diagnostic abilities, required
Ability to modify Gerber files and layout circuit boards for production, a plus
Drafting skills, a plus
Previous experience explaining product functions to clients, a plus
Experience prioritizing workload and staff assignments
Previous supervisor experience, a plus
PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS/WORK ENVIRONMENT: *
Ability to lift 50 lbs. occasionally
Ability to work in a manufacturing environment
Constant sitting
Frequent bending and stooping
Clean work environment
Safety training and other required PPE provided
Must submit to pre-employment drug screening and criminal background check
DESIRED CHARACTERISTICS: *
Ability to lead others for successful performance of their positions
Make decisions based on experience and available data
Require minimal supervision to complete work and meet deadlines
Strives to meet or exceed job requirements
Excellent attendance and punctuality history
Ability to work well with others
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Electrical Engineering: 2 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",3.0,"Willoughby Industries, Inc.
3.0","Indianapolis, IN",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
150,NAO/PAO Research Engineer,$82k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Search by Keyword

Search by Location


×

Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days
Create Alert

form.emailsubscribe-form {
display: none;
}
×

Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days

Share this Job

AddThis
Email
Facebook
Twitter
LinkedIn
Pinterest

NAO/PAO Research Engineer

Apply now »

Date: Oct 1, 2020

Location:

Kingwood, TX, US, 77339

#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}

Company:
CPChem
You may not realize it, but you’ve likely used a product today made possible by the plastics and chemicals manufactured by Chevron Phillips Chemical. From medical supplies and electronics to food packaging and cosmetics, we create the building blocks for more than 70,000 consumer and industrial products.

Even as a global company with 5,000 employees, we maintain a “small company feel” and uphold a culture of respect, diversity, and inclusion. Ask any Chevron Phillips Chemical employee what they like best about their job, and universally, the answer is “the people I work with!” We value work-life balance, and love to see our employees thrive both professionally and personally. There has never been a better time to work for Chevron Phillips Chemical. If you’re ready to grow with us and become part of our vision of being the premier Chemical Company, apply today!

Chevron Phillips Chemical is seeking a NAO Research Engineer to join our Research and Technology organization in Kingwood, Texas. The Research Engineer will be responsible for establishing, designing, and executing independent research projects in support of the company's worldwide Normal Alpha Olefins (NAO) and Poly Alpha Olefin (PAO) businesses. Responsibilities include participating in and leading technical programs involving next generation catalyst process design utilizing bench scale batch and continuous reactor systems through scale up to pilot and commercial operation. Ensure that all aspects of process operations are conducted in a manner consistent with the Operational Excellence programs within Chevron Phillips Chemical Company, including all safety practices, environmental regulations, and design standards. This person will serve as the group subject matter expert for lab support including equipment selection, emissions estimations, PSV sizing calculations, process and economic model design, and P&ID generation. Support of pilot plant programs and operations will be expected as needed. Design, construction, and deployment of new reactor technologies would be a great asset in this role. Core components of the role are to develop intellectual property via patent filings and participate in on-site safety programs.

The successful candidate will be part of the NAOPAO Technology team and must communicate effectively in oral presentations and written documents at all levels of the company. Communication skills will also involve interactions with external customer and industry contacts. The individual must also be able to work effectively with other researchers, technicians, business colleagues, plant personnel, and external customers. #HPCP

Required Qualifications:
Strong commitment to safety
Ph.D. in chemical engineering
Must be able to develop and lead independent research projects
Understanding of basic reactor engineering
Understanding of process chemistry
Understanding of multiphase flow phase behavior
Understanding of separations and general physical chemistry
Must have excellent interpersonal skills
Must be able to communicate effectively to all levels of an organization
Drive to work in the laboratory setting with technician and chemist team
Ability to work with a diverse team including analysts, plant, business, and R&T personnel to ensure the best overall result
The individual must have strong communication skills and be able to work effectively in a cross-functional team environment with technicians, peers, R&T management, business management, plant personnel, and internal/external customers.
Self-driven with high degree of initiative and time management skills
Preferred Qualifications:
At least 5 years of industry experience
An understanding of homogeneous catalyst fundamentals
Process development experience
Experience working with hazardous chemicals
Experience with SuperChems and Aspen software packages
Experience writing VBA code
Experience with process automation control systems and equipment integration
Chevron Phillips Chemical offers competitive salaries, a comprehensive benefits package and at most locations, alternate work schedules. To learn more about Chevron Phillips Chemical and to be considered for a position, please visit us online today at www.cpchem.com.

Paper resumes will not be accepted. All job seekers must go to the web site to be considered for positions. If you are interested in applying for this position and need an accommodation to apply, please contact our Human Resources Service Center at 1-800-446-1422, option 4.

Chevron Phillips Chemical Company is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, age, disability, veteran status or marital status.

To all recruitment agencies: We are not responsible for any fee related to unsolicited resumes from 3rd party staffing and recruiting agencies (whether submitted through this website or sent directly to employees) unless a written agreement is in place between the agency and Chevron Phillips Chemical Company LP (“Company”) and an authorized Company representative makes a written request to the agency to assist with this requisition. Similarly, no fee will be paid for candidates who apply and claim to be represented by an agency. Any unsolicited resumes, CVs, or other candidate information submitted by an agency will become the property of Company, and no fee will be paid in the event such candidate is hired.

Travel Requirements: Up to 10%

Eligibility for Relocation: Yes

Closing Date: 10/21/2020

Nearest Major Market: Houston
Job Segment:
Research Engineer, Electronics Engineer, Chemical Research, Engineer, Construction, Engineering

Apply now »

Find similar jobs:
Houston Science Jobs,
Houston Engineering Jobs,
Houston Chemical Engineer Jobs,
Engineering & Research Jobs",3.7,"Chevron Phillips Chemical
3.7","Kingwood, TX",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Chemical Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
151,SENIOR RESEARCH ENGINEER,$88k-$126k (Glassdoor Est.),"Air Products (NYSE:APD) is a world-leading Industrial Gases company in operation for over 75 years, has an immediate opening in our Air Separation Unit (ASU) Cryogenics Technology team for a creative and inquisitive chemical engineer based at our Corporate Headquarters in Allentown, Pennsylvania. The Company’s core industrial gases business provides atmospheric and process gases and related equipment to manufacturing markets, including refining and petrochemical, metals, electronics, and food and beverage. Air Products is also the world’s leading supplier of liquefied natural gas process technology and equipment.

ASU Cryogenics Technology Team is a part of Air Separation Technology organization. Air Products Air Separation (ASU) business relies heavily on the team to improve the competitiveness in our air separation offerings and implement new technologies into our plants. The team delivers competitive cryogenic technology advancements for air separation across all ASU product lines, including structured packing, heat exchangers, reboilers, and column internals. The research engineers in the team works in collaboration with the entire Air Separation Technology and Product Line teams to deliver full plant solutions from the laboratory to the field.

The successful candidate will perform research and development work in support of new technology and lower cost products. The candidate will work as part of a cross-functional research, engineering and manufacturing team, developing conceptual and detailed designs of process equipment, system components and manufacturing systems. Projects will range in length from three hours to three years. Varying amounts of engineering analysis and testing may be required, as well as fabrication, construction and startup support. This position requires a broad chemical engineering background and a deep understanding of distillation, thermodynamics and heat and mass transfer. The candidate will be required to solve a diverse variety of problems, which may involve two phase fluid flow, gas separation, heat exchanger and cryogenic equipment design etc. This position involves up to 10% travel to global locations.

Existing project areas where the candidate can expect to be involved include:
Lead research programs to further understand heat and mass transfer and fluid dynamics in air separation units and develop new cryogenics technologies.
Advance key ASU cryogenic technologies including design distributor, distillation packing, heat exchanger and work with product engineering team to move new technology from idea to implementation.
Collaborate with business/product owners to understand the business needs and create ideas to support these needs and offer solutions.
Improve manufacturing performance by identifying opportunities for automating operations, focusing on advanced manufacturing technologies and tools that are driven or enhanced by integrated information technology; smart manufacturing.
Design laboratory and process equipment for the analysis of liquid distribution, mass and heat transfer.
Write technical and scientific reports, project proposals, conference papers and presenting at academic and industrial events.

While no pre-existing knowledge of specific processes, software, or fabrication methods is required, the candidate will be expected to learn them as needed for specific projects. To that end, the following skills will be beneficial:
Experience in distillation and/or heat exchange processes
Experience in technical & economical evaluations of ideas/projects
Experience with process simulation tools such as Aspen
Interest in understanding business needs and passion to create R&D programs to support those needs.
Experience in managing project budget and schedules
Experience in running experiments and supervising technicians/lab staff
Experience with additive manufacturing technology

Qualifications / Skills
Minimum BS in chemical engineering, MS or PhD is preferred
8-10 years’ experience in related industry
Broad chemical engineering fundamentals
Creative & innovative with positive attitude
Ability to function well in a multi-disciplinary team environment
Track record of safety in a laboratory or plant environment
Strong verbal and written communications skills

To learn more, visit https://www.airproducts.com/company#/.

Air Products offers a comprehensive benefits package including paid holidays/vacation, affordable medical, dental, life insurance and retirement plans.

We thank all applicants in advance for their interest; however, only those applicants who are being considered for an interview, or are currently employed by Air Products, will be contacted.

Air Products is an Equal Opportunity Employer (U.S.) You will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, citizenship, gender, marital status, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, disability, or veteran status.",4.1,"Air Products
4.1","Allentown, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1940,Company - Public,Chemical Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
152,Senior Machine Learning Engineer,$123k-$146k (Glassdoor Est.),"Entefy’s Senior Machine Learning Engineer is a highly visible position internally and externally. This is where your deep experience and great insights intersect with an amazing opportunity to shape the future of communication and digital interaction.

Skills and Experience:
We’re not looking for “good;” Entefy is on a mission for best. The success of this mission depends on its team members to be creatively analytical, insatiably curious, and absolutely fearless in tackling big challenges.
Requirements
5+ years of experience in Machine Learning tools and algorithms specially in unstructured data classification and clustering
Proficient knowledge of and experience with AI systems
Demonstrable expertise in multiple programming languages such as Python, C++, Java, etc.
Masters or PhD in Computer Science in Machine Learning or related field preferred
Proficiency in Machine Learning open source tools
Proficiency in Machine Translation
Proficiency in Social Text Mining
Proficiency in SQL and non-SQL databases
Proficiency in Data Visualization tools
Visit www.entefy.com and www.blog.entefy.com",4.3,"Entefy
4.3","Palo Alto, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
153,Embedded Software Engineer II,-1,"***This position is for early career individuals who have less than 2 years of professional work experience and who will receive a degree during the current academic year or who received their degree within the last 18 months.***

Overview:
Raytheon Missiles and Defense (RMD) is a technology and innovation leader specializing in defense, security and civil markets where youll be part of a global team working together to solve some of the most demanding challenges on the planet. We are the world's largest developer, producer and integrator of weapon systems. In fact, we've produced over one million missiles in our history. Military forces in more than 50 countries look to us for a high-quality product portfolio that includes missiles, smart munitions, projectiles, kinetic kill vehicles and directed energy weapons. We are able to accomplish this feat because our employees live our Values of Trust, Respect, Collaboration, Innovation and Accountability. Diversity is a part of our culture and a key to our success. When world-class talent works together in a place that is respectful and inclusive, we solve some of the world's hardest problems.

We know that a diverse company is a strong company. The people of Raytheon Technologies come from different backgrounds. We value our different perspectives and styles of tackling the worlds most complex challenges and toughest threats. Through Employee Resource Groups (ERGs), our employees are empowered to impact business results, build professional networks, advocate for causes that matter to them and contribute to their local communities. Diversity of thought is critical to the future of innovation. We leverage these unique voices to generate solutions toward a united and singular purpose: to define the future of aerospace.

Job Description:
The Software Products Engineering (SPE) organization develops flight software applications, including integration and test on missiles, launchers, fire control and other complex systems. Our precision software and firmware integrates operating systems, device drivers, networking, and control software to bring together sensor, guidance, and flight control processing features to complete the mission. Our engineers design, develop, and build innovative solutions for the U.S. Government. Experience all aspects of a software development life-cycle as a member of a fast-paced agile team on the leading edge of:
Real-time systems design
Digital signal processing
Machine Learning and Autonomous Systems
Cyber Security
DevOps technologies and methods
We encourage curious, creative problem solvers to join our team of bright, dedicated software craftspeople in designing and implementing highly innovative systems. You will learn advanced software engineering practices and apply new technologies to develop next generation capabilities and help keep our country safe.

As an entry-level Software Engineer, you will:
Assist and participate in the research, design, development and testing of real-time embedded software, firmware, and tools, to include development of new work products or enhancement of existing applications and systems
Design, code, test, integrate and document software solutions
Participate in internal review of software components and systems
Collaborate with project leaders and other professionals within Engineering
Work on problems with defined scope, schedule and expectations
Follow established development practices and processes to maintain the configuration management of software products
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.

Required Education/Skills:
Master of Science or Master of Arts degree in Computer Engineering or Software Engineering; or
Master of Science or Master of Arts degree in a related Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM) discipline (such as Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Mechanical Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Systems Engineering, Math or Physics) with experience with C, C++, or Java
Must be either currently pursuing degree or degree must have been granted in the last 18 months
U.S. Citizenship is required
Desired Skills:
College coursework covering modern software languages (such as C, C++, or Java)
1 year or more of calculus, physics and computer science studies that include assembly level programming
Knowledge of data structures and algorithms
Knowledge of systems software design, operating systems and architectures
ABET is the preferred, although not required, accreditation standard. 3.0 cumulative GPA desired
Demonstrated ability to work effectively with individuals from diverse communities and cultures
Demonstrated ability to work with colleagues who represent a diversity of work and conflict resolution styles
Location:
This position is located in beautiful Tucson, AZ. Tucson has a friendly,caring and laid-back atmosphere, combined with the innovation and energy of ametropolitan region and recognized as one of Americas 10 Best Small Cities. Surrounded by beautiful mountains, colorful Sonoran Desert landscape andmajestic saguaro cacti, Tucson is blessed with some of natures best work.Tucson is known for its bright blue skies, and with more than 310 sunny days peryear, Tucsons fantastic weather lets residents enjoy the outdoors year-round.

Benefits:
Full-time and Part-time opportunities are available
Student Loan Repayment Contribution Program
Paid Parental Leave
Educational Assistance
9/80 work schedule Every other Friday off
Onsite Wellness Program Health Screenings/Flu Shots
401K Savings & Investment Plan
Paid Time Off
Rstars is an enterprise-wide recognition program that allows you to give and receive thanks for notable and exceptional performance.
Clearance:
This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Non-US citizens may not be eligible to obtain a security clearance. The Defense Industrial Security Clearance Office (DISCO), an agency of the Department of Defense, handles and adjudicates the security clearance process. Security clearance factors include, but are not limited to, allegiance to the US, foreign influence, foreign preference, criminal conduct, security violations and drug involvement. Employment is contingent on other factors, including, but not limited to, background checks and drug screens. https://www.state.gov/m/ds/clearances/c10978.htm
*Please upload a copy of your most recent transcripts with your resume when applying to this requisition. Please include your cumulative GPA and projected graduation date on your resume. ***

167597

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tucson, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
154,Software Engineer - Java,-1,"Who we are!
Raytheon BBN Technologies is one of Raytheons premier research and development centers. Our diverse research portfolio combines the best technologies to deliver innovative, custom solutions with real-world benefit.

Located in Arlington, VA, our Information Exploitation group is seeking a Staff Scientist with software research interests. Our world-class team works with a broad range of Government agencies to solve problems that are both technically challenging and have a real operational impact. The ideal candidate will have strong experience in Java development with some experience or interest in machine reasoning, semantic web technologies, data analytics, or artificial intelligence technologies.

Our research work applies the above technologies to build both prototype and real operational systems. You will be working on challenging problems including:
• Producing sophisticated software in a fast-paced agile environment;
• Developing mission-critical applications for deployment into global enterprise operations;
• Optimizing software for knowledge representation, storage, and query systems for high performance.
• Designing novel machine reasoning and learning algorithms and solutions to complex, open-ended intelligence problems.

What will you need?
• BS in Computer Science or equivalent discipline and 2 years of experience; or MS in Computer Science or equivalent discipline and 0 years of experience.
• Proficiency in Java and the Java-based development ecosystem.
• Position may require some amount of overnight travel.
• US citizenship and a willingness to apply for US Government security clearance is required.

Additional Skills that would be AWESOME
• Advanced degree preferred.
• Experience with Web application development.
• Familiarity with modern software configuration management tools such as Docker, Gradle, Ivy, etc.
• Current US Government security clearance is desired.

This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Except in rare circumstances, only U.S. citizens are eligible for a security clearance.

We offer outstanding benefits that include flexible work schedules, a competitive 401k company match, a Retirement Contribution plan, performance based incentive, paid parental leave, paid time off, and many other employee discounts.

168348

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Rosslyn, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
155,Sr Systems Engineer - Radar Simulation,-1,"One global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place..
Raytheon Technologies (RTX) offers an innovative and inclusive culture; welcoming diversity and collaboration and providing numerous opportunities for career growth.

The Algorithm & Simulation (A&S) Directorate is responsible for algorithm development including radio-frequency (RF) and electro-optical/infrared (EO-IR) Signal Processing; Guidance, Navigation, and Control; and missile-and-sensor-level Modeling and Simulation for RMD's broad portfolio of projects, programs and products. The MSA teams within the A&S Directorate provide, develop, and maintain high fidelity performance simulations (including multiple sensor channels, scene generation capability, control hardware, physical environment, and embedded software), execute system performance analysis (including pre-flight prediction, post flight matching, and verification and validation), support new business initiatives and develop & execute technology roadmaps. Our portfolio includes surface Navy, undersea Navy, missile defense sensors, interceptors, command and control, integrated air and missile defense systems and space surveillance systems.

Join this highly visible team and perform technically challenging assignments, which will directly contribute to protecting our nation and our war fighters.

Job Description:
The candidate will develop and analyze radar algorithms in the context of a high fidelity digital simulation supplemented by field measurements. The systems engineer will work collaboratively to extend and validate the digital simulation, assess radar performance in complex multi-mission scenarios by reviewing detailed data from individual runs and across broad sets of runs, and investigate and resolve issues identified during analysis. The systems engineer will support updating and developing new requirements for implementing and verifying refined and new radar algorithms in tactical radar software. The engineer will develop and present briefings and reports on performance assessments, new and modified radar algorithms, scene modeling approaches, and issue investigations. The engineer will support integration of the high fidelity radar simulation into federations managed by other US Government organizations.

Required Skills:
4+ years of radar modeling and/or analysis experience
Experience using Matlab for data analysis
Experience with a compiled programming language
Ability to work both independently and in a team environment
Commitment to work on-site in a classified environment
Active DoD SECRET clearance, or interim SECRET clearance required prior to start date.
Desired Skills:
Understanding of radar signal processing, radar tracking, and electronic protection
Understanding of environmental clutter and RF propagation phenomenology and modeling
Experience with classification and machine learning techniques
Experience with Java programming
Basic understanding of Linux (from a users point of view)
MS or PhD in Engineering, Science or Mathematics
Required Education (including Major):
Minimum Bachelors Degree in Engineering, Science, or Mathematics area
Keywords:
Radar Systems, RF, radar, simulation, M&S, federated simulation, algorithm development, systems engineering, research and development, Java, Matlab, radar tracking, signal processing, electronic protection, classification, classifier, machine learning, clutter, propagation, mathematics, software, engineer, algorithm, DoD, V&V

168596

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Marlborough, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
156,Data Scientist,$120k-$140k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description:

Quartet is a pioneering healthcare technology company striving to improve the lives of people with mental health conditions. We connect people to a personalized care team to get them the right care at the right time. Our collaborative technology platform and range of services brings together physicians, mental health providers, and insurance companies to effectively improve patient outcomes and drive down healthcare costs. Backed by $153MM in venture funding from top investors like Oak HC/FT, GV (formerly Google Ventures), F-Prime Capital Partners, Polaris Partners, Centene Corporation and Echo Ventures. Quartet is headquartered in NYC and is currently operating in several markets across the United States Pennsylvania, Washington, Northern California, New Jersey, North Carolina, Louisiana, and Illinois.

About the team & opportunity:

As a Data Scientist at Quartet, you will work on a range of projects -- developing statistical analyses to study impact of Quartet interventions; predicting mental health needs among populations; building machine learning models to suggest timely and appropriate behavioral health care interventions for patients. You'll develop a deep understanding of Quartet interventions and the predictive models and algorithms.

You will design and develop effective models, features, and algorithms involving multiple datasets, including user activity, Electronic Health Records (EHR), admissions, discharges and transfers (ADT), medical claims, pharmacy claims, and lab test claims. Leverages knowledge of computer science, machine learning, data mining and software architecture to build high-quality data products. Supports the design of Quartet products, including: an entity resolution and de-duplication library for linking patients and providers data, which is collected from multiple sources; a machine learning application for the detection of opioid use disorder in patients using supervised learning and deep learning; and an optical mark recognition (OMR) computer vision application for transcribing paper assessments.

Accountabilities:
Research and develop machine-learning and statistical models in Quartet Health's platform to improve software personalization and recommendations for users
Drives a data-informed process for experimenting with new products to improve patient outcomes and operational efficiency.
Performing ML research, exploratory data analysis, and computer-vision modeling; developing model evaluation and online maintenance methodologies, including confidence estimation, calibration, and concept drift
Develop general-purpose frameworks to support machine learning applications in production.
Minimum Qualifications:
2-3 years experience as a data scientist.
Formal training in statistics and computer science.
Knowledge of mathematical fundamentals: probability theory, linear algebra and statistics.
Strong data transformation and extraction skills with SQL databases.
Strong statistical programming skills in both Python and R.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with Amazon Web Services infrastructure.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with Linux command line.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with git for version control.
Ability to work on projects from initial to final phase- beginning by defining a problem, developing an implementation plan, and overseeing deployment and maintenance.
Ability to clearly communicate across disciplines and work collaboratively.
Experience with any of the following: Docker, TensorFlow, Keras, Numpy, Scipy, Pandas, Gensim, Scikit-learn, NLKT, Jupyter
Employee Benefits for Quartet include: Unlimited vacation, volunteer opportunities, team events, mental healthcare coverage of 15 free therapy sessions + unlimited copay reimbursements, medical, dental + vision coverage, generous parental and military leave, commuter benefits, 401K, and stock option grants.

Want to know what Quartet life is like? Click here to meet our team.

Quartet is committed to building a diverse team and fostering an inclusive culture, and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We embrace and encourage our employees' differences in race, religion, color, national origin, gender, family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, veteran status, disability, pregnancy, medical conditions, and other characteristics. Headhunters and recruitment agencies may not submit resumes/CVs through this Web site or directly to managers. Quartet does not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resumes. Quartet will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with Quartet.

Please note: Quartet interview requests and job offers only originate from quartethealth.com email addresses (e.g. jsmith@quartethealth.com). Quartet will also never ask for bank information (e.g. account and routing number), social security numbers, passwords, or other sensitive information to be delivered via email. If you receive a scam email or wish to report a security issue involving Quartet, please notify us at: security@quartethealth.com.

Have someone to refer? Email talent@quartethealth.com to submit their details to us.",3.7,"Quartet Health
3.7","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
157,Autonomous Driving Data Engineer,$99k-$178k (Glassdoor Est.),"Leading the future of luxury mobility

Lucid’s mission is to inspire the adoption of sustainable energy by creating the most captivating luxury electric vehicles, centered around the human experience. Working at Lucid Motors means having a shared vision to power the future in revolutionary ways. Be part of a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity to transform the automotive industry.

We are currently seeking an experienced Big Data Engineer to help building up our large-scale data management system for the ADAS / Autonomous Driving team. This field allows contributions on various levels around the data pipeline and data processing, data annotation, machine learning, data ingestion, data pre-processing, integration of Deep Neural Network frameworks, efficient data search and high performance data manipulation.
You Will:
Work with a state-of-the-art data pipeline on the development and test process of the ADAS/AD features
Enable efficient data (pre-)processing in our cloud infrastructure
Contribute to the architecture and implementation of an efficient data ingestion process to transfer and store large-scale vehicle sensor data from our Lucid Air test vehicles efficiently into our data storage
Help to optimize the data storage, search and data processing based on a diverse mix of storage solutions, caching techniques and big data frameworks.
Contribute to the implementation of a secure distributed data access solution for data on-premise and via cloud providers to connect Lucid data with service providers and partners
Work with machine learning experts, testing engineers and software developers to solve challenging development problems
You Bring:
Knowledge of database systems, big data concepts and cluster computing frameworks (e.g. Spark, Hadoop, or other tools)
Excellence in C++, Python, Java or other related programming languages
Previous experience with big data applications or back-end software development
Experience with machine learning, data engineering, deep learning frameworks and related open-loop testing techniques
Strong communication skills
Great to Have:
Previous experience building efficient large-scale data collection, storage and processing pipelines
Understanding of cyber-security issues and best practices
Advanced degrees preferred
Education:
BS minimum in the areas of Computer Science/Engineering, Data Engineering or other related fields
4+ years of work experience or a PhD in a related field
LMHP

Be part of something amazing

Come work alongside some of the most accomplished minds in the industry. Beyond providing competitive salaries, we’re providing a community for innovators who want to make an immediate and significant impact. If you are driven to create a better, more sustainable future, then this is the right place for you.

At Lucid, we don’t just welcome diversity - we celebrate it! Lucid Motors is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, national or ethnic origin, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity and expression, marital status, and any other characteristic protected under applicable State or Federal laws and regulations.

To all recruitment agencies: Lucid Motors does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our careers alias or other Lucid Motors employees. Lucid Motors is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",3.9,"Lucid Motors
3.9","Newark, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
158,SAR/DSP Engineer,-1,"SAR/DSP Engineer

NSBU | Melbourne, FL, United States

Why Join Rincon Research Corporation (RRC)?

At Rincon Research Corporation, our primary business is innovating, developing, and fielding digital signal processing (DSP) products and services for the United States Defense and Intelligence Communities in support of national security.

Rincon Research Corporation seeks a candidate that has a detailed software and computer skillset but is interested in advanced signal processing applications.

Come join the team that is creating cutting edge signal processing, geolocation, and communication systems for the future!

What are the primary responsibilities in the SAR/DSP Engineer position?

Candidate will be responsible for developing within a heterogeneous software environment containing code in Python, MATLAB, C/C++ and Java. A strong CS background is needed and experience in cloud computing and machine learning are very desirable. Good communication skills, with ability to interact with remote co-workers and customers are required. Looking for people able to find creative and cutting-edge solutions for customer issues.

What required background will make you successful?
Degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, or other equivalent field of discipline
Master’s degree and 5+ years applied and relevant experience or Bachelor’s degree and 7+ years’ experience
Demonstrated capability in scientific programming of high-level language such as C/C++on Unix/Linux platforms
Working knowledge of high level interpreted languages such as PYTHON and/or MATLAB
Experience with interfacing extensive C/C++ libraries within interpreted languages
Ability to obtain and maintain TS/SCI security clearance
US CITIZENSHIP REQUIRED
Where is the position located?

This position is located at our Melbourne, FL office.

What benefits does RRC offer?
100% employer-paid premiums for family medical and dental insurance, employee life insurance, short-term and long-term disability (STD & LTD)
Flexible reimbursement spending accounts for medical expense and dependent care
Immediate participation and vesting in the company’s Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP) and 401(k) Plan
Employer contributions to RRC’s ESOP
Employer matching contributions to the company’s 401( k) Plan
Employer discretionary contributions to the company’s 401(k) Plan
Rincon Research Corporation is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, veteran status, or any other protected factor.",4.1,"Rincon Research Corporation
4.1","Melbourne, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
159,Project Engineer III - Machine Vision and Robotics,$75k-$113k (Glassdoor Est.),"***This role can be located in our Bloomington MN office. We are also open to a remote, home office, field based employee too. The field based employee will have access to or be near a major metropolitan airport to accommodate business travel as required.

ABOUT SICK:

Today, SICK is a leading manufacturer of factory, logistics, and process automation technology worldwide. With more than 1,000 patents for its products, SICK continues to lead the industry in new product innovations. The diversity of its product line allows SICK to offer solutions at every phase of production in the automotive, packaging, electronics, food and beverage, consumer goods, logistics, parcel, material handling, oil and gas, chemical/HPI, power, and cement industries. SICK’s expansive product portfolio includes industrial sensors; safety solutions automatic identification; vision encoders; and gas, dust, and flow analyzers.

POSITION SUMMARY:

This position has primary responsibility for pre-sale and post-sale technical support for SICK systems sold into the Logistics Market in North America including Barcode Reading Solutions, Time-of-Flight Line Scanners, 2D& 3D Machine Vision Systems, Robotics solutions and third party collaborative solutions.

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Define and document customer application requirements. Manage project scope.
Support the sales channels through the proposal process, providing pricing analysis, and guidelines as well as technical solutions that fit the needs of the customer
Utilize broad range of SICK products in developing systems to fit the solutions
Understand, manage vendors and integrate 3rd party market technologies including conveyors, Robots.
Drive R&D developments as required.
Provide direction to R&D, production and field service on BOM, design, quality, and deployment for the solution.
Ensure that solutions are repeatable and can be handed over to rest of the organization in an efficient manner. Conduct trainings as necessary.
Work with product management to develop systems roadmap for SICK and validate new systems.
Provide post-sale technical support to customers when escalated.
Carry out other duties and responsibilities as may be assigned or required.
Regular attendance and timeliness.
QUALIFICATIONS:

Education and Experience:
Four year degree in Engineering (Computer, Electrical or Mechanical) or Computer Science, or equivalent experience required.
10+ years of experience in applied engineering in industrial automation, mechanical/ electrical expertise at a manufacturing/ integration company, and/ or Machine Vision& Robotics solutions integration company
Other Qualifications:
Able to work directly with customers, vendors and solve technical problems.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Able to manage multiple simultaneous projects.
PLC and industry communication experience is a plus.
Able to read blue prints and wiring schematics is a plus.
Computer proficiency with Microsoft (Word, Excel, PowerPoint) and Internet applications.
Able and willing to work alternative schedules including weekend, and on-call hours as needed.
Legally permitted to work in the United States.
Able to work in a general office environment.
CORE COMPETENCIES:

Ethics and Integrity Personal Growth and Learning, Customer Focus, Personal Accountable, Building Effective Relationships

If you thrive in a fast-paced, team-oriented work environment that offers challenges and the opportunity for growth, we’re the place for you! SICK has several locations throughout domestic US and offers competitive wages and an excellent benefits program. Qualified candidates can apply online by clicking the“Apply Online” button. Visit us atwww.sickusa.com.

Affirmative Action (AA)/Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE) M/F/D/V",3.8,"SICK USA
3.8","Minneapolis, MN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1946,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
160,Senior Infrastructure Engineer,$90k-$160k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Alteryx

Alteryx develops software for data preparation and analysis, including a number of server solutions for model deployment, collaborative work on data, and scheduling of automatic data processing. We're revolutionizing data analytics by providing a complete end to end, self-service platform that allows users to get from business questions to business answers at incredible speeds. Why work for just any analytics company?

At Alteryx, we are explorers, dreamers and innovators. We're on a journey to build the best analytics platform in the world, but we can't do it without people like you leading the way. We want Alteryx to be recognized as much for our dynamic work culture as for our products.

About Alteryx Innovation Labs

The Innovation Labs office, Alteryx's first office presence in Boston, was started earlier this year by the acquisition of MIT-spinout Feature Labs. This rapidly growing team combines the excitement of being part of a fast-paced, innovative startup with the resources, market penetration, and wisdom of a data analytics market leader. Our goal is to turbo-charge machine learning and data science efforts on the Alteryx platform, and to enable anyone to solve impactful problems. We are working on high-impact, high-visibility projects, and we’re looking for collaborative and knowledge-hungry teammates who want to join us as we work to democratize machine learning.

Overview

As an Infrastructure Engineer you will lead the Innovation Labs’ effort to deploy, scale, secure and manage our new multi-platform data science product (sorry we can’t say much yet on what it is publicly, but we promise it’s great!). In this role, you will have the opportunity to problem solve, drive projects to success, communicate with stakeholders, and learn from both success and failures as part of a dynamic, friendly and ambitious team with technical influence throughout Alteryx and beyond.

Responsibilities
Work with the rest of the infrastructure team to build, design and scale a Docker-based cloud version of the product.
Develop compliance and security practices across the engineering organization
Define and promote a culture of rigorous software development practice and high quality standards
***The company will not provide sponsorship for work visas or other employment authorization for this position***

Requirements
5+ years experience in Docker-based cloud deployments, ideally with Kubernetes and on AWS
Experience in Single and Multi-Tenant Enterprise deployments
Experience writing clear and effective documentation
Experience with automated testing and CI/CD platforms and tools like CircleCI, Selenium, etc
Experience with Infrastructure as Code (Terraform for example)
Bonus
Experience with Windows Server, Powershell and installers
Experience with Azure and/or Google Cloud
Contributions to open-source frameworks and/or libraries
Experience in building ML data pipelines
Perks
100% company-paid medical, dental, and vision for associates
Health plans that cover your family and pets
Company matched 401(k)
Associate stock purchase plan
Paid time off: 3 weeks’ vacation, 5 sick days, 9 holidays, 3 floating holidays, and 20 hours volunteer time
100% paid parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Wellness programs with up to $300 fitness reimbursement annually
Collaborative offices stocked with healthy snacks and drinks
Office events, catered lunches, and happy hours
#LI-JE1",3.6,"Alteryx
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
161,Geospatial Data Scientist,-1,"GEOSPATIAL DATA SCIENTIST*
\*\*\*Must have an active DoD Top Secret / SCI Security Clearance\*\*\*
Job Description: *
We currently have an immediate position available for a Geospatial Data Scientist to support a large task order for the Department of Defense at our customer site in Washington, DC. As a member of our core team, you will have an exciting and challenging opportunity to work with emerging technology and a large collection of data sources, engage with a large team of highly skilled professionals, and enjoy a healthy and friendly workplace.
Minimum Requirements: *
8+ years MINIMUM of experience in Intelligence Analysis
Bachelors or Masters degree in Intelligence Analysis, related field, or equivalent experience.
Ability to create high quality finished geospatial intelligence products requiring minimal revisions or modifications.
Must have experience using geospatial intelligence analysis and imagery tools such as ArcGIS, Analyst Notebook, Q-GIS, Image Product Library, and Intelink.
Familiarity with Modernized Integrated Database (MIDB), NES, M3, Data Xplorer suite, Target Profiler, and other community systems are desirable
Ability to work with and identify patterns of life in very large data repositories and cross-correlate metadata across multiple data sources.
Ability to identify new emerging data sources that provides value to the overall mission requirements.
Python scripting and Jupyter experience a strong plus.
Ability to work independently with minimal oversight.
Strong communication and leadership skills.
Responsibilities: *
Conduct research and analysis of data and create finished intelligence products.
Review data ingest streams for anomalies in support of QA/QC activities.
Validate accuracy of geolocations in big data systems using sampling and vetting techniques.
Coordinate data requirements with collection teams and developers.
Perform light scripting in support of analysis and QA/QC.
Populate various databases with results of analytical findings.
Disseminate a broad array of intelligence data analysis products dealing with subject profiles, networks, facilities, and resources.
Our Company: *
BigBear, Inc.* is a software development company with locations in San Diego, Washington DC, Charlottesville, and Reston, VA. Our mission is to enable big data computing and analytics for our customers at a low cost. We leverage capabilities such as machine learning, crowdsourcing, geospatial image processing, and Extract-Transform-Load (ETL) data processing using our on-premise cloud computing technology stack. Our solutions provide a unique offering of products, custom-built software, and services focused within Big Data Analytics, Geospatial Information Systems (GIS), Visualization and Cloud Computing to our Department of Defense, and Commercial customers. We currently have exciting and challenging career opportunities for talented, motivated individuals who want to be part of a fast-growing company.
Our Team: *
We like to play with new toys and technologies. We like to break things to see if we can put them back together again in a better way. Our tails wag when we hear the words Big Data, Geospatial or Machine Learning. Each team member provides a unique set of advanced technical skills and trade that contributes to our overall success.
Perks/Benefits: *
· 100% employer-paid for Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance (PPO)

· A competitive salary based on experience

· Flexible Spending Account (FSA) - optional

· 401(k) with dollar-for-dollar match up to 6%

· A warm, cozy office with actual chairs and tables

· Life and Disability Insurance 100% paid for by the company

· Education Assistance

· 529 College Savings Plan - optional

· Healthy Rewards Program

· Pre-paid Legal & Identity Theft Protection - optional

· Gym Reimbursement

· Pet Insurance - optional

· A shiny magical machine that does wonderful things

· Flexible Hours

· Unlimited Coffee, Drinks and Snacks

· 6 WEEKS of Paid Time Off (PTO) on top of 11 Paid Holidays!
BigBear is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled *
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $75,000.00 - $140,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Team members will eventually report to a specific work site in Washinton D.C. but for the time being we are working from home for the safety of our team members.

Experience:
Intelligence Analysis: 6 years (Preferred)
MIDB: 3 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Washington, DC 20032 (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Required)
Company's website:
www.bigbear.io
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"BigBear, Inc.
4.4","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
162,Software Engineer,$47k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"Software Engineer

General Position Summary:
The Developer DBA will principally be responsible to create database objects that are used for custom applications that conform to properly normalized data models. Document the data model with database diagrams that properly identify all entity relationships. Support database efficiency and availability through database maintenance and monitoring. Responsible for creating and maintaining custom SSRS reports integrated into applications, and Power BI reports online. Additional SQL Server responsibilities will be to support, install, maintain and, troubleshoot enterprise databases and the applications that utilize SQL Server.

Job Scope/Complexity:
Responsible for full life-cycle of medium to large sized complex projects; strong technical skills; strong ability to understand complex business processes. Develops solutions based on extensive technical knowledge, skills and experience; influences client towards innovative/integrated solutions.

Job Responsibilities:
Evaluate, recommend and implement new architectural and user interface elements in the .Net development environment; document, train and assist developers in supporting existing code base; evaluate new code version and deployment strategies.

ANALYSIS AND REQUIREMENTS GATHERING

Define complex business/clinical/education problems by meeting with clients to observe and understand current processes and the issues related to those processes. Provide written documentation of findings to share with the client and other IT colleagues.
Gather complex system requirements by meeting with clients and researching existing technology to understand the business requirements and possible solutions for new applications.

DESIGN AND DEVELOPMENT

Develop detailed tasks/schedule estimates for complex projects in order to ensure product is delivered in a timely fashion according to software lifecycle standards.
Write functional/technical specifications from the complex system requirements, putting them into functional and technical descriptions for use by programmers and business analysts to develop technical solutions.
Develop/change data input, files/database structures, data transformation, algorithms, and data output by using appropriate computer language/tools to provide technical solutions for complex application development tasks.
Create database objects for custom applications including tables, stored procedures, views, functions, triggers, T-SQL queries and RDLs.
Provide thought leadership in designing and developing innovative integrated solutions.

TESTING AND DOCUMENTATION

Create and document complex test scenarios using the appropriate testing tools to validate and verify application functionality.
Test all changes by using the appropriate complex test scenarios to ensure all delivered solutions work as expected and errors are handling in a meaningful way.
Author and maintain documentation by writing audience-appropriate materials to serve as technical references.
Effectively communicate the complexities of various technologies to other members of a development team using database diagrams that provide complete database entity relationships.

IMPLEMENTATION AND MAINTENANCE

Implement changes by adhering to the change management policies and procedures for any given project to communicate to all parties the nature, significance, and risk factors of the solution.
Monitor changes and resolve complex problems by responding as they occur, by reviewing all processing and output of the newly implemented solution, and by proactively ensuring the solution works successfully in order to satisfy the customer requirements and to provide a smooth transition to the new solution.
Provide support by investigating and resolving issues, including complex issues to ensure prompt, effective service.

Specific systems, applications, projects on which the position will be responsible to develop or maintain:

Faculty Information System, Course System, Trend Analysis and Budgeting System, Patient Viewpoint

Impact of application to organization:

The Faculty Information system serves the purpose of collecting and sharing information about faculty and their Curriculum Vitae. This directly impacts the Schools faculty and administrators by allowing them to review faculty participation and contributions to teaching and research.
The Course system is used by faculty and students to provide course details and assist with the student enrollment and course evaluation processes. This system has a significant impact to the schools business model.
The Trend Analysis and Budgeting System is used by the Schools administrators to plan and forecast future year budgets and expenditure levels. This system is critical for financial planning.
The Patient Viewpoint system is used to help assess the quality of life as patients undergo treatment. This is a collaborative work with another JHU division to assist with patient care.

Examples of clients supported and degree of client interaction:

Clients supported include faculty, students and staff. Although interaction with most clients is through a liaison, either a project manager or team leader, some interaction with clients regarding clarification of business logic or application requirements is necessary.

Scale/size of area (# of users, # of servers, # of machines, # of systems supported, transaction volume, # of schools/areas that use system, multiple environments, geography, # of interfaces/integration with other systems):
There are 35 monitored production servers and 10 non production servers with approximately 400 supported databases. Collectively these databases serve the needs of virtually all faculty, students and staff at the School. The custom applications impact a very large percentage of the faculty, student and staff populations.

Degree of supervision - how work is assigned, carried out, and reviewed:

Low degree of supervision but work is team-based and tasks are initiated/managed by the Business Analyst and Project Manager.
Work location: 615 N. Wolfe Street and work from home 1-2 days a week.

Minimum qualifications (mandatory):

Bachelor's degree (or foreign equivalent) preferably in Computer Science, Computer Information Systems, Information Technology, Electronic Engineering or related field.
Five years of related work experience
Additional education may substitute for required experience and additional related experience may substitute for required education, to the extent permitted by the JHU equivalency formula.

Preferred Qualifications:
Knowledge in the assigned application as well as the platform on which it runs.

Special Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities:

Experience with computer systems and Web applications: Microsoft SQL Server database development, T SQL scripting, SSRS report writing, Power BI, ASP.Net applications using C# and VB.Net, .Net Frameworks. All development supports a Web application environment.
Must possess all requisite knowledge, skills, and abilities as posted in the supplemental section.
SQL Server 2012 to SQL Server 2019 development and administration
Power BI Report create and publish online reports
SQL Reporting services, create and publish RDL into production systems
T-SQL Programming of both DDL and DML objects
Must demonstrate strong critical thinking and analytical reasoning skills.
Ability to work on multiple priorities effectively.
Ability to prioritize conflicting demands.
Ability to execute assigned project tasks within established schedule.
Ability to work collaboratively in a team environment.
Ability to communicate effectively in the service of users and colleagues.
Writes and communicates clearly and concisely.
Possesses sound documentation skills.
Ability to maintain confidentiality.
Must demonstrate exemplary customer service skills.

Classified Title: Software Engineer
Role/Level/Range: ATP/04/PE
Starting Salary Range: $69,140 - $95,005 per year
Employee group: Full Time
Schedule: M-F, 8:30 am - 5:00 pm
Exempt Status: Exempt
Location: 05-MD:School of Public Health
Department name: 10003508-JHSPH IT Advanced Technology Services
Personnel area: School of Public Health

The successful candidate(s) for this position will be subject to a pre-employment background check.

If you are interested in applying for employment with The Johns Hopkins University and require special assistance or accommodation during any part of the pre-employment process, please contact the HR Business Services Office at jhurecruitment@jhu.edu. For TTY users, call via Maryland Relay or dial 711.

The following additional provisions may apply depending on which campus you will work. Your recruiter will advise accordingly.

During the Influenza (""the flu"") season, as a condition of employment, The Johns Hopkins Institutions require all employees who provide ongoing services to patients or work in patient care or clinical care areas to have an annual influenza vaccination or possess an approved medical or religious exception. Failure to meet this requirement may result in termination of employment.

The pre-employment physical for positions in clinical areas, laboratories, working with research subjects, or involving community contact requires documentation of immune status against Rubella (German measles), Rubeola (Measles), Mumps, Varicella (chickenpox), Hepatitis B and documentation of having received the Tdap (Tetanus, diphtheria, pertussis) vaccination. This may include documentation of having two (2) MMR vaccines; two (2) Varicella vaccines; or antibody status to these diseases from laboratory testing. Blood tests for immunities to these diseases are ordinarily included in the pre-employment physical exam except for those employees who provide results of blood tests or immunization documentation from their own health care providers. Any vaccinations required for these diseases will be given at no cost in our Occupational Health office.

Equal Opportunity Employer
Note: Job Postings are updated daily and remain online until filled.

EEO is the Law
Learn more:
https://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/eeoc_self_print_poster.pdf

To apply, visit https://jobs.jhu.edu/job/Baltimore-Software-Engineer-MD-21205/673651000/

Copyright 2017 Jobelephant.com Inc. All rights reserved.

Posted by the FREE value-added recruitment advertising agency

jeid-1a2806c4be96754f90abc8aaf8d19e5e",4.2,"Johns Hopkins University
4.2","Baltimore, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1876,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
163,"Research Scientist (Computer Vision, Machine Learning)",$60k-$126k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Robotics and Electromechanical Systems (REMS) Group at Intelligent Automation, Inc. (IAI) has an open full-time position for a Research Scientist in computer vision and machine learning. We are looking for an outstanding self-motivated researcher with a Masters or Doctorate degree in Electrical Engineering or Computer Science with a background in computer vision and machine learning.

You will be working with the multi-disciplinary team of scientists and engineers to conduct R&D in the fields of video analytics, machine learning, robotics perception and AI. We have numerous active research and development projects where we design, integrate, test, and deploy systems for a range of applications, including image and video analytics, artificial intelligence, scene understanding, perception for autonomous systems, healthcare, training, and simulation.

The desired candidate should have a strong publication record in computer vision particularly in the areas of deep learning, object detection, tracking and classification, segmentation, cross-modality inference, self-supervised learning, activity recognition, and robotic vision. A solid background in programming is important.

CITIZENSHIP / VISA STATUS: Applicant must be a US Citizen or US Permanent Resident (Green Card)

JOB DUTIES

Conduct research and development in the area of computer vision and image processing
Design, implement, and integrate computer vision and machine learning algorithms and prototypes
Interact with and support multiple research teams
Support program management and business development efforts by writing reports and presenting to customers

REQUIRED EXPERIENCE & EDUCATION

Masters or Doctorate degree in computer science, electrical engineering, computer engineering, mathematics or other related field
Minimum 3 years of hands-on experience in research, engineering, or research & development

DESIRED SKILLS

Proficiency in Python, C++, and MATLAB
Minimum 3 years of experience with computer vision techniques such as object recognition, segmentation, and classification
Experience with machine learning or deep learning models
Proficient technical writing and strong communication skills
Familiarity with computer vision libraries and machine learning framework, such as OpenCV, PyTorch, and TensorFlow
Experience with embedded vision development

About IAI

IAI is a technology innovation company specializing in providing advanced technology solutions and R&D services to federal agencies and corporations. IAI leverages agile R&D processes, a multi-disciplinary collaborative environment, and its substantial intellectual property portfolio to excel in developing concepts into market-focused products and customer-driven solutions. IAI’s core R&D areas include: AI & Advanced Computing; Autonomy & Robotics; Healthcare Research Technologies; Modeling, Simulation & Visualization; and Networks & Cyber Security; and Radar, Communications & Sensors. For more information about IAI please visit www.i-a-i.com.

US Citizenship or Permanent Residency required

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race,

color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status.

Requisition ID: 20-1247",3.6,"Intelligent Automation
3.6","Rockville, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1987,Company - Private,"Health, Beauty, & Fitness",Consumer Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
164,Data Scientist-Junior,$44k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business Group Highlights

Defense

The Defense group supports the Department of Defense (DoD) mission to keep our homeland and its citizens safe. We provide solutions to improve the Nation's defense by providing software, systems engineering, IT, training and logistics and fleet management solutions.

Responsibilities

This position is for a large contract for the Army, providing leadership and support existing systems, processes, and policies as well as working to implement new technologies and processes in support of the client’s mission to provide Intelligence training and technologies to military personnel.

Provides data science and data engineering support to targeting activities that bring in large datasets. Data science and data engineering support is needed to help manage and execute the ingest (extract, transform and load (ETL) operations), parsing, data normalizations, database design, as well as performing data analysis at scale and implementing algorithms to find impactful operational and finished intelligence in large data streams. Involved in the analysis of unstructured and semi-structured data. Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases. Handles processing against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams. Has the ability to make discoveries in the world of big data. Requires strong technical and computational skills coupled with the ability to code, design, develop, and deploy sophisticated applications using advanced unstructured and semi-structured data analysis techniques. Has the ability to utilize advance tools and computational skills to interpret, connect, predict and make discoveries in complex data and deliver recommendations. Develops documentation to support objectives of operationally-focused team members.

Qualifications

3 years experience and a BA/BS degree

Responsible for assisting more senior positions and/or performing functional duties under the oversight of more senior positions.

Current TS/SCI Clearance

Bachelor of Science Degree or higher computer science, statistics, or other related STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math)

Desired qualifications:

Strong understanding of data engineering, structure, formatting, conditioning and analysis.
Knowledge of database tools and current data science processes.
Full-stack development experience.

Desired Skills:

Thorough/Working knowledge of Python and some of the following software/tools: SQL, R, Hadoop, Spark, Java, C/C++, Git Bash, Tableau, ArcGIS, Unix commands.
Thorough/Working knowledge of research designs.
Thorough/Working knowledge of collection methods, capabilities and tasking process.
Familiarity with project management concepts and principles.
Intellectual curiosity; creativity and innovation to go beyond current tools to deliver the best solution to complex problems.
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
165,Translational Data Scientist/Data Engineering,$86k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"20-Aug-2020

Job ID
300507BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""20. That’s how many years of data we have in our informatics systems! Enriched every day by more than 1000 Translational Medicine scientists. If you like data, there is no better place to be!

Who are we?

Our team of 30 Data Scientists are leveraging this data to accelerate drug development. NIBR Translational Medicine is in charge of creating data needed for submission of all Novartis drugs: Toxicology, DMPK, Phase I and II Clinical Trials, and most clinical Omics. We have one of the richest data pool in the Pharma world.
As a Translational Data Scientist, using your knowledge of research, you will analyze the Translational Medicine data landscape, and design ways to integrate data to speed up its analysis and the project delivery. Creating new capacities for Translational Medicine teams by easing access to data, relevant algorithms, and visualizations as part of the Novartis Digital Strategy, you will make drug development faster.

Your main responsibilities will be to:
• Organize access to data via APIs, applications and textual and graphical representations of the data in close collaboration with data scientists. Build application Proof of Concepts with selected scientists, organize scale up with relevant partners and release to NIBR community.
• Push community adoption of techniques and tools crafted by supporting power users and coordinating training sessions.
• Be a liaison between partners involved: scientific teams having data intensive needs, teams crafting enterprise solutions, internal and external partners producing similar solutions.
• Maintain expertise in methodologies for data handling, visualization and User Experience
• Mentor and encourage others to tackle problems
Posting Title
Translational Data Scientist/Data Engineering",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
166,"AWS Devops Engineer, Analytics",-1,"At Edelman Financial Engines, we believe every hardworking American deserves to move their financial life forward, and we’re growing our team so we can help more clients every day.

The Analytics Office at Edelman Financial Engines seeks an experienced Devops engineer to build and maintain a robust AWS cloud infrastructure to support our data warehouse and data pipelines, business intelligence assets, and data science capabilities.

What is the Analytics Office?

The Analytics Office owns analytics systems like the enterprise data warehouse, business dashboards, certain corporate data marts, and the data pipelines sourced from upstream production systems. We are separate from the product development and IT departments that own our corporate product code and production systems. The expectation of the company is for Analytics to be largely self-sufficient in its systems and administration.

Responsibilities and Roles:
Implement and manage continuous delivery systems for Analytics Office production/test/dev environments
Continue to implement and automate security controls, define and deploy monitoring on AWS
Design, manage and maintain tools to automate operational processes
Write infrastructure as code with Cloud Formation and/or Terraform
Support AWS-based Analytics assets such as Tableau dashboards, data pipeline infrastructure and support special projects like machine-learning
Help develop AWS POCs
Provide subject matter expertise in running analytics applications within AWS
Qualifications:
4+ years of experience with AWS, including but not limited to heavy experience with IAM, VPC, EC2, S3, CloudWatch, and Cloudformation
Experience as DevOps engineer in a scalable production environment (4+ years)
Demonstrated experience working with Configuration Management tools like Terraform, Ansible.
Experience with Python and shell scripting (3+)
Knowledge of Linux systems administration and architecture (2+ years)
BS or MS in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or similar
AWS certification (DevOps, SysOps, Cloud Architect) a plus.


About Edelman Financial Engines

Since 1986, Edelman Financial Engines has been committed to always acting in the best interest of our clients. We were founded on the belief that all American investors – not just the wealthy – deserve access to personalized, comprehensive financial planning and investment advice. Today, we are America’s top independent financial planning and investment advisor, recognized by both InvestmentNews1 and Barron’s2 with 170+ planner offices across the country and entrusted by more than 1.2 million clients to manage more than $213 billion in assets. Our unique approach to serving clients combines our advanced methodology and proprietary technology with the attention of a dedicated personal financial planner. Every client’s situation and goals are unique, and the powerful fusion of high-tech and high-touch allows Edelman Financial Engines to deliver the personal plan and financial confidence that everyone deserves.

For more information, visit www.EdelmanFinancialEngines.com and www.FinancialEngines.com

© 2019 Edelman Financial Engines™, LLC All rights reserved. All advisory services provided by Financial Engines Advisors L.L.C. Financial Engines Advisors does not guarantee future results.

For California residents, please see the link for the Privacy Notice for Candidates. California law requires that we provide you this notice about the collection and use of your personal information. Please read it carefully and reach out to Jill O’Connell (857-305-8555 or joconnell@edelmanfinancialengines.com) with any questions.

Edelman Financial Engines encourages success based on our individual merits and abilities without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, pregnancy, marital, domestic partner, or civil union status, national origin, citizenship, ancestry, ethnic heritage, genetic information, age, legally recognized disability, military service or veteran status.

1 Ranking and status for 2019. For independence methodology and ranking, see InvestmentNews Center (http://data.investmentnews.com/ria/);

2 The 2019 Top 50 Independent Advisory Firm Ranking issued by Barron’s is qualitative and quantitative, including assets managed, the size and experience of teams, and the regulatory records of the advisers and firms. Firms elect to participate, but do not pay to be included in the ranking. Investor returns/experience are not considered. 2018 ranking refers to Edelman Financial Services (EFS), which combined its advisory business in its entirety with Financial Engines Advisors L.L.C. (FEA) in November 2018. For the same survey, FEA received a precombination ranking of twelfth.",3.3,"Edelman Financial Engines
3.3",United States,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
167,Senior Data Engineer,$67k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta has an immediate need for a Senior Data Engineer to join a fast-paced program in support of a government customer with a very critical national security mission. This is a multi-year program, where the successful candidate will work on an interdisciplinary project team of more than 30 highly qualified individuals with a wide array of skills that include client (reactjs), server (spring java), QA Automation Engineers, UI/UX Designers, and DevOps engineers. The team is responsible for building a next generation Mission Information System and is performing greenfield Software Development using modern technologies via an Agile DevOps approach.

This Senior Data Engineer will play a vital role collaborating as part of this cross-functional Agile team to create and enhance data ingestion pipelines and address big data challenges. The Senior Data Engineer will work closely with the Chief Architect, systems engineers, software engineers, and data scientists on the following key tasks:
Provide Extraction, Transformation, and Load (ETL) experience coupled with enterprise search capabilities to solve Big Data challenges
Design and implement high-volume data ingestion and streaming pipelines using Open Source frameworks like Apache Spark, Flink, Nifi, and Kafka on AWS Cloud
Leverage strategic and analytical skills to understand and solve customer and business centric questions
Create prototypes and proofs of concept for iterative development
Learn new technologies and apply the knowledge in production systems
Monitor and troubleshoot performance issues on the enterprise data pipelines and the data lake
Partner with various teams to define and execute data acquisition, transformation, processing and make data actionable for operational and analytics initiatives

Required Qualifications / Experience:

BS in Computer Science, Systems Engineering, or a related technical field or equivalent experience with at least 8+ years in systems engineering or administration (6+ years with a MS/MIS Degree).
Must have an active Top Secret security clearance and able to obtain a TS/SCI with Polygraph.
3 years of experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, NiFi.
3 years of experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python (preferred) and/or Java.
3 years of experience with and managing data across relational SQL and NoSQL databases like MySQL, Postgres, Cassandra, HDFS, Redis, and Elasticsearch.
3 years of experience working in a Linux environment.
2 years of experience working with and designing REST APIs.
Experience in designing/developing platform components like caching, messaging, event processing, automation, transformation and tooling frameworks.
Experience developing data ingest workflows with stream-processing systems: Spark-Streaming, Kafka Streams and/or Flink.
Experience transforming data in various formats, including JSON, XML, CSV, and zipped files.
Experience with performance tuning of ETL jobs.
Experience developing flexible ontologies to fit data from multiple sources and implementing the ontology in the form of database mappings / schemas.
Strong interpersonal and communication skills necessary to work effectively with customers and other team members.

Preferred Qualifications / Experience:

Data engineering experience in the Intelligence Community or other government agencies.
Experience with Microservices architecture components, including Docker and Kubernetes.
Experience developing microservices to fit data cleansing, transformation and enrichment needs.
Experience with AWS cloud services: EC2, S3, EMR, RDS, Redshift, Athena and/or Glue.
Experience with Jira, Confluence and extensive experience with Agile methodologies.
Knowledge about security and best practices.
Experience developing flexible data ingest and enrichment pipelines, to easily accommodate new and existing data sources.
Experience with software configuration management tools such as Git/Gitlab, Salt, Confluence, etc.
Experience with continuous integration and deployment (CI/CD) pipelines and their enabling tools such as Jenkins, Nexus, etc.
Detailed oriented/self-motivated with the ability to learn and deploy new technology quickly.

Clearance Level: TS/SCI with Poly

Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"Novetta
4.5","Reston, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
168,Application Engineer,$56k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"Apply

Description

**TS/SCI w/ Polygraph required before consideration.**

The Application Engineer will participate in full software development lifecycle including requirements design, development, testing, and deployment; developing near real-time ETL applications which can process large volumes of data in various formats.

Required: Experience in many of the following areas: experience working in a DevOps Linux environment, Splunk, parsing of unstructured data, ReST service development, LDAP/authentication protocols, scripting, log processing, analytics/visualizations, machine learning, application performance tuning

Desired: Java/Spring, RegEx, Python/Perl scripting, NiFi, SQL/MySQL, ELK stack, ArcSight, Ansible, Salt, Puppet, Chef, MapReduce/Pig, Git, Jira, Maven

COMSO, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",4.1,"COMSO
4.1","Linthicum Heights, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1988,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
169,Data Scientist Lead- DAB,$94k-$153k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

For the Takeda global scientific community who aspire to deliver transformative medicines to patients Scientific Informatics is the technology leader, with domain specific expertise, that provides innovative platforms and technologies to improve both operational efficiency and data-driven decision making. As an embedded partner Scientific Informatics is at the leading edge of both science and technology and proactively reacts to the changing scientific environment and needs of researchers in an agile fashion to deliver timely, value-adding solutions.

The Digital Advisory Board programs aim to ensure our growing data is easily accessible to everyone so we can help our patients and HCPs faster and more effectively.

Central Support

Central Support – Central support will be at the forefront of driving new ways of working, collaborating and change. We need talent that are willing to be first adopters. Leaders who can help ensure learnings and best practices are leveraged across all of Takeda’s digital priorities

As disruptive technology changes the face of healthcare industry, Takeda will have a new role to play. We are taking a giant step forward to shape a new breed of organization. A future-ready organization that shape shifts as the world changes. We have embarked on a visionary journey to become a truly Living Business. A digital and data-driven organization with agile capabilities to respond quickly to new technology opportunities and changing customer expectations.

While others react to changing dynamics and disruption by building barriers around their digital solutions and patients, we understand that the global healthcare transformation can only be successful when we enter a new era of trust and collaboration by exchanging data, insights and knowledge.

We will explore new ways of working across Takeda. We will introduce agile capabilities and culture driving more intentional collaboration, innovation and partnerships across geographies and business units.

OBJECTIVES/PURPOSE

Takeda is undergoing a digital transformation. Mobilized by the C-suite in November 2018 with a $300M funding released in January 2019, the transformation program has several initiatives in flight across the globe.
One key pillar of the program and the digital organization is the emerging technology and digital partnerships team. This team serves as the agile prototyping body that drives pilot efforts to validate the efficacy and scalability of onboarded technology, analytics products.
We are looking for a versatile, super-star data scientist that will lead the development of models, insight engines across the molecule lifecycle. And if needed, put hands on the keyboard to build rapid prototypes.

ACCOUNTABILITIES

Identify relevant internal and external stakeholders to gather requirements to deliver data solutions.
The scope of work is broad - crystal structure prediction, synthetic control arms, rare disease early diagnosis algorithms, yield optimization for manufacturing, patient journey analysis, micro-segmentation, field force optimization, etc.
Involve additional data experts as needed.
Implement tools (e.g., Power BI) that help data consumers to extract, analyze and visualize data faster through data pipelines.
Design proposals for calculations based on subscribed data collection.
Develop calculation mechanisms to ensure real-time data collection of customer behavior.
Identify and interpret trends or make patterns in complex data sets in order to enable the business data-driven decisions.
Provide data insights for technical solutions and system improvements based on interpreted results.
Work alongside architects and other technical experts while contributing actionable, database insights to the system architecture.
The goal would be for you to have global visibility, impact, and be positioned to start building your own team in April 2021.

EDUCATION, BEHAVIOURAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS

Bachelor’s degree in relevant field, or other relevant work experience.
This role requires comfort with common modeling techniques (linear Regression, logistic Regression. decision tree, SVM, Naive Bayes, kNN. K-Means. Random Forest, dimensionality reduction, gradient boosting, xgboost, etc.), deep learning, deep knowledge of NLP (BERT, NLTK, including interest in learning new packages like GPT-3, deeBERT, AutoML, Sagemaker autopilot), a different approach for deploying models in the cloud (primarily AWS) and a strong appetite for learning!
Advanced knowledge of statistical and data mining techniques (regression, decision trees, clustering, neural networks etc..).
Proficiency in R, SAS, SPSS, MATLAB, Python (NumPy/SciPy) or other statistical packages.
Experience in working with large data sets and relational databases.
Experience with distributed systems and programming models, using Big Data technologies such as Hadoop or Spark.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills along with strong desire to work in cross-functional teams.
If you are a high performing data science wizard that can be a thought leader for ~200 data scientists across the organization in data science innovation, speed/comfort with learning and rapid prototyping - this is the gig you are looking for.

Locations

Cambridge, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
170,Intern - Data Scientist - Product Management - Summer,$63k-$104k (Glassdoor Est.),"Lumen’s internship program is a 10 week, fast-paced and exciting opportunity to gain professional experience within your field of study and career interest. Interns within the Product Management Department will be part of an accelerated learning experience, to challenge skills learned in the classroom and develop new skills while working on active Lumen work projects. Interns within the Product Management group will be part of an accelerated learning experience, to challenge skills learned in the classroom and develop new skills while working on active Lumen work projects. Product Management leads the product strategy, financial targets, product requirements and go-to-market strategy for a product portfolio.The internship will take place in Tempe, AZ. In addition, interns will connect to our company culture through community outreach projects, engage with our employee resource groups and be able to develop their professional skills and business acumen through frequent exposure to senior leadership, cutting-edge technology, groundbreaking projects, and a network of mentors and fellow interns. Come Intern with us and create the beginnings of a career right for YOU!

Job Description

We are seeking problem solvers unafraid of big challenges, who have a passion for transforming data into valuable, actionable insights and are looking to help build something from the ground up and make an impact.

• Make data visually appealing and simple to both navigate and comprehend for end-users.
• Work cross functionally with Product Finance, Strategic Pricing, Financial Intelligence and IT team to build/implement analytic dashboards, models and intelligent automation.
• To discover, collect, cleanse, and enrich the data needed for analysis and modeling.
• Responsible for building advanced analytics models while utilizing structured and unstructured information.
• Identify key business levers, establish cause & effect, and communicate key findings to facilitate data driven decision-making.

Qualifications
Minimum Cumulative GPA: 3.0 or higher (preferred)
Enrolled at a 4-year accredited college or university, in a rising junior, rising senior, or masters level status at time of internship.
Graduating between August 2021 – May 2023
Education/Degree: In pursuit of a bachelor’s level degree in business, accounting or finance in a senior level status at the start of the internship. Master’s Degree preferred.
Strong sense of urgency and ability to meet deadlines
Ability to demonstrate ownership and accountability
Ability to collaborate and have agility while making effective decisions
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Flexible and adapts well to change
Professional appearance and attitude
Experience & Skills : PowerBI, Clickhouse, Tableau, Jupyter, Python, Perl, R, M, Javascript/JSON, SQL
Intern is responsible for their travel to/from work location
Must be available to work 30 – 40 hours, during the specified 10-week timeframe
US work authorization is required

Requisition #: 232796

EEO Statement
We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training.

Disclaimer
The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job. Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",3.2,"Lumen
3.2","Tempe, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,1930,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
171,Senior Data Scientist Marketing,$69k-$115k (Glassdoor Est.),"KnowBe4, Inc. is the provider of the world's largest security awareness training and simulated phishing platform. KnowBe4 enables organizations to manage the ongoing problem of social engineering by helping them train employees to make smarter security decisions, every day. Tens of thousands of organizations worldwide use KnowBe4's platform to mobilize their end users as a last line of defense and enable them to make better security decisions, every day.

We have ranked a best place to work for women, millennials, and in technology nationwide by Fortune Magazine as well as #1 or #2 in The Tampa Bay Top Workplaces Survey for the last five years.

****This position is located in Clearwater, FL and is only temporarily remote due to current COVID restrictions.*****

The Senior Data Scientist (Marketing) will work closely with the SVP of FP&A and Dir of Analytics to implement advanced analytical models and other data-driven solutions.

Responsibilities:
Work with stakeholders in marketing to identify opportunities to use available data to develop business solutions.
Enhance existing data collection procedures to ensure that all data relevant for analyses is captured.
Cleanse, consolidate, and verify the integrity of data used in analyses.
Build and validate predictive models to increase customer retention, revenue generation, and other business outcomes.
Assist in the design and data modeling of the data warehouse.
Visualize data, especially in reports and dashboards, to communicate analysis results to stakeholders.
Extend data collection to unstructured data within the company and external sources
Develop machine learning driven products for internal use.
Perform ad-hoc analysis, presentations and other projects as required
Minimum Qualifications:
Master's degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics or other quantitative discipline. PhD preferred.
Master's degree 4+ yrs in similar role: PhD 3+ yrs
Experience with statistical computer languages (Python, R etc.) to manipulate and analyze large datasets.
Experience with databases, query languages, and associated data architecture.
Experience with data visualization tools like Looker, Tableau, PowerBI, or Plotly
Experience in professional application of machine learning algorithms such as Random Forest, SVM, k-NN, Naïve Bayes, Gradient Boosting. Deep learning frameworks (Keras/Tensorflow, PyTorch, etc.) is a plus
Experience applying data science to marketing including attribution modeling, media mix modeling, and ROI analysis.
Ability to communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical colleagues
Experience with marketing automation platforms and/or CRM software is a plus (Hubspot, Salesforce, Marketo, etc.)
Experience with AWS is a plus
Note: An applicant assessment, background check and drug test may be part of your hiring procedure.

Individuals seeking employment at KnowBe4 are considered without regards to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, gender identity, or sexual orientation.

No recruitment agencies, please.",4.8,"KnowBe4
4.8","Clearwater, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
172,Electrical - Controls/Automation Engineer,-1,"RESPONSIBILITIES: *
Duties & Responsibilities
Responsible for electrical controls engineering including hardware and software designs utilized with bulk solids storage and conveyance and liquid chemical storage, metering, mixing, and industrial process systems.
Develop and modify PLC and HMI programs and control systems for standard and custom bulk solids handling and chemical feed systems used in the water, wastewater and industrial process industries.
Coordinate electrical and control requirements with equipment mechanical design.
Consult with the sales department and clients for the purpose of recommending solutions for project automation requirements.
Ensure electrical equipment and designs meet required standards, such as NEC, IEC, NEMA, UL508A, CSA, NFPA.
Technical writing skills for control narratives and control system O&M’s.
Provide mentorship to less experienced engineers in the area of controls and automation engineering.
Works with service department to conduct in-house factory acceptance testing, and generally provide service department with controls and electrical system support both in-house and at project sites as needed.
Coordinate with the production and QC departments to refine and improve work.
Meet defined schedules, deadlines, and goals.
Provide support for on-site start-ups.
Other duties as assigned.
QUALIFICATIONS: *
Education and/or Experience
Bachelor of Science degree in Engineering, preferable Electrical, or equivalent combination of education and experience.
Computer skill requirements: Proficient in AutoCAD, AutoCAD Electrical, Allen Bradley RS500, RS5000, FactoryTalk, Modicon & Magelis software, Microsoft Word, Excel, and Adobe Acrobat. Ability to efficiently learn new PLC and HMI software platforms.
Knowledge, Skills & Abilities
Clear and concise oral and written English language skills.
Ability to follow verbal and written instructions.
Ability to work under high pressure/stressful conditions efficiently, professionally and effectively.
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills.
Ability to make timely and sound decisions.
Detail oriented.
Strong organizational and time management skills.
Ability to work on multiple concurrent projects and adapt quickly to time-sensitive needs.
Strong interpersonal skills and customer service orientation.
Ability to work independently and as a member of a team.
Ability to establish and maintain effective and professional working relationships with co-workers, management and members of the various business units.
Position Working Environment: *
Clean office environment.
Periodic exposure to shop environment containing dust, machine noise and welding equipment.
Periodic standing, walking, and lifting loads under 25 pounds.
Additional Information: *
This Position Reports To: Engineering Manager

Department / Classification: Engineering

Type: Full Time, Exempt

NOTE: This job description is not intended to be an exhaustive list of all duties, responsibilities or qualifications associated with the job.

_VeloDyne is committed to diversity and equality in employment. All candidates are selected for positions based on job-related factors. _

_The Immigration Reform and Control Act require that we verify and document employment eligibility for all new employees by the end of the third day of work._

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $65,000.00 - $75,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
Industrial Control Panel Design: 5 years (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Required travel:
25% (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",1.3,"Velocity Dynamics, LLC
1.3","Grain Valley, MO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
173,"Java Engineer, Team Lead",$98k-$189k (Glassdoor Est.),"Title: Lead Software Engineer / Architect
Location: Indianapolis, IN
Salary: Up to $145k based on experience

Your Purpose:
hc1 is seeking a highly collaborative player-coach with a passion for creating innovative and scalable solutions. With increasing business demands, we are looking for a solution visionary that can help build and lead a new Java Scrum team to construct life-changing healthcare solutions using AWS.

How we will make an impact:
hc1 is focused on improving lives with high-value care. Our unique machine learning algorithms transform laboratory data into personalized healthcare insights. As an AWS Partner Network organization, our cloud-based software organizes live data (including lab results, genomics, and medications) to deliver solutions that ensure the right patient gets the right test and the right prescription.

Your Key Responsibilities:
Lead the design and development of hc1's products
Design and implement new features and components based on business requirements
Develop high-level product specifications and technical designs
Conduct code reviews, documentation of design, and implementation of Agile methodologies to ensure high quality software
Lead projects with minimal supervision
Produce working proof of concepts to jump-start development
Investigate and evaluate new and emerging technologies
Troubleshoot and fix software application problems
Participate in hc1's software process quality efforts
Mentor other engineers
Your Skills & Experiences:
5+ years experience with software design and Java development
At least 1 year developing on AWS
Experience in designing and developing modern distributed applications
Extensive experience in designing, developing and debugging Restful Web services and micro-services
Experience designing cloud-based systems
Our Technical Environment (NOT necessarily required, but for your information):
hc1 platform
Java (Spring & SpringBoot)
Amazon Web Services (AWS)
AWS Glue
React.js
Snowflake
Python
Linux
Jenkins
What's in it for you:
Unlimited PTO, remote friendly and flexible hours
401k Matching
Career planning, mentorships and professional development
Stock Options
Volunteer Opportunities
Wellness Programs
Join our Talent Community:
Get a glimpse into our culture and perks by visiting hc1.com/careers and follow us on Instagram (@hc1dotcom) to get a day in the life at hc1.

Inclusion and Equal Opportunity Employment:
hc1 is an equal opportunity employer committed to diversity and inclusion. We are pleased to consider all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, protected veterans status, Aboriginal/Native American status or any other legally-protected factors. Disability-related accommodations during the application process are available upon request.",3.0,"hc1
3.0","Indianapolis, IN",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
174,"Data Scientist, Senior Level",$110k-$182k (Glassdoor Est.),"Category: Data Scientist

Title: Data Scientist, Senior Level (50-277)

Location(s): Chantilly, VA

Required Security Clearance: Active TS/SCI with appropriate agency Polygraph

Salary: Maximum of $160,000/year

Geodata IT, a subsidiary of Freedom Consulting Group, is currently seeking a Senior Data Scientist, in Chantilly, VA.

This position required a bachelor s degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math or equivalent and five to seven years of relevant work experience.

The Senior Data Scientist will be responsible for producing innovative solutions driven by exploratory data analysis from complex and high-dimensional datasets. And applying knowledge of statistics, machine learning, programming, data modeling, simulation, and advanced mathematics to recognize patterns, identify opportunities, pose business questions, and make valuable discoveries leading to prototype development and product improvement. He or she needs to be able to use a flexible, analytical approach to design, develop, and evaluate predictive models and advanced algorithms that lead to optimal value extraction from the data. You must have knowledge on generating and testing hypotheses and analyzing and interpreting the results of product experiments.

Previous experience using R, Matlab, Python Scikit-learn or other statistical modeling packages, with a focus on machine learning; experience with NLP is a plus. The ideal candidate will have experience in developing production systems for processing large volumes of structured and unstructured data in Java, Python or similar technology stack and Hadoop technology stack (Map reduce, HIVE/PIG, etc. Excellent verbal and written communication and being a strong team player, capable of working collaboratively is required.

This position falls within the DoD 8570 baseline of IAT II. You must have an active TS/SCI and a CompTIA Security +. A copy of your certificate(s) will be required before you can be submitted for the position.

Geodata IT values quality and has an eye for unrecognized talent. Specialized knowledge will be given consideration when evaluating the years of experience requirement. We love coworkers that can bring forward new ideas to move the GIS community forward.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin.

Required Security Clearance: Active TS/SCI with an appropriate agency Polygraph is required

U.S. Citizenship is required

Applicant Federal & E-Verify Postings

VEVRAA Federal Contractor",4.4,"FREEDOM CONSULTING GROUP
4.4","Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2004,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
175,Data Engineer,$49k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Senior Data science engineer, you will be part of a team of data science engineers who research and development design, test, and deployment of automated process, reports and data processing systems. Data science engineer team use their analytics skills to develop solutions for storing and retrieving information related to the processing, publication, and distribution of scientific data products You will help the team philosophy on software engineering and serves as a mentor for understanding the inner workings and the debugging of complex queries and workflows on parallel data processing systems.
The candidate will have a strong technical ability, excellent project management skills, great communication skills, and a motivation to achieve results in a fast-paced environment.

Responsibilities\*\*
Create and maintain the high-quality data set to serve as the source of truth for various fundamental data captured, and hence enabling data scientist to be more confident on their analysis, machine learning training and reporting.
Create and maintain blue print for data to integrate, centralize and maintain the data sources.
Implement data preparation solutions.
Implement, verify, design, and maintain software systems.
Ensure data integrity by leveraging proven methodologies, including data reconciliation, data integration and data audits.
Requirements*
MS in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, relevant certificates or work experience
6+ years of experience working with relational databases, data warehousing and advanced working SQL knowledge.
6+ years of successful history in manipulating, processing, and analysis of large datasets (million+ records) and comfortable analyzing datasets of 10+ million records
6+ years of experience with the following tools/concepts:
ETL process development tools, preferably SQL Server Integration Services (SSIS)
Object-oriented development
Software development lifecycle
4+ years of experience working with Data Visualization and Descriptive Statistics, preferably SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS) and/or Microsoft Power BI
4+ years of experience executing full software development life cycle.
Strong skills on identifying and resolving performance and data quality issues
Solid software engineering skills across multiple languages
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Passion for teaching and mentoring
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Desired Qualifications: *
Experience working with finance industry.
Experience with one or more of the following:
Python
Scala
Java
Informatica
Manipulating/handling data in JSON or XML formats
PL/SQL
Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Relational Databases: 6 years (Preferred)
Big Data Analytics: 6 years (Preferred)
Data Visualization: 6 years (Preferred)
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off
Flexible schedule
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Other
Company's website:
https://www.pragroup.com/",2.8,"PRA Group, Inc.
2.8","Richmond, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1996,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
176,Lead Networking Research Engineer,$110k-$167k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE’s Communications Network Engineering and Analysis Department, T861, which is part of MITRE’s Infrastructure and Networking Technical Center, has as its mission to provide premier communications network engineering services for our customers at all classification levels. Our core competencies are as follows:
Information Technology (IT) & Operational Technology (OT) Enterprise Networks
Commercial and Tactical Wireless Networks
Secure and High Availability Networking
Network Protocol Design & Development
Prototyping and Proof-of-Concept Implementations
Network Performance Monitoring and Management
Network Performance Analysis, Modeling, and Simulation
Our engineers have expertise in research, design, analysis, modeling and simulation, lab experimentation, field testing, and implementation of networks across a diverse set of networked communication environments including virtual, wired, and wireless. We are adept at combining networking research and innovation with practical hands-on experience to provide risk reduction and deployable solutions for our customers.

Our lab facilities in McLean, VA are equipped to meet the requirements of projects at any scale. The lab is furnished with state-of-the-art carrier grade LTE infrastructure, commercial routers and switches, accelerators, cryptographic devices, networking test equipment (e.g. Ixia, BreakingPoint), virtualization environments, network and data center management tools, IoT and ICS devices, military radios, modeling and simulation software and custom network emulation and wireless network planning products. There is an additional lab facility at the MITRE San Diego site with targeted capabilities and connectivity to the lab in McLean and other MITRE locations.

We are seeking a driven and experienced lead networking engineer with an applied research mindset and a balance of hands-on technical, project management and business development skills. The ideal candidate will have deep subject matter expertise in networking protocols and technologies with insights to understand and translate customer challenges into actionable, impactful outcomes in support of the customer’s mission. Once hired, the candidate will be expected to lead one or more large-scale, complex networking-related projects.

Key Functions:

Specific duties will vary by project but will generally include a combination of research, design, analysis, testing, experimentation, and/or modeling and simulation of to address complex questions regarding security, design, and performance of communications networks that are faced by MITRE’s customers.

As the government’s not-for-profit, trusted, unbiased advisor, MITRE performs advanced networking research that is very different from operational networking support. Our work does not involve administering, operating, troubleshooting, or otherwise maintaining a production network.

Example functions of technical leaders in our organization are below:
Perform systems engineering, design, analysis, and experimentation of networks.
Serve as a thought leader in advanced networking concepts through publication in technical journals, conferences, external exhibitions, standards bodies, panels, patent applications, etc.
Willingness to mentor early career staff, contributing to their development technically and professionally.
Develop technical research ideas and craft proposals for research initiatives.
Engage with customers to analyze operational requirements, address networking challenges, apply sound technology solutions, and advance the state of networking to benefit the sponsor mission.
Design and analyze complex networks to align with requirements.
Evaluate, validate, integrate, and design new protocols and technologies to meet sponsors missions.
Lead red-team efforts to uncover the root cause of performance issues in complex operational environments.
Rapid lab prototyping, field testing, technical benchmarking, and modeling and simulation.
Develop additional project opportunities to expand the technical work portfolio of the organization.
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree and 8+ years of experience in network research and engineering.
Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.
Required Qualifications:
Obtain and maintain a Secret level security clearance.
Deep understanding in the theory and implementation of network routing and transport protocols, systems, and standards with the ability to derive operational implications (implementation, interoperability, performance, security).
Knowledge of network security standards and architectures, including Multi-Level Security issues and solutions.
Demonstrated hands-on skills in a lab environment for rapid prototyping and testing.
Familiarity with network performance testing, measurement, and analysis techniques and tools.
Demonstrated thought leadership and customer engagement skills.
Excellent written and verbal communication and presentation skills.
Desire to grow and foster relationships and collaborative opportunities with academia and industry.
Passionate about staying up-to-date with emerging technologies through continued learning, active engagement with academia and industry, and a desire to remain hands-on.
Willingness to mentor early career staff, contributing to their development technically and professionally.
Preferred Qualifications:
MS or PhD in Computer Science or Electrical Engineering and 15+ years of experience in network research and engineering.
Active TS/SCI Clearance.
Experience in one or more of the following areas:
Tactical or commercial wireless protocols, networks, systems, and standards derivation of operational implications (implementation, interoperability, performance, security)
Industrial control systems (ICS) design, deployment, and operations, with emphasis in ICS communication protocols, architecture design, data management, and security.
Network time synchronization protocols, time-dependent applications, and precise measurement of time intervals.
Global Positioning System (GPS) fundamentals, synchronous networks, frequency standards, and counters.
Embedded system programming, including Linux kernel/module development, IP packet processing, or TCP/UDP/IP sockets programming.
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
177,Machine Learning Engineer,$68k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Crowe Data Science

Everything we do is about making the future of human work more purposeful. We do this by leveraging state-of-the-art machine learning, modern architectures, and industry experts, to create AI-powered software-as-a-service.

Our world-class Data Science professionals give Crowe the ability to capture and harness the power of data. A combination of data scientists and machine learning engineers create and deploy AI functionality into software to solve complex problems. This type of group, rarely seen anywhere except large tech companies, focuses on building scalable AI products, not just one-time insights. You will learn and build on a wide range of technologies – distinguishing Crowe in the market and driving the firm’s technology and innovation strategy.

The future is powered by AI, come build it with us!

About the Team

We believe machine learning is software. While our Data Scientists experiment in Jupyter notebooks, they are not the end of our machine learning pipelines. Our team uses modern frameworks and tools (git, Docker, Kubernetes) to engineer machine learning solutions.
We foster great Software Engineering. You are given the time and resources you need to shepherd software best practices in your project, and you will guide fellow machine learning engineers, data scientists and other Crowe staff through your work.
We want to make good engineers better. Engineers have plenty of options on the job market. We want to be one of the best ones. We have regular opportunities for team members to teach each other, support for conferences, and recurring reading groups. Moreover, our team offers generous PTO, a flexible work from home policy, and a strong commitment to work-life balance. Company-wide, Crowe routinely wins awards for our support of our staff, including our Fortune 100 Best Companies to Work for in 2019.

About the Role

We work on medium-term machine learning projects (4-8 months) with a high degree of autonomy.
We are not external facing. We harness the subject matter expertise of other Crowe teams to build machine learning products.
We architect and build complex distributed computing systems utilizing High Performance Computing (HPC) computing resources on-premise and in the cloud.
We design and implement efficient and scalable machine learning systems from data collection and training to deployment and real-time serving using Python
We write and review code for productionizing machine learning models from the RESTful API specification to deployment automation.

Docker practitioner. Demonstrable familiarity with containerized orchestration and virtualization frameworks. Experience with a Kubernetes package manager such as Helm a plus.
Linux experience. Configuring and troubleshooting Linux-based systems. You will be performing daily work with a Linux laptop.
Continuous Integration and Deployment. Implementing multi-stage CI/CD pipelines preferably in GitLab with automated deployments.
Cloud Computing familiarity. Experience with at least one Cloud Computing platform, experience with Microsoft Azure a plus.
Distributed Systems Know-How. Designing, deploying, and troubleshooting distributed systems
Networking chops. Strong networking knowledge (OSI network layers, working with proxies, API management)
Interface Savvy. Creating and interacting with RESTful HTTPS API's, websockets, and webhooks
Programming experience. Your job will require you to code - we write Python and Go, so experience in these languages is preferred. Python web framework experience is a plus.
DevOps experience. You enjoy DevOps. You've had some experience monitoring and maintaining mission critical systems and services with uptime requirements.
Qualifications

Scrappiness. You like to code and have interest in learning new technologies without significant outside direction. You aren't afraid to take a stab at firing up a proof-of-concept of an experimental piece of technology before it becomes widely used and documented. Using Docker and Kubernetes as regular parts of your workflow sounds exciting.
Lifelong Engineering. You want to stay fresh with regards to practicing engineering. Continuous improvement is a mantra for you as any system you work with gradually improves over time.
Strong communication skills. You can both dive deep in DevOps, software engineering and infrastructure related topics and explain concepts to a non-technical audience.
Capacity for autonomy. You won't have to hit the ground running on day one, but you will have to manage your time between staying on the cutting edge, debugging issues with existing deployments and current sprint deliverables.

Our Benefits:

At Crowe, we know that great people is what makes a great firm. We value our people and offer employees a comprehensive benefits package.

Learn more about what working at Crowe can mean for you.

How You Can Grow:

We will nurture your talent in an inclusive culture that values diversity. You will have the chance to meet on a consistent basis with your Career Coach that will guide you in your career goals and aspirations. Learn more about where talent can prosper.

More about Crowe:

Crowe (www.crowe.com) is one of the largest public accounting, consulting and technology firms in the United States. Crowe uses its deep industry expertise to provide audit services to public and private entities while also helping clients reach their goals with tax, advisory, risk and performance services. Crowe is recognized by many organizations as one of the country's best places to work. Crowe serves clients worldwide as an independent member of Crowe Global, one of the largest global accounting networks in the world. The network consists of more than 200 independent accounting and advisory services firms in more than 130 countries around the world.",3.8,"Crowe
3.8","Chicago, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1942,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
178,"Machine Learning Compiler Engineer, Staff",$132k-$221k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company:
Qualcomm Technologies, Inc.
Job Area:
Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Systems Engineering
Job Overview:


Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in.

Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G - ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in. We are investing in several supporting technologies including 4G, 5G, Edge Computing, and Deep Learning.

The Qualcomm CR&D team is developing hardware and software for Machine Learning solutions spanning the data center, edge, infrastructure, automotive markets and beyond. We are seeking ambitious, bright and innovative engineers with experience in compiler technology, vectorization and optimization, and machine learning toolchains.

Job activities span the whole product life cycle from early R&D to commercial deployment. The environment is fast-paced and requires cross-functional interaction on a daily basis so good communication, planning and execution skills are a must.

We are looking to staff engineers at multiple levels in systems & software, integration and test. Details of one of the roles we are looking to staff are listed below.

Responsibilities:
Research, design, develop, enhance, and implement the different components of machine learning compiler based on performance and code-size needs of the customer workloads and benchmarks.
Analyze software requirements, determine the feasibility of design within the given constraints, consult with architecture and HW engineers, and implement software solutions best suited for Qualcomm's SOCs.
Analyze and identify system level integration issues, interface with the software development, integration and test teams.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Engineering, Information Systems, Computer Science, or related field.
5+ years Systems Engineering or related work experience.
Preferred Qualifications
LLVM or any industrial strength compiler development experience is a plus.
Knowledge of the structure and function of the compiler internals.
Hands on experience writing SIMD and/or multi-threaded high-performance code
Hands-on experience implementing DSP Kernels a plus
Hands-on Experience in C/C++, Python development (3+ years)
Hands-on Experience with Object Orientated Design, TDD development solutions such as GoogleTest etc. (2+ years)
Experience with Source Code and Configuration management tools, git knowledge is required
Willingness to work in a cohesive software development environment with ability to work on low level implementation (code & test) and interfacing with hardware and simulators
Experience in machine learning frameworks and neural network architectures + ML compiler workload synthesis, a plus
Prior working experience of hardware accelerators and hardware software co-design
Experience in using C++ 14/17 (advanced features)
Experience at both the firmware (RTOS) and system level (Linux) in SOC
Experience of profiling software and optimization techniques
Passion to drive to develop leading-edge \""deep learning\"" framework and algorithms working on mobile and embedded platforms.
Applicants: If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, please call Qualcomm’s toll-free number found here for assistance. Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations, upon request, to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Qualcomm. Staffing and recruiting agencies and individuals being represented by an agency are not authorized to use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes, and any such submissions will be considered unsolicited. Qualcomm does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Qualcomm employees or any other company location. Qualcomm is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.

EEO Employer: Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer; all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or any other protected classification.",4.0,"Qualcomm
4.0","San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
179,Software Engineer/Developer – Transportation,$47k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"IAI is looking for a Software Engineer/Developer with experiences in AI/Machine Learning and/or transportation. The candidate will work in an agile and dynamic R&D environment that focuses on developing, improving and testing software code for transportation system management and operation applications. The candidate will support (and/or lead) the development, integration, and testing of software in the areas of traffic data analysis, video/time-series data processing.

Job Duties

Develop and implement software code for signals, image/video and text data analysis
Design, develop and integrate web services to support existing software applications
Contribute and implement the architecture and framework for cloud-based data analytics
Design, enhance, and maintain existing software and perform upgrades to existing live production software applications
Support monitoring of deployed services and applications

Qualifications:

Proficiency in Java programming language
Experience building and maintaining web applications and services.
Familiarity with HTML5/CSS, Bootstrap.
Familiarity with SQL and querying relational databases
Familiarity with Linux and basic shell commands
Proficiency in software tools such as Jira and Git.

Desired Skills/Experience

Proficiency in C/C++ programming languages.
Proficiency in Python programming languages.
Experience with Grails3 and any variant of Spring Framework (Core, Boot, MVC).
Experience with JavaScript and frontend JavaScript libraries and frameworks (i.e., JQuery, Angular, Vue, React).
Familiarity with Android mobile application development.
Familiarity with Windows desktop application development.

Education

A bachelor's degree (or higher) in Computer Science, Software Engineering, Civil Engineering or related field.

About IAI
IAI is a technology innovation company specializing in providing advanced technology solutions and R&D services to federal agencies and corporations. IAI leverages agile R&D processes, a multi-disciplinary collaborative environment, and its substantial intellectual property portfolio to excel in developing concepts into market-focused products and customer-driven solutions. IAI’s core R&D areas include: AI & Advanced Computing; Autonomy & Robotics; Healthcare Research Technologies; Modeling, Simulation & Visualization; and Networks & Cyber Security; and Radar, Communications & Sensors. For more information about IAI please visit www.i-a-i.com.

US Citizenship or Permanent Residency required

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status.

Requisition ID: 1167",3.6,"Intelligent Automation
3.6","Rockville, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1987,Company - Private,"Health, Beauty, & Fitness",Consumer Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
180,Lead Back End Engineer,$107k-$161k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Alteryx


Alteryx develops software for data preparation and analysis, including a number of server solutions for model deployment, collaborative work on data, and scheduling of automatic data processing. We're revolutionizing data analytics by providing a complete end to end, self-service platform that allows users to get from business questions to business answers at incredible speeds.

Why work for just any analytics company? At Alteryx, we are explorers, dreamers and innovators. We're on a journey to build the best analytics platform in the world, but we can't do it without people like you leading the way. We want Alteryx to be recognized as much for our dynamic work culture as for our products.

About Alteryx Innovation Labs


The Innovation Labs office, Alteryx's first office presence in Boston, was started earlier this year by the acquisition of MIT-spinout Feature Labs. This rapidly growing team combines the excitement of being part of a fast-paced, innovative startup with the resources, market penetration, and wisdom of a data analytics market leader. Our goal is to turbo-charge machine learning and data science efforts on the Alteryx platform, and to enable anyone to solve dynamic problems. We are working on high-impact, high-visibility projects, and we’re looking for collaborative and knowledge-hungry teammates who want to join us as we work to democratize machine learning.

Overview


As a Lead Back End Engineer you will you will lead the Innovation Labs’ back end development efforts on a new web-based data science product (sorry we can’t say much yet on what it is publicly, but we promise it’s great!). In this role, you will have the opportunity to problem solve, drive projects to success, communicate with stakeholders, and learn from both success and failures as part of a dynamic, friendly and ambitious team with technical influence throughout Alteryx and beyond.

Responsibilities
Work closely with Engineering Leadership to architect, design and develop the back end services, APIs and infrastructure to power this new application
Design and develop and deploy a robust data processing and ML API platform
Help to recruit, scale and mentor the back end engineering team
Define and promote a culture of rigorous software development practice and high quality standards
Work closely with Product and Front End counterparts to drive the product to completion
***The company will not provide sponsorship for work visas or other employment authorization for this position***
Requirements
7+ years of experience in building large scale web applications, ideally into a B2B and/or enterprise environment
3+ years in a Technical Leadership capacity
Experience writing production-quality code in a modern web framework/technology (Python, Node, Go, Scala, etc)
Experience writing clear and effective documentation
Experience in docker-based infrastructure on AWS (or another cloud provider).
Experience with automated testing and CI/CD platforms and tools like CircleCI, Selenium, etc.
Track record of sharing knowledge with team members through mentoring, code reviews, pair programming, and presentations.
Experience working with Product, Design, DevOps and other departments in a cross-functional way.
Bonus
Experience with Java/Scala and/or Python.
Startup experience (building products from 0→1 and 1->10).
Contributions to open-source frameworks and/or libraries.
Experience in ML/AI/Data Science python environment (sklearn/etc.)
Perks
100% company-paid medical, dental, and vision for associates
Health plans that cover your family and pets
Company matched 401(k)
Associate stock purchase plan
Paid time off: 3 weeks’ vacation, 5 sick days, 9 holidays, 3 floating holidays, and 20 hours volunteer time
100% paid parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Wellness programs with up to $300 fitness reimbursement annually
Collaborative offices stocked with healthy snacks and drinks
Office events, catered lunches, and happy hours
#LI-JE1",3.6,"Alteryx
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
181,Data Scientist (Remote Work Option),$64k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Relocation Assistance Offered Within Country
# 88040 - Topeka, Kansas, United States

Job Summary:

We are looking for a Data Scientist who will support our cross-functional teams with insights gained from analyzing company data. The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for product and process optimization and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. They must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. They must have a proven ability to drive business results with their data-based insights. They must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams. The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

Main Responsibilities:

Develop custom data models and algorithms to address business challenges
Assess quality of data sources
Evaluate technical feasibility of business problems
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy
Lead data automation projects to aggregate disparate data sources
Partner with IT to align on data architecture, tools and technologies

Main Requirements:

Bachelor's degree required; Certificate, Master’s or PHD in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field a plus
At least 2 years experience using computer languages (Python, R, SQL, etc.) to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Experience communicating technical concepts to non-technical audiences
Experience with a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications.
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques.
Experience working with and creating data architectures
Experience with cloud services: GCP, AWS, etc
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers: Google Analytics, Facebook Insights, Nielsen, etc.
Experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, etc.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using: Tableau, Data Studio, etc

Equal Opportunity Employer
Colgate is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, ethnicity, age, disability, marital status, veteran status (United States positions), or any other characteristic protected by law

Are you interested in working for Hill's Pet Nutrition? You can apply online and attach all relevant documents such as a cover letter and resume or CV. Applications received by e-mail are not considered in the selection process. Become part of our team. We look forward to your application.

Work that matters, fueled by passion for pets! At Hill’s we have a purpose. Every day around the world, we transform the lives of millions of pet families through pioneering innovation, amazing nutrition, and the best and brightest people. Founded more than 75 years ago with an unwavering commitment to pet nutrition, Hills' mission is to help enrich and lengthen the special relationships between people and their pets.

HILL'S® Prescription Diet® therapeutic pet foods, HILL'S® Science Diet® and HILL'S® Ideal Balance™ wellness pet foods are sold worldwide. Hill’s is a division of Colgate-Palmolive, a leading global consumer products company, tightly focused on Oral Care, Personal Care, Home Care and Pet Nutrition, with sales of products in more than 200 countries. To learn more about Hill's and Colgate, please visit http://www.hillspet.com and http://www.colgatepalmolive.com, or find us on LinkedIn, Facebook, Twitter and YouTube.

Reasonable accommodation during the application process is available for persons with disabilities. Please contact Application_Accommodation@colpal.com with the subject ""Accommodation Request"" should you require accommodation.",4.1,"Hill's Pet Nutrition
4.1","Topeka, KS",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1907,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
182,Senior Data and Software Engineer,$108k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description: Senior Data and Software Engineer
Location: San Jose, CA
Department: Data Engineering
Hours/Shift: Full Time
Reports To: VP, Data Engineering

Job Description:
Affinity Solutions is looking for a self-motivated Senior Data and Software Engineer to lead the design and development of our big data infrastructure, that is secure, scalable, highly performant, and able to handle diverse data sets, leveraging latest technologies such as Hadoop and Spark, both on-premise and in the cloud. This position requires lot of experience in designing and building data pipelines, data services, data warehouses, business intelligence and machine learning platforms, especially around unified consumer behavioral and profile data.
The ideal candidate is a passionate and highly skilled individual, who can utilize programming and analytics tools/technologies such as SQL/NoSQL, Python, and Tableau to process large data sets to produce high quality customer facing data deliverables and insights. If you have experience designing and building business intelligence/analytics applications, especially around credit/debit card transactions, unified consumer behavioral and profile data, and excited about leveraging your experience to catapult a venture-backed company into hyper-growth, this job is for you.
Responsibilities:
Build, automate and manage data ingestion pipelines for master data management, deep-learning, and predictive analytics
Build and maintain big data environments that are highly secure, scalable, flexible, and performant using appropriate SQL, NoSQL and NewSQL technologies.
Lead data governance and data profiling efforts to ensure data quality and proper meta data documentation for data lineage.
Enhance and modernize platform for precision marketing decision engine based on predictive analytics/machine learning.
Provide technical input into build/buy/partner decisions for all components of the data infrastructure.
Collaborate with diverse technical and non-technical teams located across multiple time-zones on client deliverables and technical support
Participate-in and contribute to design and code reviews
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science or related field such as Mathematics and Statistics, preferably with focus on Data Analytics.
5+ years of experience in data integration / data engineering
5+ years of experience in data modeling and architecture
3+ years of experience with building data pipelines and analytics data marts on MPP databases such as RedShift, BigQuery
3+ years of experience working on cloud platforms such as AWS or GCP
3+ years of experience programming in Apache Spark, Hadoop, and python
Experience working on UNIX / Linux development and production environments
Experience working in Agile software development environments
Knowledge of data science / machine learning is a plus
Very strong written and verbal communication skills
Ability to manage multiple conflicting priorities, take proactive ownership of problems and outcomes, think outside the box",3.2,"Affinity Solutions
3.2","San Jose, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
183,"Senior Software Engineer, Machine Learning and Intelligence",$144k-$180k (Glassdoor Est.),"Design. Disrupt. Repeat.
Be an agent of change on a team committed to achieving client-focused, mission-driven excellence. Steampunk is looking for an experienced RPA Architect Developer with an appetite for taking on new challenges.
Who We Are
Steampunk is the explosive collision of human-centered design and traditional government contracting. An employee-owned company with a startup mindset and time-tested approaches tailored for the federal government, we’re passionate about creating solutions that are impactful, practical, scalable, and most importantly, that meet our clients’ ever-changing needs.
At Steampunk, we believe in disrupting the status quo and setting the pace in the ecosystem of government contractors, while repurposing tried-and-true methodologies. We believe in empowering our people to find creative solutions to intractable problems. We believe the best environment in which to grow and thrive is outside our comfort zone.
While good design makes for a good product, we believe human-centered design makes for an excellent one.
We also believe effective teams are powered by diverse perspectives, backgrounds, and experiences. To that end, Steampunk is an equal opportunity employer committed to promoting diversity of race, gender, sexual orientation, religion, ethnicity, national origin, disability status, and protected veteran status, amongst our ranks. Additionally, we participate in the E-Verify program.
Why Steampunk?
Our people are the very core of what we do; their expertise and hunger for new and exciting challenges fuel our relentless pursuit of mission success. As part of our team of “Punks,” you’ll test the status quo, explore new boundaries, and set the bar high for how government clients expect to engage with contractors.
Because we value our employees’ work/life balance (and believe those who work hard deserve to play hard), we offer a very competitive benefits package, including telework/flex scheduling, health/dental with orthodontics/vision insurance upon hire, paid time off with a sell-back benefit and carryover option, 11 Federal Holidays, 100% paid military leave, 100% 401(k) plan match upon hire, professional development/education reimbursement, all flexible spending accounts, and more

As an RPA/Automation Developer, you will work with Technical/Solutions Architects and Developers to translate business requirements into well‐architected solutions that best leverage the RPA platforms. Develop, test, document and maintain solutions, integrations, and data migration elements of a RPA implementation using RPA Platforms. Execute test plans to ensure quality delivery using test code and unit tests. Follow coding standards and participate in code reviews during projects to ensure appropriate design patterns are followed. You will work on mission apps across a broader team of cross-functional resources. You will partner with product managers and own the development aspects of an engagement.
We need someone who is passionate about RPA to:
Be the lead technical architect for RPA solutions
Lead the development team to ensure quality and timely delivery of projects by working closely with the development team and project manager
Work with process subject matter experts (SMEs) to understand key process requirements and document the current state by leveraging existing documentation, conducting interviews and observations
Support the creation of process maps and designs work collaboratively with a RPA development team for automation of processes, and support the development team as needed to ensure successful deployment
Mapping the as-is process and translating the process into automated steps
Working with stakeholders to define the manual rules used today to govern the process and then translating those rules into automated commands
Configuring, testing and deploying the automation with integration to internal and external data bases
Monitoring and measuring the effectiveness of the bots to report on impact of the solution
Develop RPA client solutions focusing on scalability and extensibility
Work with the Product Owners and Business Analysts to execute project plans for implementation projects Work with the RPA Architect and Operations team to execute deployment plans
Have exposure to wide variety of technology problems and their solutions and use that to drive the adoption of best practices around coding, design, quality, and performance in the team
Working with a dynamic team to refine and expand the automation based upon users feedback

5 Years proven experience in Robotic Process Automations (RPA) (such as UIPath, Automation Anywhere, and/or BluePrism)
Proven experience in programming (.NET, Java, ETL etc.) with a specific focus on developing Bots
Demonstrated expertise with multiple full life cycle analytics or systems integration engagements across strategy, design and implementation.
Bachelor s degree in technology, engineering and computer science relevant field
RPA Developer certification, desired; related or equivalent certifications acceptable
Experience leading the configuration, development, testing and deployment of automation solutions
Experience with Agile project delivery methods, tools, and concepts
Work with a cross functional team to tackle complex challenges
Help maintain quality and organization of platform code and data
Communicate effectively with clients and team members
BA/BS degree from an accredited college/university
Breadth of experience in software design/development and database architecture
Ability to communicate effectively with a diverse set of customers or partners across multiple disciplines

Steampunk is a Change Agent in the Federal contracting industry, bringing new thinking to clients in the Homeland, Federal Civilian, Health and DoD sectors. Through our Human-Centered delivery methodology, we are fundamentally changing the expectations our Federal clients have for true shared accountability in solving their toughest mission challenges. As an employee owned company, we focus on investing in our employees to enable them to do the greatest work of their careers – and rewarding them for outstanding contributions to our growth. If you want to learn more about our story, visit http://www.steampunk.com.
We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Steampunk participates in the E-Verify program.",4.6,"steampunk
4.6","McLean, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2003,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
184,"Sr. Engineer, Cloud Security Operations",$98k-$194k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Us

Automation Anywhere is a global leader in Robotic Process Automation (RPA), empowering customers to automate end-to-end business processes with software bots – digital workers that perform repetitive and manual tasks, resulting in dramatic productivity gains, optimized customer experience and more engaged employees. The company offers the world’s only web-based and cloud-native intelligent automation platform combining RPA, artificial intelligence, machine learning, and analytics right out of the box, to help organizations rapidly start and scale their process automation journey. Its Bot Store is the world's first and largest marketplace with more than 850 pre-built, intelligent automation solutions. With offices in more than 40 countries and a global network of 1,900 partners, Automation Anywhere has deployed over 2.1 million bots to support some of the world’s largest enterprises across all industries. For additional information, visit www.automationanywhere.com.

Overview

We are currently seeking a Sr. Security Operations Engineer for our Cloud Ops Engineering team. As part of this dynamic group, you will help design, build, deploy, operate and monitor the company cloud security and compliance capabilities. You will report to the Director, Cloud Security and will be a key member of our team to help shape the future of our business.

Primary Duties
Provide recommendations and ongoing feedback for tools and other new technologies to support business objectives
Collaborate with cloud support, engineering, corporate IT and security to enhance, improve, or modify enterprise and cloud based security detection and response
Update, modify, and enhance existing processes and tools in use within Cloud Security
Analyze and correlate log data for security events
Develop and share documentation on business-critical processes and procedures
Regularly view and verify existing metrics to ensure accuracy and quality
Escalation point for junior engineers to provide insight into security findings
Support ongoing compliance and audit activities
Minimum Qualifications
2-4 years' experience working in a SOC or NOC environment
Experience with scripting/coding (REGEX search strings, bash scripting, Python parsing)
Experience with vulnerability, change, and asset management
Excellent task prioritization and time management skills
Experience with SOC2, FedRAMP, or other industry certification standards
Experience with Linux/UNIX systems and the best practices for deploying applications to those stacks
Experience with networking and core Internet protocols (e.g. TCP/IP, DNS, SMTP, HTTP, and distributed networks)
Experience with Incident Response and break-fix scenarios
Experience or interest in digital forensics or threat hunting
Knowledge of SIEM solutions (monitoring, alerting, and configuring)
Solid skills of cloud solutions and security best practices for operating in the cloud
Strong knowledge of industry standards, vulnerability classifications, and attack vectors
Knowledge of MITRE ATT&CK Framework and Cyber Kill Chain; how they pertain to cloud and web applications
Experience working effectively with global teams in multiple time zones
Preferred Qualifications
Superb communication and presentation skills
Agility and willingness to deal with a high level of ambiguity, change, and pressures of high-profile incidents
Flexibility—willingness to pitch in where needed across program and team
Strong leadership, influence, and teamwork skills; sound problem resolution, judgment, negotiating, and decision-making skills
Why Automation Anywhere?

At our company each person brings their unique talents to work as a team and make a difference. As the leader in Robotic Process Automation (RPA), we provide a very compelling product where our teams are breaking new ground every day and given an environment to grow their skills and have fun along the way. Our technology is the game changer, and our people give us the edge to better our world and go be great!

Automation Anywhere is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, national origin, genetic information, age, disability, veteran status, or any other legally protected basis.

#LI-JS1",2.9,"Automation Anywhere
2.9","San Jose, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
185,Communications Research Engineer,$80k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you have experience with researching communications and networking engineering?Are you passionate about using innovation and technology to solve technical challenges involving the defense of the US?If so, this is the perfect opportunity for you.As a Communications Research Engineer, you will...Conduct communication and networking systems engineering research activities in support of Cyber Operations, Special Operations, and Homeland Protection Business Areas. Communication systems include wired and wireless line-of-sight and satellite communications systems and networks.Contribute to the research and development of potential future concepts and technological solutions to advance global connectivity. Advance and apply new technologies to enable evolution of existing communication and networking systems to higher data rates, increased resilience, and greater interoperability.Support the development of modeling and simulation (M&S) tools and conduct analyses to evaluate the performance of specific communication and networking systems.Conduct communication and networking systems engineering activities, including system requirements, architecture, design, test, and evaluation.You meet the minimum qualifications for this position if you have:PhD in electrical engineering, computer engineering, computer science, physical sciences, mathematics, or related technical discipline.1 years experience in communications and network systems engineering.Demonstrated strong teamwork and interpersonal skills.Ability to work independently.Excellent oral and written communications skills.Able to do some local travel to sponsor sites may be required.Ability to obtain a Secret Clearance. If selected, you will be subject to a government security clearance investigation and must meet the requirements for access to classified information. Eligibility requirements include U.S. citizenship.You’ll go above and beyond our minimum requirements if you have:PhD in electrical engineering, computer engineering, or computer science.5 years experience in commercial and/or government communication and network systems engineering.Recent knowledge of DoD and/or intelligence community, sponsors, and programs.Current TS/SCI w/ Poly clearance.Why work at APL?The Johns Hopkins University Applied Physics Laboratory (APL) brings world-class expertise to our nation’s most critical defense, security, space and science challenges. While we are dedicated to solving complex challenges and pioneering new technologies, what makes us truly outstanding is our culture. We offer a vibrant, welcoming atmosphere where you can bring your authentic self to work, continue to grow, and build strong connections with inspiring teammates.At APL, we celebrate our differences and encourage creativity and bold, new ideas. Our employees enjoy generous benefits, including a robust education assistance program, unparalleled retirement contributions, and a healthy work/life balance. APL’s campus is located in the Baltimore-Washington metro area. Learn more about our career opportunities atwww.jhuapl.edu/careers.",4.6,"Johns Hopkins Applied Physics Laboratory (APL)
4.6","Laurel, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1942,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
186,Controls Engineer,-1,"Controls Engineer with controls design, programming, and troubleshooting. Experience in material handling, automation, machine design and complex data collection. Outstanding reputation as a person who never fails to achieve the objectives. An honest and dedicated team player with strong work ethic.

RESPONSIBILITIES
Design and develop control panels and manufacturing equipment
Design electrical and control wiring schematics
Design control logic and systems
PLC programming with a strong knowledge of ladder logic
HMI design and programming
Establish and support updates of controls standards
Perform debug and buyoff of controls functions and systems
Ability to write code from scratch
POSITION REQUIREMENTS
3-5 Years of experience
Material handling, automation, machine design or complex data collection experience
PLC programming and development: Allen Bradley and Siemens
Schematic and hardware design
25-30% Travel -Domestic and International. Valid Passport required.
PREFERRED EXPERIENCE
Toyopuc experience highly preferred. Must be willing to learn
RS Logix 5, RS Logix 500, RS Logix 5000, RSView, Panelbuilder
Robotics Fanuc
AutoCAD
Ethernet IP
EPLAN
BENEFITS

We offer our team members a comprehensive employment package that includes:
Career growth opportunities
Competitive wage(s)
Performance based bonus eligibility
401(k) plan w/company match
Paid sick time
Paid vacation time
Medical insurance (shared cost)
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Company paid life insurance and AD&D insurance
Optional life insurance
Optional long-term disability insurance
Social activities
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.interclean.com/
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"Oakland Automation
4.0","Ypsilanti, MI",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
187,Senior Data Scientist (Remote),$82k-$141k (Glassdoor Est.),TMP advertising products is seeking a Sr. Data Scientist to support its efforts in building a leading performance media platform for recruitment.,3.5,"TMP Worldwide
3.5","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
188,Senior Python Software Engineer (Data),-1,"Our mission is to power the future of fan engagement.

Simplebet is a B2B product development company using machine learning and real-time technology to make every moment of every sporting event a betting opportunity.

We are looking to hire a Senior Data Engineer to join the SimpleBet team to expand our data and machine learning platform. This includes building ETL pipelines, relational databases for our applications, and streaming realtime data into analytics applications and a data lake. You will be responsible for fetching, organizing, manipulating, and maintaining all of our data in order to optimize machine learning research, product analytics, and streaming data products for our machine learning and customer use cases.
Responsibilities
Build robust and reliable ETL pipelines with best practices and data governance in mind using Apache Airflow, Databricks, Kafka, and PostgreSQL.
Organize raw sports data from a variety of sources into a cohesive, centralized data warehouse.
Design and build our real-time streaming data infrastructure and products.
Write software to optimize machine learning research and production implementations of machine learning models
What will you be doing
In the first month, you will get acquainted with SimpleBet, how data flows through our systems, and begin contributing to our ETL pipeline and data management systems.
In the second month, you will be a contributor in building out a brand new data pipeline to handle user event data with technologies such as Spark, Kafka, and Apache Airflow.
From the third month onwards, you will continue to take ownership of our data platform, continuing to build and iterate to meet product needs and optimize.
Requirements
3+ years of data-oriented software development experience building data backends
Strong understanding of database and data lake design
Experience with languages including Python, Scala, or similar
Experience building and maintaining web services in production using a modern framework like Django, Flask, or FastAPI
Bachelor's degree or Master's degree from an accredited university or college in computer science or related field
Bonus points for
Experience with Databricks, Spark, Kafka, AWS, Kubernetes, Celery
Experience working on Data Science / Machine Learning projects
Simplebet is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics.

We are committed to providing access, equal opportunity and reasonable accommodation for individuals with disabilities in employment, its services, programs, and activities. Please let us know if you require reasonable accommodation for the interview process, and we will make every effort to provide it.",2.2,"Simplebet
2.2","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
189,Systems Engineer,$32k-$69k (Glassdoor Est.),"OVERVIEW

As a Systems Engineer you will be responsible for building out and maintaining infrastructure for merchant sites, collaborative research and development of automated tooling and infrastructure design practices, providing application engineering with expert level support, monitoring and responding to emergency support issues on client systems (including off-hours) and providing systems, infrastructure and security consultation directly to our clients.

Classy Llama has an agile work environment where you will be part of a team serving our clients together. We focus on learning through experimentation and seek consistent improvement and growth, and building each other up through encouragement and clear feedback.

It is expected that you will be passion driven, have an ever increasing love for embracing technology and seeing our clients and those that surround you succeed. We love working together and are united around what matters. We love to learn, and to share that learning amongst our team. It is your goal to see all of this happen! If you have never worked with Magento before, consider this a challenge to sharpen your skills as an individual, all the while serving others and passionately pursuing what you love doing.

Primary Responsibilities:


Participate in design and implementation of infrastructure systems serving the online retail sector
Provide reviews, audits and system feedback on pre-existing infrastructure of incoming clientele
Client conversations around technical recommendations and planned deliverables
Performance and site reliability engineering and consulting with the application engineering team
Improvement of and use of automated tooling to build systems
Design of security, backup and redundancy strategies
Work with Project Manager to communicate technical dependencies
Requirements
5+ years of experience in systems or infrastructure engineering and IT support
5+ years of experience programming in PHP 5, PHP 7, Java or another similar language
5+ years of MySQL or other relational database experience
Proven experience with the installation of Linux based environments, preferably CentOS / RHEL 7/8
Solid administrative experience implementing and tuning application stack components such as Nginx, PHP-FPM, MySQL/MariaDB, ElasticSearch, Varnish, Redis, etc
Experience working with a version control system such as Git
Experience with automation software (ansible, terraform, capistrano, bash)
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Strong personal leadership ability
Ability to work well in a team development environment
Passionate about technology with a sharp attention to detail
Ability to learn rapidly via hands-on experience with new systems and software
Proven experience functioning in a technology environment with a relatively high degree of autonomy
Desired Skills, Abilities and Characteristics
Proficiency with macOS (primary work environment) and Linux (primary server environment)
Good fundamental understanding of virtualization and container machine management
Good fundamental understanding of cloud systems such as AWS, GCP and OpenStack
Good fundamental understanding of hardware systems such as load balancers, firewalls
Good fundamental understanding of HTTP/HTTPS protocols, certificate, and key management
Good fundamental understanding of web page structure HTML/CSS/JS
Good fundamental understanding of IPv4 and IPv6 networks
Familiarity with encryption types, hash functions, and common algorithms used
Familiarity with Hypervisors such as VirtualBox and use of Vagrant with it
Familiarity with automation load testing tools such as JMeter

Why its Awesome Being a Llama
Teammates and leaders that connect with and empower you
Unlimited Coffee and (mostly) healthy snacks
Full transparency from all levels of leadership
Personal Development Library
Llama Birthday lunches
Monthly team lunches
Ping Pong table and Oculus VR and the occasional appearance of retro gaming systems
Creative Commons area with comfy chairs and couches
BENEFITS & PERKS

Insurance: We offer excellent group health insurance plans for you and your family, as well as life, dental, and vision insurance options.

Fitness: We encourage all of our Llamas to take care of themselves both inside and outside of the office by reimbursing up to $25 per month for gym/fitness memberships.

Food: Llamas love food. So naturally, we have food-related perks. We have built relationships with several local farmers and bakers that provide fresh, locally-produced milk, meat, and sourdough bread (Its incredible!) delivered right to the office.

Gadgetry: We provide our Llamas with MacBook Pros for both in-office and home use. If youd like, we also provide convertible standing desks. Dont want the gadgetry perk to stop there? We also are able to extend our discounts at the Apple Store and Staples to our Citizens.

Financial: We also offer a 401k savings plan.
About Classy Llama


Why do we exist?

We cultivate powerful, caring people who drive value for those around us.

How do we behave?
We are loving people who operate with courageous integrity and passionate ownership.

What do we do?
We build, maintain, and grow eCommerce solutions for our clients.

Classy Llama is an agency of a different breed. Despite our playful name, we could not be more serious about the level of integrity, excellence, and commitment we bring to our clients. Our passion is to help merchants leverage technology to sustainably grow and build their business. We serve our clients through digital commerce consulting, marketing, design, development, and support. With over 125 commerce sites and 400+ customizations and integrations under our belt, our team of commerce veterans has what it takes to create great digital experiences.",4.9,"Classy Llama
4.9","Springfield, MO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
190,Cloud DevOps Engineer (Active TS SCI),-1,"Volume Integration, LLC partners with our customers to deliver leading edge ""Big Data"" analytics solutions.

By leveraging our teams' extensive experience in cloud capabilities and emerging technologies, we design and deploy custom solutions to unique and evolving challenges. Volume employees and their families are our number one priority, while also ensuring our customer's mission and success remain the primary focus and objective.

If you are a motivated individual willing to tackle challenging, and interesting problems in cyber security, big data, and machine learning, come be a part of our dynamic team!

Job Description

Volume Integration is seeking a highly motivated, self-directed professional to fill the role of Cloud DevOps Engineer. The candidate must have a minimum clearance of active TS SCI.

The individual will serve as the technical lead to guide the project efforts for cloud DevOps configuration, automation, and deployment. The effort will include analysis of the current system configuration as well as documentation for optimization and future architectures.

The individual will participate in the setup, maintenance, and deployment of cloud system resources and services. This includes providing requirement inputs and traceability from applicable software requirements, architecture diagrams, and conceptual operations. Maintenance activities will include monitoring resources for utilization and cost performance.

The individual will assist in testing updates and addressing issues as identified by the end users of the operational deployments.

The individual will provide summary reports, progress, and status of system architecture milestones and be able to communicate to senior leadership risks and opportunities that need to be addressed.

The ideal candidate will have:
Experience acting in an advisory role interpreting cloud system architectures and communicating recommendations
Demonstrated ability to convey technical information to non-technical individuals via formal and informal briefings and technical exchange meetings
Strong knowledge of cloud automation, configuration control, and deployment
Experience preparing system documentation and architecture plans
Experience with writing and deploying cloud framework automation as part of the DevOps environment
Required Skills:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or Information Systems with at least 8-12 years of work experience; or a combination of related work experience, technical training, and professional certifications.
Practical experience with designing, developing and testing complex software systems in a cloud environment
Active TS SCI clearance
Desired Qualifications:
Demonstrated experience with Java, Python, and one or more of Bash, JavaScript, PowerShell, Bash, React, Vue, XML, etc Cloud Identity and Access Management configuration experience
Exposure to relational, NoSQL and/or file-based storage (e.g. MySQL, MongoDB, Cassandra, Oracle, Postgres, etc.).
Amazon Web Services (AWS) DevOps Professional certification or Microsoft Certified: DevOps Engineer Expert (Other cloud certifications are also beneficial)
Active TS SCI with Polygraph desired
Location:
Chantilly, VA

Many Volume positions require an active (or ability to obtain) U.S. Security Clearance, for which the US Government requires US Citizenship. Volume Integration, LLC. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or other characteristics protected by law.",4.4,"Volume Integration, LLC
4.4","Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
191,Cyber Research Engineer I,-1,"In BBN Technologies' Network and Cyber Technology group, we deliver creative solutions for our government customers' critical cyber and security problems.

Location: Columbia, Maryland

We are looking for creative, entrepreneurial, and highly motivated cyber research scientists who want to create, contribute to, and grow cutting-edge research projects, such as:

• Analyze systems to understand how they work and what happens when they break
• Develop new and advanced security techniques in embedded and traditional systems
• Create or investigate new types of cyber physical systems
• Investigate the Internet of Things
• Implement unique mission applications for software-defined radios
• Devise creative ways to collect, analyze, and interpret large multi-dimensional data sets
• Create innovative solutions using consumer electronics
• Develop next-generation capabilities for privacy/anonymity and identity control
• Disassemble and analyze a complex embedded system
• Define and lead the growth of new research areas

Although the work changes from one project to the next, its always challenging, and it always makes a difference. Projects at BBN are generally short in nature, usually between 6 to 18 months in length, though some are longer, and consist of small teams requiring close interaction with customers and other team members.

Required Skills
• Demonstrated passion for technology
• Proven experience designing, developing, modifying, and debugging sophisticated (or novel), software systems or prototypes
• Experience leading technical teams or project efforts, as well as working as part of a team
• Solid, creative programming skills using C/C++, Java, Python, or equivalent languages
• Strong written and oral communication skills
• Position may require some amount of overnight travel.
• Ability to obtain a security clearance.

Desired Skills
• Building software for embedded devices and consumer electronics (e.g., ARM, Arduino/Raspberry Pi, Linux, Windows OS, Android, iOS)
• Understanding of OS internals (e.g., Windows, Linux, MacOS, Android)
• Experience with disassemblers (e.g., IDA pro)
• Experience using debuggers such as gdb or WinDbg
• Understanding how to create, operate, and defeat advanced security techniques in embedded and traditional systems
• Understanding binary or systems reverse engineering
• Cyber network operations (CNO) experience
• TCP/IP and Internet security protocols (e.g. TLS/SSL)
• TCP/IP network configuration fundamentals (e.g. iptables, firewalls)
• TCP/IP network traffic analysis (e.g. tcpdump, wireshark, packet analysis)
• Digital and binary forensics
• Experience applying the scientific method to challenging mission problems
• Advanced wired and wireless networking (mesh, IPv6, isolation, SDN, kernel filters)
• Experience writing proposals and obtaining R&D funding
• Active DoD security clearance a plus

Required Education
• Recent MS or BS with 2+ years of relevant work experience. Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or other relevant technical field required.

This position requires a U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization. 162052

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Columbia, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
192,Data Scientist,-1,"The emerging next-generation pharmaceutical supply chain is characterized by the orchestration of collaborating, networked stakeholders working to the common goal of delivering pharmaceutical products to patients on-time and in-full. TraceLink is leading that transformation by leveraging the benefits of big data and cloud technologies realized through advanced algorithms, data science, and analytics. We are extending our core data science team that is responsible for delivering innovative data science solutions to our customers. The ideal candidate is an experienced data science innovator capable of methodically producing performant solutions subject to business constraints. Experience that extends back into data engineering and data collection and forward into product realization within a cloud environment is highly desirable.

Collaboratively identify data science opportunities that support business and product goals
Propose, develop, evaluate, and perfect specific data science solutions
Modify solutions to address application constraints
Integrate modified solutions into cloud-based product offerings
Communicate results and ideas to business leaders

Requirements:
Master's Degree in Applied Mathematics, Data Science, or related field
Analytical, data-driven, inquisitive mindset with a bias toward precision
Superb written and oral technical communication skills
Learn quickly especially within computer technologies and mathematical concepts
Proficiency in mathematics, statistical analysis, and software development
Proficiency in data science environments, tools, and technologies
Broad knowledge of data science techniques
Ability to distinguish applicability of alternatives
Understanding of the relative performance of competing techniques
Develop, evaluate, perfect, and implement data science solutions
Clean, enhance, profile, and mine structured and unstructured data
Identify and integrate data repositories from internal and external sources
Optimize and test estimators
Perform experimental analysis and validate results
Communicate trustworthy and objective results
Implement analytical models into production by collaborating with software developers and machine learning engineers.
Valuable Additional Skills and Experience
PhD in Applied Mathematics or similar field
Formal training in data science or related disciplines such as mathematics, engineering, or computer science
Experience with big data cloud technologies especially Amazon offerings
Experience with software engineering tools and processes (agile software development)
Proficiency with MSOffice and Google G Suite tools
Experience with Java, Scala, javascript, SQL, Python, R, XML, yaml, JSON, shell scripting
Proficiency with applied mathematics such as probability and statistics, stochastic systems, queueing theory, optimization, control theory, and adaptive systems.",3.9,"TraceLink,Inc.
3.9",Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
193,Software Engineer - C# GUI Development (.NET),$54k-$113k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

The Company:

Cognex is the global leader in the exciting and growing field of machine vision. With over $600 million of cash in the bank and no debt, we are a financially strong international company with a culture that maintains the fast paced, creative environment of a startup. Our employees, proudly called “Cognoids,” take their work but not themselves seriously. Our Work Hard, Play Hard, Move Fast culture recognizes our employees for their innovation, perseverance, and hard work in a fun, rewarding, and quirky environment.

Job summary:

We are seeking a collaborative, hands-on software engineer with a clear preference for GUI development. Our ideal candidate is passionate about working on large codebases, and wants to learn quickly by exploring architectures, understanding the underlying concepts, and build on top of them.

The existing GUI framework is a crucial part of Cognex’ core products. Therefore, this position provides an excellent environment to collaborate with multiple engineering and marketing teams worldwide early on for an accelerated career path at Cognex.

Essential functions:

Maintain and debug software components of the existing Windows Forms GUI

Validate software changes by manual testing

Extend the GUI to support the functionality of future barcode reader generations

Collaborate with marketing and engineering teams on improving the user experience

Knowledge, skills, and abilities:

Required

Strong C#/.NET skills and 3+ years of professional experience working on large codebases

Proficient in desktop GUI development (backend and frontend work), Windows Forms (or WPF)

Strong analytical and problem-solving skills

Self-motivated, and able to work independently

Experience with software development processes, source code control, QA, formal bug tracking

Excellent presentation, communication, organizational and interpersonal skills

Desired

Proven ability to work effectively on multi-site development projects

Experience with networking / multi-core development / C backends / real-time or performance optimizations

Minimum education

Bachelor in Computer Science or related field

.

Additional Job Description

Equal Employment Opportunity

Cognex is an equal opportunity employer. Cognex evaluates qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, protected veteran status, disability/handicap status or any other legally protected characteristic.",3.5,"Cognex Corporation
3.5","Natick, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1981,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
194,Data Scientist,-1,"Job Title: Data Scientist

Location: Atlanta

WHY YOU'LL LOVE SALESLOFT:

Put Customers First. Team Over Self. Focus on Results. Bias Towards Action. Glass Half Full.

These are the values that define who we are, that have empowered our staggering growth, and could be instrumental to your career development

Headquartered in Atlanta, Georgia, with offices in San Francisco, New York, London, Indianapolis, and Guadalajara, SalesLoft is growing rapidly and is looking for future Lofters to join our team. As a testament to our Organizational Health, SalesLoft has been named by Forbes as one of America's Best Startup Employers in 2020, twice by Deloitte as a 'Fastest-Growing Technology Company in North America,' featured by The New York Times as a start-up on a path to a $1B valuation, and has been recognized as a '#1 Best Place to Work in Atlanta' three separate years. SalesLoft is ranked #1 in the emerging category of Sales Engagement software and is on a mission to equip companies to maximize revenue by creating a fantastic buying experience.

We're redefining an age old industry! This is challenging work – but our team of brilliant creatives makes the journey thrilling. We're fast-paced, innovative, and collaborative. We pursue excellence in everything and have a lot of fun along the way. Come join us!

THE OPPORTUNITY:

Although we're proud of our history, we're just as excited about the future. We want to create a world-class culture and company that attracts, develops, engages and retains elite talent.

At SalesLoft, our data scientists are pivotal to our company's success. You will be a key member of our fast-growing and high-performing data science team and will conduct innovative machine learning research and build product feature prototypes that will deliver value to our customers.

On a day-to-day basis, you will be responsible for solving business problems using our in-house data and your technical prowess. Specifically, you will:
Apply advanced statistical techniques and concepts to analyze data from the company databases and other unstructured data sources to build innovative product features, marketing content, and internal services.
Invest in the sales engagement domain; collaborate with product, engineering, sales, customer success, and other teams to understand business and customer needs, and translate them to tangible data science problems.
Own and manage complex projects and communicate effectively with stakeholders.
Contribute to the rapid growth of the research organization, being flexible in data engineering, algorithmist, and analyst responsibilities as they arise.
In addition to working with amazing colleagues who exemplify our 'team over self' core value, you will also have the opportunity to leverage your mathematical skills and technical expertise to transform the sales engagement space. You will have an opportunity to make a difference.

WHAT WE'RE LOOKING FOR:

We are seeking a hungry and passionate person who will be instrumental in growing the data science organization at the most successful early stage SaaS company in Atlanta. We are looking for someone who enjoys, and is unafraid of, getting their hands dirty with unstructured, unlabeled data and can think out of the box to solve business problems.

If you're looking for an opportunity to learn more, do more, and become more than previously possible… If you're passionate about innovation, growth and serving customers and thrive in a fast-paced, developmental environment, then becoming a Data Scientist at SalesLoft is the career path for you

THE TEAM:

Our SalesLoft's Data Science team is comprised of seasoned and up-and-coming data scientists, machine learning engineers and a product manager who are all aligned on one vision and mission:
Vision: Every seller is loved by the buyers they serve (#saleslove)
Mission: Equip companies to maximize revenue by creating a fantastic buying experience
The Data Science team consists of results-oriented technology professionals who are hungry, humble and smart. They are passionate about making SalesLoft the leader in AI technologies in the sales engagement space and believe in leveraging data science and machine learning to guide and help our users. They are also the epitome of our core values - Customers First. Team Over Self. Focus on Results. Bias Towards Action. Glass Half Full.

THE SKILL SET:
2+ years experience as a data scientist or machine learning engineer
Proficient in a variety of ML techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and has a fundamental understanding of their real-world advantages/drawbacks
Experience with deploying data science products in production or collaborating with engineers to deploy in production
Prior experience of working with unlabeled and unstructured data. Experience with NLP and/or predictive forecasting preferred
Excellent verbal and communication skills and visualization abilities to communicate with stakeholders
Strong knowledge/experience with a variety of analysis tools, including Python, R, and SQL. Experience with Spark or Dask preferred.
WITHIN ONE MONTH, YOU'LL:
Attend SalesLoft's New Hire Orientation, where you will learn our SalesLoft story and understand what makes our ""Lofters"" unique
Begin 1:1's with your manager, understand your 30-60-90 plan, meet & shadow current members of the SalesLoft team, and delve into your territory
Set your OKRs (Objectives and Key Results) with your manager and develop an action plan to achieve them
Meet key partners in Product, Engineering, Customer Success etc.
Understand our various data sources and get your hands dirty with them
Explore our technical stack and infrastructure and get comfortable with them
WITHIN THREE MONTHS, YOU'LL:
Create a shadowing plan and begin executing it to understand the SalesLoft platform.
Apply various machine learning and data science techniques to solve sales business problems.
Create custom ETL capabilities to support your research efforts.
Lead and deliver your first research project.
Communicate research results to product and engineering leadership in verbal, visual, and written mediums.
WITHIN SIX MONTHS, YOU'LL:
Significantly contribute to team planning and estimation.
Continue to focus on your OKRs.
Create prototypes using product knowledge, customer insights and technical expertise.
Implement and compare models to improve key metrics.
Advise product leadership on data science data capture and collection requirements.
Collaborate with our machine learning engineers and software engineers to put your models in front of our customers.
WITHIN TWELVE MONTHS, YOU'LL:
Mentor other team members and assist them to tackle new problems.
Be a key advisor on team direction and SalesLoft's long-term data science strategy.
Collaborate with subject matter experts to develop success criteria to deliver new products, features and models.
Push the state of the art and apply the latest advances in deep learning and mathematical modeling to improve buyer and seller experiences.
IS THIS ROLE NOT AN EXACT FIT? Keep an eye on our Careers Page for other positions!

WHY SHOULD YOU WORK AT SALESLOFT:
You will become part of an amazing culture with a supportive CEO and smart teammates who actually care
You will work with an amazing team you can learn from and teach.
You will experience joining a high-growth/high-traction organization.
You will hear ""Yes, let's do that!"" and then have the opportunity to successfully execute on your ideas
We have a vibrant, open office that utilizes modern technology.
You will grow more here than you would anywhere else, that is a promise.
SalesLoft is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, disability, veteran status, pregnancy, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"SalesLoft
4.5",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
195,Senior DevOps Engineer,$82k-$135k (Glassdoor Est.),"Ezoic, a VC backed Google Certified Publishing Partner is an easy-to-use, yet incredibly sophisticated machine learning platform that allows digital publishers to automatically test content, layouts and ads to enhance user experience and increase digital revenue. Our platform reaches more than 300 million unique individuals each month and is growing quickly.

We're looking for a highly-motivated, self-starting DevOps Engineer that is excited to learn new cloud technologies and languages. You will help manage our infrastructure within AWS to keep the thousands of sites we power running smoothly. You'll also be involved in our CI/CD pipeline to keep our software engineers moving quickly, and use infrastructure as code to keep our systems up to date.

This is a full-time employee position, no C2C please.

Responsibilities:

Perform and automate system administration services including installation, configuration, maintenance, and disaster recovery of hundreds or thousands of EC2 instances in 10+ regions.
Control EC2 instance life-cycle and other AWS resources
Respond to production incidents, troubleshoot, resolve, and document.
Analyze, troubleshoot and resolve system, software, network, and storage failures for a globally distributed cloud infrastructure
Configure, test, deploy, and upgrade software for production EC2 servers in AWS
Author and recommend settings for applications, operating systems, networks, and cloud services to improve performance, security, and reliability
Design and develop monitoring and 100% uptime solutions for critical systems including our own in-house web hosting offering.

Qualifications:

3+ years experience with both software engineering and sysops or 6+ years' experience as a devops engineer or similar.
Extensive experience with cloud computing and virtualization.
Expert knowledge of Linux.
Proven understanding of networking (TCP/IP, DNS, etc)
Experience in 24x7 productions operations, preferably in a highly available SaaS or cloud service provider.

Life as an Ezoic engineer:

Ezoic is an inaugural member of the Google Certified Publishing Partner Program. This means we work closely with Google to help websites optimize their ad revenue. We actually have won awards directly from Google for the artificial intelligence that we've built. Cool, right?!?

Ezoic is a technology-first company. Our CEO is a developer by trade, and our engineers are given all the tools needed to succeed. We empower our engineers to make a lot of their own decisions about both design and implementation, and encourage them to come up with new ideas to improve the application. We also aim to keep a good work-life balance, based on our philosophy that happy engineers are more productive. We want you to be working on something that you are passionate about and allow engineers to move around to keep things fresh.

While we are all working remotely now because of Covid, we have a brand new office in Carlsbad, CA, where we plan to return next year sometimes when the world goes back to normal. Every engineer works at their own quad-monitor setup on a standing desk. We pride ourselves on getting stuff done, but when you need a break, Ezoic offers great perks, including unlimited vacation time, catered lunches, snacks, flexible hours, ping pong, video games, and pool.

#ZR",4.9,"Ezoic
4.9","Carlsbad, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
196,"Senior Software Engineer, AI",-1,"Paige is on a mission to accelerate and transform the diagnosis and treatment of cancer. Paige is creating a digital platform for pathologists to transform their workflow and is developing a new class of computational diagnostics positioned to drive the future of pathology.

A career at Paige is deeply mission-driven where you will work with state-of-the-art technologies alongside leaders in the field and to improve cancer care every day. We reach high, help each other succeed, and believe in creativity, curiosity, and creating amazing products.

Paige employees receive great benefits, including health insurance, 401(k), paid parental leave, a generous health and wellness stipend and snacks delivered to your door on a weekly basis. We recently raised $70M in series B investment to ensure we're able to continue our mission and expand our impact. Join us!

We're seeking a Senior Software Engineer, AI to join us. In this role you'll join a team of world-leading experts in machine learning, computer vision and pathology. You'll be part of the team that builds solutions for pathologists, clinicians and researchers to accelerate and improve the accuracy of cancer detection, classification and staging. This is an extraordinary opportunity to be part of a high-performing team and to pursue a life-changing mission.

This position will be working from our NYC HQ once the working conditions are deemed safe due to Covid-19. Until then, this position can be fully remote for candidates based in the U.S.

Responsibilities:
Work closely with scientists as well as engineers to build applications that allow our machine learning models to be put into production.
Work with the team to plan, develop, train and test machine learning models for the purposes of computational pathology while leveraging and championing software engineering best practices.
Drive development of machine learning tooling and infrastructure to improve the scale and efficiency of machine learning development.
Identify and evaluate new patterns and technologies to improve performance, maintainability and traceability of our machine learning systems.
Participate in driving the whole product development life cycle from high uncertainty research and experimentation to deployment in production and maintenance.
Mentor engineers to foster a culture of technical excellence.
Requirements:
Extensive experience in Python development.
Extensive experience with modern product development practices, including software testing (e.g. unit testing, regression testing).
Extensive experience with Agile development methodologies.
Experience with parallelization, threading and concurrency problems.
Experience with design patterns, algorithms and data structures.
Experience with distributed systems.
Minimum qualifications:
Master's degree in computer science or a related field, or equivalent years of experience
5+ years of industry experience as a software engineer",5.0,"Paige
5.0",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
197,Sr. Cybersecurity Engineer,$99k-$153k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Space Dynamics Laboratory (SDL) is seeking an experienced engineer with cyber network operations experience. SDL works with the Department of Defense and industry to create novel solutions that impact national defense in space, air, land, and sea. We are seeking a creative engineer/developer to provide systems security engineering for our C4ISR solutions. If you enjoy challenging design problems and determining if solutions do things they are not supposed to do, we want you to join our team.

This position may work out of Logan, UT or Albuquerque, NM.

Key Responsibilities:

In this role, you will work across engineering disciplines to ensure systems are designed, built and fielded with levels of resilience that will enable nominal operations in a cyber-contested environment. Your main duties will be to ensure that the system designs meet customer required security risk posture and that the program’s systems, electrical, and software engineers are not inadvertently creating security risks.

You will:

· Serve as a program cybersecurity engineering lead interacting regularly with customers to establish clear and achievable cybersecurity objectives and requirements for the program

· Lead and manage program cybersecurity requirements analysis, threat assessments, vulnerability assessments, secure architecture development, testing, and integration of cybersecurity related systems, tools, and applications as part of the overall R&D process

· Provide direct engineering support to customer program managers and senior leaders

· Lead and/or participate in various cyber-related internal research and development (IR&D) activities

· Develop custom software components, tools, or test capabilities

· Direct and link the technical security engineering activities on a mission program to the overall system design to produce secure and resilient mission solutions

· Ensure the logical and systematic conversion of customer cybersecurity requirements into systems and capabilities solutions that acknowledge technical, schedule, and cost constraints

· Provide technical expertise to cybersecurity business development efforts, strategic planning, and capabilities development

· Regularly interact with a variety of customers across DoD, the military services, intelligence community, and commercial customers

· Participate in government and contractor technical interchange meetings and reviews

· Represent SDL in technical forums, presentations, and symposia

Required Qualifications:

· ABET-accredited bachelor’s degree in a related technical field

· 10 years of relevant cybersecurity and engineering (IT, networks, or software) experience

· Demonstrated knowledge of current cybersecurity related threats, cyber defense tools, and TTPs

· Experience in red teaming or penetration testing

· Demonstrated expertise developing cyber tools and solutions

· Experience with at least one programming language or in-depth network engineering

· Familiarity with secure software development process

· Strong team and interpersonal skills

· Ability to communicate effectively both orally and in writing

· Ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with customers

· Must be a U.S. citizen and be able to obtain a DoD security clearance

· Must be able to travel occasionally to government, contractor, and customer facilities

Preferred Qualifications:

· Hands-on experience in cyber operations

· Master’s degree in a related field

· Five years of systems engineering experience (DoD/INCOSE)

· Experience with artificial intelligence and machine learning

· Significant project management experience

· Significant systems engineering experience

· Experience with C4ISR systems

· Active DoD Top Secret/SCI clearance and current SSBI

SDL Benefits:

At SDL, we take pride in and highly value our employees. SDL offers competitive salaries and a fantastic benefits package, including:

· Flexible work schedules

· Generous annual, sick, and holiday paid leave

· A variety of inexpensive-premium, high-quality health, dental, vision, and life insurance options

· Generous employer retirement contribution (Up to 14.2% of annual gross earnings)

· Discounted USU tuition of 50% for employees and dependents

· Access to USU facilities and USU staff privileges

Instructions to applicants:

Along with the online application, please attach:

1) Cover Letter

2) Resume

Once you've completed the initial application, you will receive an e-mail requesting you to complete a video digital interview. For more information, please visit: https://hirevue.secure.force.com/E2Candidate/?lang=en_US

AA/EOE",4.5,"Space Dynamics Laboratory
4.5","Logan, UT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1959,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
198,Data Scientist/Machine Learning Expert,$86k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"26-Aug-2020

Job ID
301660BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""ONE Global Discovery Chemistry Community working across 7 disease areas at the Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research (NIBR) is seeking a hardworking and motivated Data Scientist to join our Computer-Aided Drug Discovery (CADD) Department in Cambridge, MA. The successful candidate will join an energizing and collaborative research organization, working alongside colleagues who are dedicated to improving human health through the discovery of transformative medicines.

We are seeking an outstanding data scientist with the skills, experience and passion to extract new knowledge and ground-breaking insights from the expanded body of data collected by one of the world’s leading pharmaceutical companies. You will be a member of our global CADD group, an interdisciplinary team of expert molecular modelers, cheminformaticians, and data scientists. Teamed up with domain specialists from biology, chemistry and translational medicine, this is a unique opportunity to develop and apply cutting-edge machine learning technologies to uncover insights to real-world drug discovery problems and innovate paths to transformative medicines.

What you'll do:
Develop and implement approaches for extracting patterns and correlations from both internal and external data sources using machine learning toolkits
Develop workflows for conducting comparative analysis among Novartis’ diverse data sources as well as generalizing approaches crafted in-house or externally.
Enable open-source solutions for internal use and implement cutting-edge published scientific methods.
Develop customized machine learning solutions including data querying and knowledge extraction.
Interact and be part of matrixed project teams to drive effective decision-making by mining and developing predictive models
Develop skills in the area of cheminformatics and drug discovery and improve those to accelerate development of novel machine learning algorithms
Know the latest breakthroughs in scientific literature and interact with scientists to integrate data science technologies
Posting Title
Data Scientist/Machine Learning Expert",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
199,Data Engineer,$65k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Moser Consulting, a data engineer / bi engineer, performs advanced (senior-level) data analysis and data engineering work. Work involves leading initiatives to create data analytics-driven solutions for critical business objectives. This position represents the data management team to our business partners, and brings technical expertise to citizen BI and data analytics teams across the agency. Sr Consultants may supervise the work of others. Works under minimal supervision with extensive latitude for the use of initiative and independent judgement. Consultants will have supervision and likely work with or under the direction of a Principal or Senior Consultant.
Works closely with customers regarding their specific data needs to develop the requirements for data subject areas needed.
Captures the inventory of data sources and dashboards to prepare and manage integrated data.
Acts as the IT knowledge leader on data warehousing and data analytics to the business.
Ensures data warehouse implementations meet business expectations and coordinates customer acceptance testing and training.
Ensures the customer can exploit the data warehouse solutions and helps identify additional possible uses of information; anticipates future needs and opportunities.
Assists in the identification and integration of potential new data sources.
Designs and develops ELT pipelines that extract data from various sources and load into the data warehouse or other systems.
Ensures that controls to verify the accuracy and consistency of data are implemented and monitored.
Provides ongoing operational support of the enterprise data warehouse, continued development and enhancement of the data warehouse, automation of daily data extracts and external system feeds, and development and enhancement of current dashboards.
Requirements
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited four-year college or university with major coursework in computer information systems, computer science, data management, information systems or information science or a related field.
High School diploma or equivalent and additional directly related experience may substitute for the required education on a year-for-year basis.
Six (6) years of experience in data warehouse, including dimensional modeling, ETL/ELT pipeline design & development, data management, data analysis, process measurement, and metrics management, or a related discipline.
Two (2) years of experience working closely with business analytics teams and data analysts, including PowerBI (or equivalent) experience with financial and accounting data.
Successful track record of Business Intelligence/Data Warehouse solution implementations (design, implementation, data visualization and ongoing support/maintenance) with extensive interaction with business users.
Emerging data and analytics technologies
Cloud platforms and development patterns
Relational and non-relational data structures, theories, principles, and practices.
Metadata management and associated processes.
Data encryption and secure transmission practices (SSL, SSH, SFTP, Certificates, PKI, OAUTH2).
Machine-learning, statistical analysis, artificial intelligence, predictive analytics.
Microsoft/Azure Certifications, Snowflake Certifications are beneficial.
Preferred Locations: Indianapolis, IN and Baltimore, MD
Benefits

For more than 20 years, Moser Consulting has been the go-to source for exceptional IT talent with the ability to self-manage. At Moser Consulting, our people are our #1 asset. We hire the best people, welcome them like family, connect them with opportunities, and let them do what they do best: produce innovative solutions to technology problems.

Our culture gives us a competitive advantage by keeping our employees happy, healthy, and by lowering stress levels in a very demanding industry. It is no accident that we are recognized as one of the Best Places to Work in Indiana. We focus on giving employees: an incredible work space; a fun, collaborative, and creative atmosphere; an extremely generous compensation package; and dozens of outstanding and unique perks usually not found at one company.

Equal Opportunity Employer–minorities/females/veterans/individuals with disabilities/sexual orientation/gender identity.",4.8,"Moser Consulting
4.8","Indianapolis, IN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1996,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
